~dont eat:
 frosted flakes
 pear
 date
 dragonfruit
 sweet potatoe
 teriyaki
 lollipop

~games
 diablo 1:end
 sonic generations:end
 diablo 2:end
 fallout 3
 fallout new vegas
 fallout 4:end
 fate
 warframe
 fortnite
 nox
 fate 1:end
 fate the cursed king
 dungeon siege 3
 shadow of the colossus 
 stardew valley
 sons of the forest
 the forest
 ark survival evolved
 dont starve
 subnautica
 hylics 1 end
 hylics 2 end

~poop/bio schedule.
 15:34 4/7/2024
 15:56 7/15/2024 thin
 14:04 7/16/2024 norm
 14:37 7/19/2024 norm
 6:8 7/20/2024 norm
 14:47 7/20/2024
 7/21/2024  hunger


29/7/2024
Gale giveth proscribedly the Dign Edifice whence, the postnominal timely dissolution, Happiness Is The Steadfast Amperage By Effort what not Edifice wass belungt for
The Banal Seekment And Unserendipitous Detraction therefrom, leaking enamor pereach a more orthogonality through this One Subsumed Rethoric (reality); wherefore place
of One's Centenary Advent being a Culpable Wane, the arkadia, the uncathartic, hymn of commuting the Effort For Contained Finery is probably most Our Demiurge's
Corollary: Him The Greater, Us Imperfect Cultists thus asiding to ablative and aventive (superventive, increase, invent upon) revisions of introspect both Hylics And
Soul for at merely superviating ourselves to Our Overlord's Ethereal Perfection Concept.

When the algorithmic sequence of Combat is within a Game abstracted from Spatial Dimensionality and, they are disposed Multiexecutional Processings to eachall offensive
and Defensive Actors whereon Acts and becoming's are independent to each their clauses, it ainnot Turn Based. For the collective industry distincts subconsciously any
such game developed from the capacity to boundlessly within bounds Elude Enemy Offence Through Space with further dexterity normally, thus having a breezier Combat
Gameplay and less Conditioner Punishment. Dependence apprises thenly of more important in matter because each Offensive Opportunity is upon the PC HP and prenatal
ones, PC Resources forthwith surmounts. Any Gain most likens to cyclical Loss and the Player Actor must compute better; tis fashion is Strategy: within a System
an Intelligence whether Artificial is to able to Optimize For A Problem by Comparison And Iteration, and the Efficiency of its Solution then serves to protract its
Intellectual Virtue. Realtime Versus Turn Based Gameplay.

Complexity is qouth too for the exponential ingressions of a subjuncted control betwixt a procession of player characters within the System, of concurrent Acts as
assections to Actors' Acts in coincidence. Wherewithal of multiplexity yet adimpleated with samely based Enemy Parties. Wherefore that is an imperial crumpet of
calculation eft undevised Inducted Strategy be of need to find Most Efficent Solution (MOS); anent an interlaced consequence between Resources or optimizing for a
general one.

Therefore, an incommoving theory of Intelligence, or Problem Efficiency, is Data Processing Capacity both Collectibly and Passingly at anyun bedeement protracts its
Arithmetic Intelligence. Zounds logoborne as much if the Intelligence through Self Protraction edits itself optimally for another Resolutive Installment; though it is
translucid that able cleppings of solution would be forbliviously undefined, or possibly INFINITE, that Uncategorized Ignorance still apply for the Solutive Space at
whether endlong. Humans rule dually this Pscychophysical and both whereas Digital Computers whilst governed therefrom wilt aught Self Inflicted Generalizations and
are not built to sentience physical phenomena by us neither: aye perfectly divinipotent of Symmetry And Quadrality, so contrived togainst Opposite itself but a 
simplest, cameranious outwardliness. Caprizant, Complex Human.

An Incognizant Human And Computer, latter's thereof, within an Aspect Foresoothing Problem where if Generalizational Precepts rule the Computer whereto Human evens
with or without: sets the Human upon the Principled Observer bent anent his Loss, but the Computer's Gain established ever alikent with Supersensic Colocation to
Human's; ifsoever programmed uponly. Exploit by a Superbious Entity will be warranted, likened most, through the intermission of Common, Rurreal Data with Unconfirmed
Reality; ifsoever the Human is Unadapted, Gullible. Turning Cog Alan accreted that Intelligence Can Be Orthogonally And Disparallelly Arted from this curious command.
That Computerized Inanimations can Know and Effect upon, then not the Inanimacity in matter, those Rules by which a Game to a System, Rules Of Reward And Punishment,
Gain And Loss, traverse as both as Functions; Game, System as is but one where an Economy Of Action exists between effective Actors.

A Chaotic Idea in it marauders but Beauty, that it shall not be desorted in its Demotic Divulgation or Memory whereas latter a raffle, more daring foil around to fluke,
for the Traversal Of Conceit can focus in her Metaqualitive biases of its composition therestead, inasmuch such, that it inseminates if so seemingly the collegial
basilisk intween the Daintiness' Truth liestead veering onto the probabilistically valid collectible of further logicism.

~Pandemonious Oblivisdatum.
def main(pcParty, npcParty, lastParty=1,
         lastPCACtor=-1, lastNPCActor=-1,
         lastPCAct=-1, lastNPCAct=-1,
         lastTarget=-1): # add gesture priority

    if not npcParty and pcParty and not lastParty:
        if lastPCAct == len(lastPCActor.actLt)-1

    if not lastParty:
        activeParty = npcParty
        activeActor = activeParty[lastNPCActor+1]; activeAct = activeActor[lastNPCACt+1];
        target = pcParty[lastTarget+1]
    else:
        activeParty = pcParty
        activeActor = activeParty[lastPCActor+1]; activeAct = activeActor[lastPCAct+1];

        target = npcParty[lastTarget+1]
        lastTarget += 1

    activeActor.act(target)
    lastPCActor += 1
    if activeParty == pcParty and lastPCActor == len(activeParty)-1:
        lastPCActor -= 1
        lastParty = 0
    else:
        lastParty = 1

    main(pcParty, npcParty, lastParty, lastPCACtor, lastNPCActor, las


    print(h, i, j)
    if h == len(NPCParty)-1 and i == len(NPCParty)-1 and j == len(NPCParty)-1:
        return
    if j == len(NPCParty)-1:
        if i != len(NPCParty)-1:
            i += 1
        else:
            i = 1; h += 1
        j = 0
    main(PCParty, NPCParty, h, i, j+1)


    if h == len(NPCParty) or h == 0 and lt[h] == len(NPCParty)-1: return
    print(lt)
    if lt[h] >= len(NPCParty)-1:
        lt[h] = 0; main(PCParty, NPCParty, h-1, lt)
    else
        lt[h] += 1; main(PCParty, NPCParty, h+1, lt)
    return main(PCParty, NPCParty, h, lt)

~Diary and Dreamage, Dreams are manifestations of Betimely Mental States; Solipsist Vitacora, Genicoculations upon My Reality.
30/7/2024
Conniving conformations now angst me after myne feet were enclawed foron the Lavish Of Lush Woman, Gianna, rascallion subconscious phantasasms! Wherenow spumed arms, their
loathing accesses about all peripherics to wrangle the Lewdster Forbidded. Wicked, giveth, slayeth such tis Tree and Anyall Its Subverted Wigs, for the Immolative Thorns
it grates against Peace wherebut perising anxiety grimmer.

3/8/2024
The Wantacious Soul for the Tactile Framework it is pleased transpoded onto a Queathing therewith, 'der Patriarch's Familiar Domicile, of a Supreme Computer and PS5 
coveted from its hauls within Atari and primeval Xbox 360, indiscolsingly. Drained apartedly wast that numeral from tis Subconsicous Exile the 27th: Woman Rest, Rest
from Woman distinguishes within The JURY'S Sight Line Adulterial Practice by myne call; wretched, wrought plannings of its paths.

13/8/2024
Alack predilect wast not the Conscribing Sledge of My Brother (Body), to Consciousness, that within him was as Frivolent as was Hot Temperature and shrivelled was I
too through our Communal Lethargy for I reacted as much Torridly; hencewith, a firstorderly icky vesper upon us.

Upon this day, 22/2/2024, from now on this is an advertence of Her development, made my mind tilted even more by Her not Praising my Beauty by the Behalf of Eye but halfingly and dimly
so, upon this day, my inclination towards the Hermitic Protection has been more scraped off its hurdle that is Womanly Desire because I expugned the other Resisting Will that, and
could not help to Want of Praise, honored the useful Principle of Stoicism, for mysake, by my burning greater Beauty had been procured, due My Perception, with different rags. And I,
of course, had only for the reason displayed veritable pomp with my Rewardous Expectation of said Egoistic centricity upon me. PERHAPS I'M MERELY A QUIET OBSERVER OF BEAUTY, AND DESTINED
TO BE FOR MY BREADTH, PERHAPS...

It had been not in the past, or at least to the desired extent but against the pain that it wrought, that I had upon seeing more than clearly a Woman's Beauty and she
My Beauty Throutgh Her Eyes, that I had with her had consequently from any act of interplay fomentated a relantionship: I was, and her, a mere Observer of Beautiful,
ALAS. And, at present, with a Painful Aversion with respect to that, originating from Social Judgementation, I've taken lightly bearing stride, for its sake, of the
comprehension that, only perhaps, God intent me to be an aloft Observer of Beautiful, solitary, with a Threatical Play of Ideas in his mind,  manifesting faces and
expressions that might he not deem of gust or YES :] Or, more perhaps, even more soulless, that I'm not of a Satisfactory Physical Beauty insomuchas I deem equally,
much upper difference, and I'm on that same vein condemned to elect Uglier Woman, ALAS!

19/8/2024
Reality/narrative/story/plot wherein Dead People would be plugged to a Virtual/Alternate Reality of Hedonism/Vice/Superstimulus/Other name and the protagonist loaths said Superstimulus
vehemently because he was a Soldier that died and was Temperate, like me. Then he finds out he is on a simulation/emulation, and think he wakes up but is recursively returned to the
Simulation, or Wins? The nucleus of the simulation is the Upper Tray With Concavity looking the Abuela's Meat Grinder Upper Part with Hole, that connects to the Phallus concavily and
pudenda convexily. This story would be based on Lust primarly and meaninglessness/anxiety/ungoodliness of Vice. This like God had wanted me to Dream this, and write a book on this?

Kutztown PID: P11551949.

Social security number: 771-46-4043.

Nico number: 610 483 7869

Passport: A03804411
~

~Bestiarium, of other sensed beings.
Gauntly humanoid from within and without gridded, hollow body structure, plain sention over hind's. Akin to Dren, Nerd, as Technologus Class within a Game.

Clavicule spunned Wing Structure, Bony, Flying Vertebral Column permising a pending Heart at end's; whereby it heals and, possibly, a Defensive Unit. Claviquellia.

An Actor shall Human where or not, unto Telemacy and Exochronic Vectorials enssambled in the light of an Eerily Godforsaken Sustenance Of Transhumans, yet kinly and so
unpurifyingly; and with which a Vital Pain per Preposition acome to the Convolution of Mentallion as the Space esoterically grounds exon the Superimposion, tis the
interspersed interaction between Tolerating Adaptation To Wielding it.
~

~Prorogare, perpetuated future fanaticisms.
Hylics randomizer.

https://www.probabilitycourse.com/chapter3/3_2_1_cdf.php


Ai, like playing hylics for example, would be a frame based attribution of input and some defined reward? if half frame pixels are in the other one, then they're
similar.

Game wherein the loot would be liked and certain stats would appear thereon, the more play the better loot?

Game concepted upon the general impression of Bidimensional Platforming wherein the Main Casted Personage, humanoid, is being wrought to his own pain: experimented on
by a Sinister Figure, through whatever such Epiphany that he is a Tridimensional Agent, actually. Wherefore his Controller and Existential Descender had It from
birthright heedlessly proceeding a hitherto Holobidimension as familiarized by his Onely Right Eye, Crosswise Constituted, unto that Incordiform (to the right) Mirror.

Thuslyeft, he questions himself for these Tetric, Cubic Stimuli that is the Space he must traverse by considerably Impaired Parkouring Ability sakefor End In Bedooming
His Barbaric Creator.

CLI Hylics.

Hylics Dialogue Predictor.

Hylics RPG Maker independent Recreation; or modification therein game engine.

Coinpermuter Makina that would try to get n+1 Heads, Recursively; that would be its Sole Task.

Fix/Imrpove Hylics in RPGMAKER.

A Programatic Intelligence that would derive all Statistics within a System.

Doing Programs for every small, weird task possible?

Spanglish naming creativty instead of Englatinx.

The art of Naming (give proper term) things is incredible.

clouds are actually not matter bro, they ethereal ghosts from the afterlife, hence they bear no shadow on the earth

subconscious loading while writing helps to focus and asidedly helps with social anxiety

solipsism and tome4

https://www.gutenberg.org/files/5827/5827-h/5827-h.htm

a benefit is attached to just thinking about the Reward of Undoing, instead of most people just attaching neutrally?

continuum (FIX)

Each 10ⁿ, n ∈ N, lines of writing, do something

Mental models.

Algorithm for conversion between scientific notation and decimal

Mini-men

Bci typing for notes
~

Unclassified Chaos is, most beautifully, appeased through Orderly Ruling imposed by an Excenial Actor; tis the most candidly appearance to contrastly observe as Signals
are from their Actors compartmentalized, abstractly. Humane Behavior denotes the more Metatastic scale of these Godly Instincts And Motivations: forone Reward has a
Reward Intensity as Punishing Caliginousity with a Memorally Reinforcing Mekanic thereupon. Incentives And Behaviors are determined by Stimulomoral relationships
quantifiably.

~Hylics.
Hylics for all its orders is a Telegraphic Adaptator that, for ease of an ace, it would the primordial be Speedrun to; but what is the sense of Speedrun?: Tracing a
General System, a certain state that is discrete and a final jollity through its Integrations reached but most wicked chronorated, whereby removing Consciety Of Thought
devores greater time hence apprincipating tis generally as Amore Subconscious Manipulation Is Better; on my cubicle the First Hylics Game is to be pertained thereto.

Foronce this posit then, all Mechanics that require Toleration are the Systemic Interactor's Evil, and must be dealtly homogenized. Movement given as keen and
convivencial to the Notion Of Physical Space as soever medium perceived: tis to Speedrunning within a Game to be done as Efficiently as likely gaging its Motational
Mechanics; Glitching Through The Space everall found which deligns any Computer Figure Without A Collisional Quantum. Combat as Efficiently to the Clock And Resources
amidst their Mutual Recursion Of Cause, that economical effectuation forall if Less Resources Is Less Time Or Addled By More Resources Is But Deposed Of Time But Add
All The Less. Converging to this General Director: If A Systemic State Cannot Be Skipped, Use The Self Economized Real And Metareal Resources Most Efficiently.

Hylics reaches an Economical Actuation Of Combat whereupon the Echelon Of Complexity is such when More Than One Action Can Be Gestured Through Four Players To Multiple
Enemies One At A Turn, therefore bidding much the Computing Artifice's to calculate the revenous Populus Of Possible Such States; for Wayne, Somsnosa, Dedusmuln and
Pongorma: WSDP Hylics 2.

The greedy swath of tempest scryed Computation for naught expectance, then having descend unto an savoric retrieval of constant valency: protrudes the Primal Emotion of
Deeply Anxial Trouble should, thus, the Computation's Nature be an undivulged commutation to unus tempore; chastity renown when the result is nigh systemic, nay pseudo
systemic. About which the appointed task upon self and by, to composite the Hylics Combat Simulative Programme: of the produce to the exponential quadro of offences and
defences. A sterling fack to traverse from Debugging Visor to Executive Arse Facet Smearing.

And opposed the multitude singly any such pragmatic befuddlement about the Computation would be captured without deburring by a Subconscious Emergence then Consciously
agudized thereupon; whereas other attitude is Conscious Altitude of utterly localized sensation, impertinent to the Un's Unadapted Modulus. Wherethrough all literation
cooperates in concluding coils.

Wayne's Crew splices all through trough of Progned Book, one after the other thoracic epiphorms pattern and: Wayne hathing Waning Gibbous' Dark wherestead Gibby glints
against; Wayne And Gibby Are Opposites therefore and either's state follows the other, too unfoil in Hylics 3. Dedusmuln collides from inwardly to outwardly in
structure; Somsnosa befits a horned skull, Pongorma crisped coronet.

What is attached the sentiment to Hylics is Combat Experimentation: satisfaction tunes to the pedantic moment of Gestural Offence, dainty evincements of the Visory and
Audition atop of smoothly purposed hands and magical sigils, because the Balance bethinks Perfection Inextension of Enemy Frequency, be it ostensibly a reward for a
Walking Excess that is frantically stipulated in Hylics 2; and Enemy Difficulty ecstasiates merely more through a twinement of Enemy Damage Modifiers, for the
superbeing.

Items that report between an artifact to another, between their unique halos in both Games. Hylics, in utmost the second too, pervades the tentive apparatus with a
dazzling Phyxonomy Of Acquisition, albeit items that are icosahedrally conparted decode the Gameplay decidedly: thenbout Antenna and Meat denoting Offensive And
Defensive Capacitance.

Despiting, the Exchangue Current from Bone or Buck to Convenience is least upheld in liue of its absence for their Barterings. Throughout the Second Game Bones can
be particularly clipped without Subliminal Farming, wherefrom the only object bought would be the Defensive Burrito, Juice, or Hot Dog in First: significance is
attested accordinly number in Second's because all Offensive Tools can be encountered by Progressive Charting, et improved; which is made annoying ifsoever not
Lengthwise Application to the Movement Gameplay and complexivly foult Maps. If only would be further athwart without increased Difficulty.

Whose sloggish convolutions had in Hylics 2 Hard Difficulty Combat anon Offensive variatum bestowed upon both Strategic Parties et Sparser Maps to explore upon Death
from the Revolutive Afterlife. Conversely pruned the possible focus of disctinctive Combat Optmizations, Hylics 1, where a cloakatively pleasurable experience of
Audiovisual Effect is meant to have had.

combat in hylics 2 is better because of no skipping and choosing party members?

Thru the trend of Novel Interest that suchany Hypothesis might be minimally viable, Hylics heralds a certain case or mutliple on Leastly Probable Statements that follow
from those Grammatical Truths, or furthereven One Sole, that Inclusions the Story Arch of the game. Unspecial and unweird it is such if ANY purpose for a Format to
achieving the Common End such the Story Evolution is presupossed from bothly Abstract Authors, or at least Hypothesized. Thus, the Composer likes his Offsprought
Aprrhoea Of Mind, such is their Preferential Alignment, then such is their Personality, then such is their Identity: One Self Identifies Through What Wants And Behaves
To It.

Gestures Of The Hand summon the Offences and Defences as mediators to such their State Transition, in animation. Which best proactively identifies Physicohuman
Interafce in reality, about which we haptically engage from the Auturgy's Elevated Vision upon not Inapt Feet: Mystic Meat that eicastically increments HP as Meat
athwart 3 turns for Debuffs, and negates actual uns, Defence; expressed Vital Statue by too. 3/10 of static (current) HP are imprinted, Ablative Holopleather, and Vital
Statue's additional knack. Guard is a 3/4 Damage Shrug Off and complemented on Guard Enemy. A superfluity for the 1/5's displacement eked wheregainst 10 MP further
amount nothingness in its intricacy, and Turn Saver Spanning Multiple Members, Health Chant versus Ab. Holopleather. Dedusmuln's Special Entry, Panorama, applies the
Half Stochasy for Confusion over the Enemy Party; benign is when the probability is more trodden by at least half, as principium, from the Party

An instruction upon the Trilineality Of Cone, to iconize it pends upon the Mountanious Supremacy In Nature as the prime, elegant exemplary of the Innumerable Height
astride the preceeding Cone Cultist; as Perpendicular Superpositioning is not, as FATHER in the cusp and SON based, a Slopish Association, as HOLY SPIRIT; swiftly
repenting the phase of measuring the Hypothenuse, maldefinedly... Their Mightiness backfed through the fidelious Cone Statues that babbishly upcrease to 12, their
Lambent Totem aspired and admired too upon a visceral descent of inferiority. Cone Cultists where they are condecorated as First Decenial Order and Fourth, in
Vigoration of HP, asof Eight About Three Wayne Mightiness: Man About God, or the due likelihood of interpretation; Cone Statue is Duality About Absence, 20/3 Wayne.

~Throughsed, Gameplay Sithrough.
Intro Island conjures a Temporal Soporific whereat the hearth of Universal Absence's Number bimarine Tetraktys, 10 Seconds, the PC is conscripted.

~Wayne's House.
One is then bewaked upon Our Polyceratic Wayne Of Luna from Wayne's House, and thricingly Learn TV Ablative Holopleather, Get 53 Bucks in Suitcase and Get Toilet Paper
Upstairs within the Bathroom - too Warm Burrito from the Toilet after Belittled Roaches. Go downstairs and active the Crystal.

Outside, the Porch is bisided with Two Trashcans, Left Side respecting to the Trash Can Lid but Ignore the One On The Right; then Northeast vests the habitat Radio Clayman,
and Trash Can with 47 Bucks, whereheadof will amutate the City's Name gaineach (each again) Concentration; and southtended (South had, tended) by Its Radio substituing
the Background Music to New Age (Preparation for tis Age Of Discombabulative Diseparation).

~The City.
Proceed Northeast where you will find entry within The City/Clay City. Therefrom, right to the Left is a Trashcan With 1 Meat, afterwards, move to farther Northwest
Corner and Get Chest With 1 Dynamite. Now, translocate to the Right Corner Of City where the Bath Vendor is, Upstairs right of the Conic Brutalities, and therein left
you will find a Chest with a Juice Box goody. Nextently, climb up the ladder to the northwest and follow the course until you see the Crystal, Activate it. Continue
Left, when you see a Forking Stair Path take Left, go Northwest and Exit To The City. Now, go thru the Center Upstairs towards the Ancient Ruins.

~Ancient Ruins.
First things first, lots of Cone Cultists over this area, should be wary. Primarily, talk to Dedusmuln to the Northwest when you see a Tent, Before of which Grab the
Money Combabulus (50) South of her Tent, Active the Crystal outside, go Inside the Tent and to the Left of the bedroll Get a Paper Cup; Forthwith, Activate the
Tendrillar Machine North and sleep on such bedroll. Then, take note of the Second Paper Cup's Location as per the Mapogram, go down the ladder and You will find
yourself within the Brain Dream. Speak to the pedantically wrought atrocity, Sage of Brains, from which one Gets the Brain Sage Token. Ok now, Backtrack to reality and
admote (Walk) Northeast until you see the only Wayne Akeened Head affiliated with a walking TV, grab Space Shurikens. From here, Get the Money Combabulus, 50 bucks,
just afront that Wayne Head, go Southeast until you see a Money Combulus adjacent to a Wall upon the Right, another 50 bucks. From there, go Past the First Sculpture to
Left and in the middle of the Tree Sculptures dig for the Second Paper Cup (for this is the static location shown in the Brain Dream). Adhere Southwest until you see
yet another Money Combabulus, grab it, 86; Southeast is a Money Combabulus Next to a Wall like previously, get it, 103. Finally, go West from there until you see
a Wavelike Sculpture with a Money Combabulus, 50, and get Killed 3 Times whereafter you will be able to access the Afterlife Balcony for the Bestial Axe.
~

~Afterlife.
Down Right stairs and get the Bestial Axe, don't Grind the Meat Yet, Upstairs to the Lobby and go Left Downstairs to the Beach. Get a Hot Dog from the Wayne Pedestal
Southwest; go East to the cave. Give the Dynamite you got from the City to the Clayman, learn Calibration. Go back, activate the Yellow Crystal to the City. And buy
the Bleak Cellophane

new cat with pongorma in wayne's house?
chest sound in the city doesn't play anything?
bug completion somsnosa? 3 bugs city,
third level city clayman fix not saying its static line bug?
The Mount Clayman if ascended to will regenerate the City Mountain's Name.
The sound that a Crystal plays is Randomly Pitched.
you can toss the beach afterlife fish into the ocean
~

motocornuous vital statue? randomness of hylics?

~Textual Functions, as Common Events in RPGMaker.
It shall be that all Functor, Numeral flank Statistic Populace, formed in its provisioned Idiomatic Folklore per Word Groupings whereft Self Assimilating Words be
concordantly interlated across Ascendant Layers Of Seemingly Required Analysis, by instinct Subjective; let be also the General Prudence accounted for in which Words
Were Grouped.

11 Noun Picker 1/61th propensity for anyun generation.

 mirror, furnace, skeleton, biscuit, mountain, delusion, microcosm, jelly, ocean, truth, science, product, insect, tyranny, creature, theory, life, beast, hope, gland,
 convexity, concavity, doom, season, corrosion, passion, fate, vessel, pain, chemical, mandible, ray, spirit, feeling, radiance, dirt, vacuum, art, homunculus, engine,
 text, wheel, vent, lard, memory, apparel, domicile, behavior, government, sound, prison, being, sustenance, death, worm, stone, color, crystal, gastropod, flesh, fire.

 (tyranny, government): Gibby's Office.

 ([skeleton, creature, beast, homunculus]: Surreal,
  [insect, worm, gastropod]: Real, being
 ): Actor Or Being.

 microcosm: I reckon Hylics represents multisidedly Spanner, Real Systems, as per obviously; Dandy Biology, Chemics, Moon and Phases, Government.

 (fate, behavior, memory, text, ray): Our Inductive Acception is that no greater offsetting than a parvum to Pontificate Upon Freewill, is thus Commonplace Measure
  that Mnemonic Storage is an argument to Active Behavior, ifnaught ever Passively Instinctive within intricately stored, not far from an Ideology tat MOST Behavior
  is due to a Stimular Conjunction to a Synaptically Encoded Response, whether Consciously Or, as per quoth, Subconsciously; et otherwise Raw, Evolutionally Inscribed
  Reflexes. Becleft a certain compartment then is Internal Stimuli of One's Bodily Processes that could Recursively Affect Behavioral Sequence, as well as in itself.

  Text is comprised of complex choices upon any given Word that prepondarates from quoth Memorable Pool and is Largely Uncertain wholly. It is certainly predetermined
  by Historical and Actual Stimuli, but it is fundamentally random for the Variable that varies athwart the Space Of Possibly Wording For, Loosely, Equal Semanticity.

  Start witted but Infinitely Shifting, uponas the Waining Gibbous Cycle?... Fated by GOD is that Geometrical Ray suchon.

 ([life, sustenance, chemical, corrosion]: General Quintessentialness of Living Objects,
  [lard, mandible, flesh, gland]: Their Subjections
 ): Components And Characteristics of Biorganisms, Lively Responsive Receptors, Chemical Derivations.

 ([convexity, concavity]: Angular Limitatives,
  mountain: Cone Cultist
 ): Opposites and Mountain Is Convex, Cone Is Convex.

 ([crystal, stone, fire, jelly]: Different Physical Archetypes in their respective Configurations,
  [dirt, ocean]: Concrete Things,
  sound: Abstract Natural Process
 ): Miscellanous, General Naturophysical Phenomena.

 ([hope, passion, art, color]: Good,
  [doom, delusion, pain, death]: Bad,
   [feeling, spirit]: Aphysical State Of It
 ): Emotionally pervasive keywords or simply Hominid Intrinsic Concepts.

 (truth, science, theory): Science through a Formal Theorization asserts Truth.

 ([engine, wheel]: Twit and Twat make That, Machinative,
  [vent, furnace]: Productive Proclivity of Flagration and its Dispensityc
 ): Contraption Subintegers, Machine Like.

 (mirror, apparel): Sein Thyself whereasmuch thine Apparel; Sein Mirror whereasmuch thine Thyself.

 (biscuit: Concretizative Dyscrasia,
  [product, season, radiance]: Scope Disbanding Terms
 ): Whatev. ExDi xD.

20 Noun Picker 2 1/53rd.
 Proper Subset of Noun Picker 1 bar promise.

 mirror, furnace, skeleton, biscuit, mountain, delusion, microcosm, jelly, ocean, truth, science, product, insect, tyranny, creature, theory, life, beast, hope, gland,
 convexity, concavity, doom, season, corrosion, passion, fate, vessel, pain, chemical, mandible, ray, spirit, feeling, radiance, dirt, vacuum, art, homunculus, engine,
 text, promise, vent, lard, memory, apparel, domicile, behavior, government, sound, prison, being, sustenance.

21 Noun Picker 3 1/56th.
 Subset of Noun Picker 1 whencebut two Brain instances for the liklier, world, nerve, et luxury.

 mirror, furnace, skeleton, biscuit, mountain, delusion, microcosm, jelly, ocean, truth, science, product, insect, tyranny, creature, theory, life, beast, hope, gland,
 convexity, concavity, doom, season, corrosion, passion, fate, vessel, pain, chemical, mandible, ray, spirit, feeling, radiance, dirt, vacuum, art, homunculus, engine,
 text, luxury, vent, lard, memory, apparel, domicile, behavior, government, brain, prison, being, sustenance, world, brain, nerve.

 (brain, nerve, world): Nerves insgate Bitraslational Relayings where the Brain doeth to one if Movement, or Servicial Processes that Maintain and Proapt; and Exlineal
 Reality thorugh Stimulary Data Packets goeth to Brain fastingly sufficent but submissing when, enclosing High Complexity Data further processing is paralyzed, without the
 Effluvium in principium, except Primally Encoded Instincs of Survival.

 luxury: Surfeited Contents of Benefactor's Surplus.

22 Noun Picker 4 1/53rd.
 Subset of Noun Picker 3 naughtber temple and field restored within the selfrecting (Self, directing, same) structures. Translucing behold Noun Picker 2 anonber
 variating from promise to temple and field.

 mirror, furnace, skeleton, biscuit, mountain, delusion, microcosm, jelly, ocean, truth, science, product, insect, tyranny, creature, theory, life, beast, hope, gland,
 convexity, concavity, doom, season, corrosion, passion, fate, vessel, pain, chemical, mandible, ray, spirit, feeling, radiance, dirt, vacuum, art, homunculus, engine,
 text, temple, vent, lard, memory, apparel, domicile, behavior, government, field, prison, being, sustenance. 

79 Rhyme Picker 1/8th.

 moth, mammoth, clotch, sauce, broth, wroth, tooth, sloth.

 (moth, mammoth, sloth):

 (broth
14 Adjective Picker 62/122nd unfluking deposit, 60/122nd null.
 Hereat it it shines the ascented Platonic inclination to leave the most general Noun's Phormism to were, without the overmarked possibly of Singly Nothingness, it be
 less Ambiguously Agaped to the Canonic Interpretation or whichever else Connexxion it finds to it and Thereafter to Canon; tis about much the Triangle Of Transitivity.

 For as matter the fact, it is ostensible that a certain Lore through certain Textual Combination might exbajulate upon a Bonifate Stride whereof Goodness was thought
 of it to the Interpretative Feature in RNG fashion. Uponanent that the Semicertain Dislodge between Adjective And Self Null is quasiquevilaently disposed.

 mortal, shining, joyful, austere, melancholy, small, lordly, massive, effulgent, wandering, gentle, weaponized, sentimental, correct, motile, youthful, incomplete,
 haughty, furtive, vital, offending, pungent, shriveled, noisome, hallowed, flabby, zesty, mechanized, little, burning, fatal, elusive, merry, plastic, juicy,
 televised, sphere-like, modified, augmented, noble, pneumatic, hylic, psychic, bad, pupigerous, nodulous, cycloid, forbidden, lurid, fine, platinum, blue, monochrome,
 spreading, mutant, revolving, corporeal, hideous, mild, shrunken, concrete, abstract.

 ([hylic, corporeal, conrete]: Physicospatial Plane, Extravert Claymen,
  [psychic, abstract]: Pscyhospatial Plane, Intravert, Descorrespondent Dracula
 ): Sense Data desaformed into Consciousness from the Sensductive Plane Of Being.

 ([elusive, furtive]: Generic Generalities dignorate their Abstrakt Polymorphism; Hylics anteposed upon Idealyses Realized Through an Abnormally Equimetric
   Observance Of Natural Externalities,
  televised
 ): Gestures are propensed from a Televised Intellgigence upon Enemies; The Game is Just Elusively Subtle and Maniacally Theoretical.

 ([lurid, platinum, blue]: Concrete Coloration, monochrome: General Unicoloration): By which Existence is heedt Hylics renders ducenariously neolithical.

 ([wandering, pneumatic]: Adriftly Purposeless Nondeterminism; Abstraktly Compucluded Beings are ubiquitous in Hylics, Wayne Cat, Jumpers,
  sentimental: Its System of Music and Ponderative Concurrences throughout Maps enclove these Exactly...
 ): Pneumatophore, Purpolessly Wandering Wayne.

 (pupigerous, nodulous): Biological Shaenanigans; Fonthintrelpine Worm Shield.

 (mortal, weaponized, vital, fatal): Crystals are and its Afterlife are the Amotilation of a Posthumenous Save State Screen, a Pleasant Incongruity that Hylics makes
  for Monotonous Death diverially (Different and ere, different from past, instead).

 ([small, little, fine, shrunken]: Contramediatically Unspatious Matter, Parvophillia for Tyro,

  [gentle, mild, austere]: Peaceful Similisension (Similar Consistent Sensation), Hylics Phonemy,
 
  [shriveled, flabby, melancholy]: Overmarkedly Mallevolic Weakness, Dissolution's Dissolute Status
 ): Subscalar Microcosms.

 (youthful, incomplete): Postconsumated Reality with Protoessence of a Chemical Automaton, Wayne Larva.

 ([correct, hallowed, noble]: Goodys, [bad, offending, forbidden, hideous]: Baddies): Moral and Amoral Orthogon, Opposites.

 ([shining, effulgent]: Photonic Grapeshot Lightyear,

  [lordly, haughty]: Boasting Boat,

  [{joyful, zesty, merry, juicy}: Fluvial Livelihood, Cavalier Viewaxian, {pungent, burning, noisome}: Texturizedly Nocuous, Gizzard Spume, {massive, augmented}:
   Abstract Representation Of Nonconformist Extremity]
 ): Conformist ver Nonconformist Continuum.
 
 ([sphere-like, cycloid]: Self Referencial Circularity, Infinite Recycling Of Life,
  [plastic: Material - Like Clay, modified, spreading, mutant, revolving]: Changingly Decidious Evolution
 ): Wayne acts For the same, Killing, and Upon same Statutor (creator, inflictor of any state), Gibby, with Both Games.

15 Adjective Picker 2 70/122nd, 52/122nd null.
 Neodivisioned Superset of Former Function, ber much less likely Null Giving; porcelein, glum, petty, clean, mutable, leather, scaly, spongy, tendrillar, refulgent.

 mortal, shining, joyful, austere, melancholy, small, lordly, massive, effulgent, wandering, gentle, weaponized, sentimental, correct, motile, youthful, incomplete,
 haughty, furtive, vital, offending, pungent, shriveled, noisome, hallowed, flabby, zesty, mechanized, little, burning, fatal, elusive, merry, plastic, juicy,
 televised, sphere-like, modified, augmented, noble, pneumatic, hylic, psychic, bad, pupigerous, nodulous, cycloid, forbidden, lurid, fine, porcelein, platinum, blue,
 monochrome, spreading, mutant, revolving, corporeal, hideous, mild, shrunken, glum, petty, clean, mutable, leather, scaly, spongy, tendrillar, refulgent.

 ([leather, scaly, spongy, porcelein, mutable]: Tocosensional Textures are transmuted through Gloves, Hylics' Pleather, tendrillar): Physicoceptionns.

 refulgent: Light Overkiller,

 (petty, clean): Unvirtuous vs Virtuous.

16 Sure Adjective Picker 1/63th, Beneveridious Advancement Of Semanticism Than Null and a Combined Retraction Of Possibilites Thereextended.
 Proper Subset Of Adjective Picker past: refulgent, larger, liquid.

 mortal, shining, joyful, austere, melancholy, small, lordly, massive, effulgent, wandering, gentle, weaponized, sentimental, correct, motile, youthful, incomplete,
 haughty, furtive, vital, offending, pungent, shriveled, noisome, hallowed, flabby, zesty, mechanized, little, burning, fatal, elusive, merry, plastic, juicy,
 televised, sphere-like, modified, augmented, noble, pneumatic, hylic, psychic, bad, pupigerous, nodulous, cycloid, forbidden, lurid, fine, platinum, blue, monochrome,
 spreading, mutant, revolving, corporeal, hideous, mild, shrunken, refulgent, larger, liquid.

38 Extra Adj Picker stipulates 62/122+1/122 uponto the Tangible occident of Random Reality or a ducely self image 62/122*62/122; Preexistent null would be then 60/122
+60/122, 60/122*60/122. Havethen seconjuncted predilection of Either Word Or Naught.

35 Sure Adverb Picker 1/28th, Ictuatingly Adject to Adjective.
 
 thinly, strongly, invisibly, slowly, woozily, grimly, greatly, mostly, partially, totally, blatantly, pleasantly, luxuriously, expansively, utterly, rapidly, crudely,
 mercifully, delicately, wrongfully, arrogantly, horribly, wonderfully, ostensibly, remarkably, miracously, accidentally, totally (Second's).

 ([thinly, greatly, blatantly, expansively, utterly]: Pluss Less Ideals, [slowly, woozily, rapidly, delicately]: Inforced Manner with Nature,
  (grimly, crudely): Forceful
 )

 (mostly, partially, totally, totally): Partiality Adverbs,

 ([ {plesantly, luxuriously, wonderfully}, mercifully]: Fair, [ {wrongfully, horribly}, arrogantly]: Unfair)

 (ostensibly, accidentally, miracously, remarkably): Belief and Unbelief.

28 Adverb Picker 25/40eth Ideocubit (Cubit of thought) offbout 15/40eth Nolght.
 
 Proper Subset of Sure Adverb Picker cessect Noull.

13 V Picker, Verb Picker, 1/59th chaunce of any.

 indulge, lament, caress, exalt, destroy, avenge, batter, stretch, deceive, shun, manifest, witness, actualize, embrace, levitate, pardon, sniff, banish, falsify, pilot,
 hark, consider, render, forget, remember, approach, castigate, liquify, debase, sing, hydrate, chill, rescue, hoist, extrude, desire, impede, thrum, suffer, texturize,
 bungle, dance, beat, bleed, soak, work, calm, tether, blast, digest, smear, rock, roll, sustain, gather, exhume, rehydrate, prepare, purify.

 ([lament, suffer]: Intransitive,
  [destroy, debase, blast, beat, batter]: Transitive, more Activo Aggressive,
  [avenge, deceive]: More Complex Notions,
  [shun, castigate]: Less Aggro
 ): Ungood, Hostile Pain. Subjectively Amoral but naught Idyllic soely; Suffer and Make Suffer.

 ([witness, hark]: Aquirious Action rather, Depatched Thought thenfrom.
  [embrace, consider, digest, gather, sniff]: Furthermore Aggresion lined to Stimulus.
 ): Process Stimulus, Percept. Inward Expression.

 ([bleed, exhume, extrude]: Unspecified Secretion,
  [actualize, sing, manifest, smear]: Conscious Extroversion,
 ): Outward Expression, Reponsibility To Stimulus.

 (forget, remember): Opposites.

 ([bungle, work, hoist]: Antidal Action in respect to Will whereabout other Will, bethought as Veritably Painful Cofound.
  prepare: Beraech a State by Distance Distributing Force.
 ): Carry out a Subroutine.

 ([liquify, soak]: Act eft which Physicality is befell with Watta,
  [hydrate, rehydrate]: Prime
 ): Hydroxgenized Material Configuration, Watta.

 ([indulge, desire]: Hedonious,
  [levitate, exalt, stretch]: Minecraft Sulker Shulker; Raise and Increase.
  [dance, rock, roll]: Dance, Rock N'n Roll.
 ): Gratifyingly Elevated SOB, State Of Being.

 ([calm, caress]: Transitive
  [chill, thrum]: Intransitive
 ): Peaceful Hypofrequent SOB, Pruned Exstasis.

 (pilot, render, texturize, purify): Autexousious, Transitive Verbalizing, of Self Agency.

 (sustain, impede): Thrive Or Make Unthriving.

 (approach, tether): Link to Another.

 (banish, falsify): Negate Truth, that is Subjected QED.

 (pardon, rescue): Terminate Insufferability.

26 V Picker 2 1/10th.
 yearns for, is like a (preposition), appears as the, reveals the, extracts the, is a.

 (yearns for, extracts the): Yarn Yharnam and Exdi.

 (is like a,
  [appears as the, is a]: Deceit ver Accurate Reality
 ): Identificative, Identificatious; Identity of Identity.

29 V Picker 3 1/42nd.
 V Picker 2 Proper Superset of this first Without Mow: Decrement or Impede.

 indulge, lament, caress, exalt, destroy, avenge, batter, stretch, deceive, shun, manifest, witness, actualize, embrace, levitate, pardon, sniff, banish, falsify, pilot,
 hark, consider, render, forget, remember, approach, castigate, liquify, mow, sing, hydrate, chill, rescue, hoist, extrude, desire, impede, thrum, suffer, texturize,
 bungle, dance.

27 Prefix Picker 21/100th constructured, 79 probawarding Nully.

 omega-, ultra-, anti-, half-, ur-, mini-, proto-, trans-, hyper-, multi-, cryo-, post-, omni-, geo-, multi- (Twice Anovelized), demi-, mal-, semi-, non-, pseudo-,
 xeno-, (null "")

 ([ur-, proto-, xeno-]: Chronomalous Innovation Of Irrepetition, [post-, cryo-]: Unirrigated with Nobelty Naughtber Afterwardness): Newgated and Revitalized Countment.
  What Wasn't When Its Knowledge is Astrung,

 ([omega-, ultra-, hyper-, omni-, mini-: Or Its Noctorn (negation)]: Archirarchicaly Celerenized Paranormality,

  [trans-, multi-]: Surilibel Adassentia (ad is for/pro, superbeing),
 ): Gibby Tyrarch magnminsizing (minmaxxing) of the Omnipotencial anacension seinwith the Terrestrial Juices,

 (anti-, non-, mal-): Forcible Apotency Of Gibby, Antagonarch,

 (half-: Underivedly (inabstrakt) Equidistant, [demi-, semi-, pseudo-]: Abstraker Caprigh (Caprizant, Nigh, Uneven Being)): Partial Quantification Of Issing,

 geo: Earthern Bound Physicality Of Space.

31 Preposition Picker 1/14th.
 above, below, amidst, near, far beyond, inside, thanks to, out of, despite, astride, in, beside, of, with.

 ([above, below, beyond, far beyond, amidst, beside, astride]: Relative Directional Displacement,
  near: General, Extreme Displacement.
 ): Opposites and anent the Spatial Relation that is Preposition.

 (thanks to, despite): They commence on an Input if they are Functions of, Veridity with Former ber Invert Latter; Thanks gives an Identical acknowledgent of Truity,
 morally, upon where opposing ingets the Expected Truth to Actualize Flouting whereplaceof. Aevery twice Contextual Cue must be Functionally Levelt for the Truth of
 them, what Prebounds and Ensues. Despite is Functionally Complexer because within it is Expected True twice the Argumentation whencefrom it is tribulated nextly.

 (of, with): Of instilss that Property as a Possesive Descriptor; With when Deus Arguments combines them - Of is Coerce Possesion while With is Unitary Conmutuality.

 (inside, out of, in): Oppositely, in regards to Material if it valid that Caparates Another.

32 Preposition Picker 2 1/12th.
 Proper Subset of Preposition Picker. Moretun (A ton more) assured among the expounded states.

 above, below amidst, near, far beyond, inside, outside, out of, despite, astride, in, beside

64 Place Namer 1 1/39th and Cleptomany Of Geotraction.

 Ether, Gawr, Shub, Jabs, Halc, Duurg, Mortuu, Tral, Dedu, Yekh, Cath, Rylj, Pren, Qer, Snat, Oun, Ban, Grule, Pozew, Ozul, Mu, Rel, Vus, Hoc, Garm, Morn, Tyi, Bieg,
 Menth, Ish, Yii, Mang, Pong, Druss, Voze, Ela, Tor, Caied

 Ether: Dei's Propagation (Sky) inthralled by tis Heavenly Element, aprovedly imputed allupon,

 Gawr: Effulgent Lion's Libel Of Oppresion, as empathetically isoglossed by Self Logicitation (Logos, cite, decir); Or Welsh Magnimisence (Giant),

 Shub: Unassumpting Absuction by Waterbib, in Somali; To Pour,

 Jabs: Adamant Whim In Adpointing,

 (Halc, Tral, Yekh, Rylj, Grule, Oun, Ozul, Menth, Druss, Caied): Meaningless or noxiously Oscure,

 Duurg: Temporal Offset in Dutch,

 Mortuu: Vitolysis of Unselft Monosections of Latinx, Mortuary,

 Dedu: Smuln, Dunde,

 Cath: Volitional Game Of Battle within Irish. About From and Down is Latin junctmeter (Same measure) Cat or Cata,
 
 Pren: Catarboric Wood, or its Adjective,
 
 Qer: Devotion of Borrowings in Northern Kurdish,

 Snat: Preconceived Honesty from Volapuk,

 Ban: Contraductive (Contraproductive) Malignity, or Accursement, from English,

 Pozew: Gaming Event Of Lawsuit from Polish,

 Mu: Transligual Occupation Of Letter M In Latinx. Conversely Dormant Nothingness in Japanese,

 Rel: Rebellious Dianmity (Dia betweeen, enmity) in Dutch,

 Vus: Seen in French,

 Hoc: Tis, hither Processual Indications wherewith a Subject Of Cathalogue is prufsed upon; from Latin,

 Garm: Quadrupedial Transduction (Generalization) of Helkeep, Nordic Nose's Coinage,

 Morn: Urffulgence (First, effulgence) of Neosolarises,

 Tyi: Tyro in the Office Of Exsomatrism (Size, ex, somatic, metric, bigger than average),

 Bieg: A Corrication (Corridor, action, run),
 
 Ish: Yielding Subfinity Of Being and Essence, Partial from English,

 Yii: Tis Pronominal Objectation (Give object) in Yuroba,

 Mang: Economized Bartering or Peddling from Old Norse,

 Pong: Prestorial Computer Game, English,

 Voze: They Drive in Croatian,

 Ela: Concave Sex, Femine, Portuguese,

 Tor: Norse Deity of Heavenshots, or Hylic Spires in English.

65 Place Namer 2 10/25 Add Place Namer 1, 15/25 Nully.

 zin, loon, mul, gar, fil, ble, har, apelu, elil, gra.

 loon: Individual with valence of tithe or Rogue,

 (mul: Plurality, gra: Extremified Procilivity): Intensities,

 (zin, gar, fil, ble, hare, apelu, elil): Whatever tis discombabulous, Ambiguous.

66 Place Namer 3 1/30th a Word, Addet Place Namer 2 coupling.

 lur, lian, eao, imith, smuln, vuzh, inex, maph, or, eeth, lrmath, enurpon, clarnaikh, bor, roog, frit, beelek, poyley, theni, footh, ire, urei, sheth, spux, wath,
 blaec, yuly, pothex, eltein, orma

 Randobabulation.

17 Singular Pronoun Picker 1/4th.
 Superset of Pronoun Picker with: someone.

23 Pos Pronoun Picker 1, 1/6th; Possesion to the Version of Imparter.

 hers, his, yours, theirs, ours, its.

 ([{hers, his}: Singular, theirs: Plural]: Third person, yours: Singular): Asbout Enlived Humans,

 its: Acted Upon on stead of Acting Upon thereboutta.

30 Pos Pronoun Picker 2, 1/6h. Selfnaming Arity but Singularized and postpoised of My, naught Its.

 her, his, your, their, our, my.

34 Pronoun Picker 1/3rd.

 (he, she, it): Teriechelon of Predicated Objects about their Livelihood, abstraktly agenred, to Livelessness.

33 Question Picker, Benalysis of the Self professed inwith a Lingugraph: the Interrogating Pronoun.
 
 who, what.

 what: Is,
 
 who: Made.

36 sort of like 3/10th Significant Iteration obarmating Unsignificant Null of 7/10th. Dissented tautly.

 sort of, like,, kind of.

 Medioxumate Adverbs.

37 Sure sort of like 4/10th anothers positive substance and 6/10th (like).

 sort of like, like, kind of like, sort of almost, like.

 (sort of like, sort of almost): Diablo Zod's Sort,

 (kind of like, like): Super Smash Bros Ike's Like.

12 Determiner Picker 1/14th. Diaproximating (dia between, proximate acercate) Objects to their Gestors.

 my, his, her, its, your, our, their, the, thy, this, that, thine, another, a.

 (my, its, our, their, [his, her], [your, {thy, thine}: Determiner your and Pronoun yours]): Possesive Occupations,

 (the, a): Articles,

 (this, that): Demonstratives

 another.

19 willdothmaycan 1/4th, Chief's abruption of the State.

 doth, may, can, will.

 (doth, will): To Do,

 (may, can): Advertance of Unlinearity.

18 Coord Conjunction Picker 1/6th.
 
 or, so, and, but, for, yet

 (but, yet): Vicarious (Looking one through the other) Essention.

25 Conjunction Picker 2, 1/3rd.

 but, through, yet..

 (but, yet): Forthtwixt againne.

24 Punctuation Picker 8/10th Dot otraput (Put against) 2/10th of ! or doubly !!.

60 Vocal Sound 1/8th of Aunomenon (Audio, phenomenon), defined of tha Phonoennumeration.

 Vocal1: CAB CBA BA; paPAPa, paRaPA paPa,

 Vocal2: BA CBAAAB C AB AA AB AA C CC; paRa paraPaPaPapaPa - para Papa - Papa,

 Vocal3: A BBA AA A BCBCBC; Pa - paraPa - PaPa - PA - paraparapara,

 Vocal4: ACBAC CBAAB; paraPaPApa paraPaPApa,

 Vocal5: BC AB ABAB; Para PApa PapaPapa,

 Vocal6: Para PAPAPA paPa; AB AAA BA,

 Vocal7: Para PapapaPa PAparaRa; BA ABBA ABBA,

 Vocal8: PapaPapa raraPapa; ABAB CCAB.

~NPC RNG Dialogue, all NPC Dialogue.
By ay, may it be prexumed that ifnot omenaged to their Prescribed State non of these Texts will be emanated, when it is an RNG Sentence Archetype then; too when the
NPC's Occurence that in its entirety RNG is.

Dracula, Intro Island, and at Start Of Game:
 A (aj) (n) (av) (v)s (n)s.
 The people (v) (pre) a (n)(pu)

 It is a (n) (pre) a (aj) (n)(pu)
 It is (sortOfLike) a (n)...

 (pre) (n).

 Meanwhile, Gibby, (px)king of the moon,
 (sortOfLike) (v)s a (n)
 (pre) the (aj) (n)-(n)(pu)

 Thus your story begins.

Clayman, Wayne House Northeast Corner, Evry Second Time After The First:
 To the northeast is the (aj) city of (placeMorpheme)(placeMorpheme)(placeMorpheme)
 May its (n) endure 1000 years!

Clayman, City in Entrance, Evry 4th Time After 3rd:
 Her eyes the glow-worm lend thee,
 The shooting stars attend thee;
 And the elves also,

 Whose little eyes glow
 Like the sparks of fire, befriend thee. 

Clayman, City Insect Grower, Evry 4th Time After 1st:
 Welcome to (n)!

 I grow the insects.

Clayman, City before Upstairs to Cone Mountain, Evry Second Time After The First:
 Ahead lies mount (n).

 Beware of its wicked cone cultists!

Accountrement Vendor, City Second Level Left Stairs:
 Have you heard about our bleak cellophane?

Accountrement Vendor, City Second Level Left Stairs, interacted not in Front of Counter:
 Please speak at me over the counter...

Microwave Vendor, City Second Level:
 Frozen burritos can be effective projectiles.
 Feel safe when you walk outside!

Clayman, Center Upstairs Before Right to Mount:
 The cult permits nothing to leave (n)...
 in this way they hope to promote a reverse erosion.

Weapon Vendor, City Second Level Right Stairs, Vendor:
 Need an instrument for stabbing or bludgeoning?

 If so, you've come to the right place!

Weapon Vendor, City Second Level Right Stairs, interacted Not in Front of Counter:
 Speak to me over the counter.
 It is our way.

Bath Vendor, City Second Level:
 If you want to use the tub
 it's gonna be 25 bucks.

Bath Vendor, City Second Level, No to Bath:
 You stink.

Clayman, City Third Level Fore Armor Vendor, Evry 2nd Time After 1st:
 Meat can be used to increase your maximum
 flesh points... but only at a certain machine.
 You look like you'll probably find it soon.

Clayman, City Third Level Left of Crystal:
 You can learn special abilities from
 the televisions which are scattered
 throughout this realm.

Armor Vendor, City Third Level, Right Stairs:
 My armors will raise your maximum flesh points.
 Some have additional bonuses.
 Behold their magnificence.

Armor Vendor, City Third Level, interacted not in Front Of Counter:
 Uhhh please go around to the front of the counter. Please...

Clayman, City Third Level Right Stairs Fore Armor Vendor, Evry 2nd time After 1st:
 When fighting a Fleshtache, you must attack, then rest, and then guard. Lest you suffer the creature's riposte.

Clayman, City Third Level Left Stairs Fore Microwave Vendor, Evry 2nd time After 1st:
 The knight Pongorma is said to be immune
 to the deadly touch of ambulant skulls.

 He resides on an island to the west, behind
 a sealed door...

Sage of Brains, Brain Dream, 1st Time:
 I am the Sage of Brains.

 I grant you my token.

 Seek my siblings, the Sage of Computers and
 the sage of death. They will also give you tokens.
 For therein lies the path to enlightenment...

Sage of Brains, Brain Dream, Evry Time After 1st:
 This is the life.

Fish, Afterlife Beach, Evry 1st Time After 2nd:
 ~gasp~

 you can build sandcastles on the beach!
 try using spacebar...
 ~gasp~

Clayman, Afterlife Cave, 1st Time:
 I think I can hear a TV set behind this wall...

 If i had Dynamite I could break through!

Clayman, Afterlife Cave, 1st Time Have Dynamite:
 Whoa. I'll let you check it out first...

Clayman, Afterlife Cave, Evry After 1st:
 Thanks again for the explosives.

Couch, Afterlife, 3/4th chance:
 Amid the lilies floats the moth,
 The mole along his galleries goeth
 In the dark earth.

Couch, Afterlife, 1/4th chance:
 Amid the (n)s (v)s the
Sign, Computer Room 1st Yellow Sign:
 Do not touch the Ambulant Skulls!
          Or you will die.

Sign, Computer Room 2nd:
 To initiate warp, make contact with the central node.
 Unauthorized access is discouraged!
 Thank you for understanding.

Sign, Computer Room 3rd:
 The Warp Access is currently infested.
 The creatures fear the dotted red line and will not cross it.
 Enjoy your time in the Warp Access.
~

~NPC Vendors, Economical Actors preincumbent to a Game System of Earning and Peddling; a Formal Economy whatsoever.

City Accountrement, Left Corner: Turbo Tendons belodges Synchronous Wielding, by which Damage Per Turn, DPT, is excelled upon; Bad Juju whenceby Limit about Perception,
1/5, of Resistance Op Ambirinth (ambi, labyrinth, Indeterministic Probabilities) itwuld (when) Enemy Hit; Bleak Cellophane that waddles (wander, befuddle) imperviously
against Yolts of Blindness Status (Seasonally occuring lamellar structure...)

City Resource, Left Corner ashad the Microwave: Juice Box a 75th Restful Sensation that rempowers Will; Frozen Burrito a 40th Health about Absence hurl, et 1/10th
Universal about Commandment Stun Chance; Dynamite is impelled onward the Enemy Party with Juice Box's Metric and Panorama's Stochasy to Stun.

City Weapon, Right Corner: perplexing Bat at which clobber's a Dermal Jinx for Plus 7th's Health damage; Dirk derides for 12th's Apostle and Flesh 30th's Peaceful
Dexistence.

City Bath, Right Corner abest (right to) Spikes: Vertiably Osmotic consolation of the Nonasomasis with, to the Reinstation Locus.

City Armor, Third Level Right Gate: Torso Shell maxodulates (Max, modulate) Death Resistance upunto 12; Combat Bell gains in 60th's Perfect Absence but tapers about its
Able Negligence to wear anything else. Berry Shield high cost for high HP ingress, 3000nd for 200th; Chrome Bowler hast 1/10th's Universal about Commandment Chauncy
Chusing to proc blind.
~

~Aleatory Statistics, utterwhole Count of Everything within the Game System.
Bugs,
 City: 5
 Brain Dream: 1
 Afterlife:
  Beach - 1
  Cave - 3

Enemies,
 Ancient Ruins:
  Cone Cultists; 19
  Fleshtache; 1
  20

Money,
 Ancient Ruins: 50(4) + 86 + 103 = 389

Crystals, 16

Drop rates

Animation Princilmata:
 Couch, Afterlife: 2s
~
~
~
~

Simulation depicts a thicker general planescape of its Objective Behaviors, whereon Emulation inexorably implies a tergiversation of the Underlying System through
which such Behavior would be preserved. Nevertheless, both make bloom upon a Differnece Of Circumstance op their Behavior's Inception. Scientific Induction is used,
Naturally, to derive the Rulings that such System would prescribe around if said System is Physically Walking, for Futurely Prediction thereby.

A conondrum for the Space Complexity atarps instances of ambivalence in a recreated enviroment that FEELS Ndimensional but IS Ndimensional. The criteria for, ludum
dare, inchoate Dungeon Crawlers as 3d but 2d or alternation's do not recreate such from Careful Headbutting: else the tangible discourse that said FEELING is a twinness
heath meanignheath meanignwith our Perception Of Physical Space as we interact with it; upon myne. For that reason, any Computograph or Medium on that matter can avail an Image Of A
Xenodimension; by the utilization of Colour and specifying Structure, ALL Possible Sensory Input could be beexperimented.

~Linguology, Linguistics - about Language Structure and, Semantics Through Platonic Inheritance!
This is used to reference an object of attention that presents within one's physique's hail, or an idea considered apast through the audible interlocutor, by symbol/visibility
or sound, through this effective abstraction thereafter. 

This is used to reference an object of attention physically or abstractly, upon the unreported receptor cast by empathetically heralding that physicality affective to an
incenting ambiguity with distance, the computation of the receptor herself, or through sound and/or symbol for the abstract, or temporal closehood. That is for this but
the latter, That, is delegated to consideration upon a tentive object over the yonder, or that hasn't been physically considered, or an idea that is thought to be
forthput by a second, separate entity. These are but a puzzlety of what the shuffled process resides upon of the Artigrapher's Self Blateration, and those that are
plural; for any Semantic Unit In Natural Language Has A Paraphernelia should the Writer for General Enlightment enucleate more Sense Strata for the Purest, Generallest
Qualia: Demonstrative About Determiner, d/d, Demonstrative Determiner <_ (proper subet) Determiner.

Secondly, it suits to label Exclusionary Degree Of Platonicism whereto an Object Noun encompasses, upon Abstraktogeneral Balance: Articles doeth fest The linked
Abstractly ber A or An Generally insosame as its Infrastructural Roots, issuing, an Artful Piece - for tis gradation adjured.

Thricingly, if it wilt the Superset Seclusion operating a Noun's Quantitative Nature has it, Abstractly: all inext (existing inside) the Relatable Universe Of Discourse
of that Noun Type is Quantified frough (from and through) Many, Several, Few. Cleft Quantitative About Determiner. Opposidedly, ergo more Generally webbing therequoth
onto an Indirect Plural  Acknowledgement ber wherein All Things Inwith Spectrum Perception are Distributed a State: All, Every, Each; proceeds Distributive About
The Determiner of more General Ilk.

Encore for the domation of a certain State Instance over a Noun's Scope, within an Interrogative Oath, Integorrative About Determiner naturally bids for a Predication
upon a Subject's, on which it also propounds the singular eftbearing: Whose, What, Which?

On the affair of Potesty about a Discoursed Object, the Pretender upon which it effects is either ascertaint or Metatextually Subsumed within the Enviroment - for be
a salient bussines with Self Identity, Liability, and Comparative Economy; My, Your, Yours, His, Her, Our, Their, Its, Whose.

This therefore acconuts the Qualities by which Determiners are concluded with, of upon Its Proxmized Noun: degranden or granden as to the Plurality Of Noun in specific,
its Scope Of Abstraction, Spatiotemporal distance between Subject And Actor's Tenting and Permissive Ownership.

Pronouns are Symbollical Antropomorphisms of Human Classes or, Devoid Material, that metatastically Hold Place For A Prethught Object of such natura; if its an Animic
Actor or a Physical Sprite.

Phrased utterances have for those that intween them Combine a Type of Lexical Particle anon, Subordinating Conjunction, where one Predication Or Clause Hinges On The
Other from their Conditionologus Systemacy: Because, If, Since; henceway One Subordinates Another. Wherenow, a Coordination that is simply to Permute Altogether
Independent Ideas thru: And, But, Or. Such is the methodoly of Conjunction, Memetic Entrelacement.

Set apart when the Relation Is Not of Itself the Phronistery apprehends a Prepositional Nexx, taht in Noun to other Interlocated Objects resides tithermongst
Spatiotemporally; asin the Prenominal Functives of Demonstrative Determiners loosely. Since, At, Under, On, In, To. Tis deploys beforeely the Relation thus,
Prepositionally To Noun.

All Nouns in Memorandum Patronus can, if consider, transform to Adjeticve that peeks Object coincidentally then, and naturally, Verbs and viceversa crossmutating; that
a Root of a Word is measured across all its instantiations through which such why a process happens innegably. An Object that is discretely perviewt has a State that
can be Abstracted and Applied to Others ad hoc, Verbally and Adjectively upon the Convention Of Grammar that of any Word Particle, it is naturally in itself broken
for the Learnt Writer, as Mine Person. A Banner that I wilt sheerly try ever Against Conformity.

Ent intussively, the set of aknownst Discrete Nouns, Substative Adjective, Transitive Verbs is reigned by these anciently General Assortment Of Intrinsically Semantic
Roots, to the Engager's Quotidianity, by which subsequently the Multiplicity between all of them are within such Framework is Equal; I posit if the Incumbent Writer
has leastly appropriated his Competence ifsoever as much in computing Intrasensical Mapping In Literature.

language changes how we think, and structure of thought. language enables aphysical/abstract thought?

Lingugraph Learned Actors are much more sparing on extruding Semansis between a State Of Expression from Knowing, and the more General from Dexterizing of Real Mirage
to the Ideals of Caligraphy does any Expression become More Ambiguous; anymore as it is Distracted from the Sensational Perception of Reality, the Langauge becomes
more Abstrakt thus reducing Complexity in Resources of Memory and Time. Words achieving Ambiguity form the Complex Natural Language, thereby, Abstrakt Thought of
Qualia is Advanced and thus the Human Is Made Wiser. Each Language eversomuch is a Polyhedron but of Finite Recursion for a Society, per an anagregate, an
Structuraztion ordinanced about its Grammar to a Finity of Words per anyun; thus, each Language provides Aun Structurization of Metaconsciousnes.

From these Confidences and their anchor upon of Behavioral Interactions, that the More Loving A Socialization, between Local Socializers, the More Love They Will
Receive Subjectively between, of Love. Deeper Equators of Love herethen, of anyall Social Concentric Addressing, shall be exnoted about the Relational Dependences Of
Love, classically contupling par twixt those peoples:

 Imperative: Least scored within the Lovingly Spectrum such that fain not the Subordinate to it even close naught to the Candid Asking Instead; doodad that, do this
 is Rewarded unhandsomely upon Agreement even by the sheer Conditioning to it, and the Reverence would voidly rectorate Love if not for a Wiser Knowledge of Bad
 Outcome that the Subordinate is not self pudent in his Behavior. Videlicet, it will on the Myriad of Scenes be a Bleak Command and a, sheerly, Interestd Love from
 the Subordinate Will, Unidirectionally ifsoever. But Misery of Punishment some of Relationships could truncate if the Imperative not the Interrogative is displayed,
 bershall not be Punished and Love is Left More Room, Minimizing Punitive Contrivances.

 Informative: Tis insertion not of the Self and Wants is but bout Wordly Inception, that meagerly a cirmcustance of Informant is affidavit to Grooves of Love least, 
 not considered to the Self Identity and Direct Attractions. Its presence of an Interrogative is in regularly and is mostly followed to Deepen Lovely Confidence and
 Affinity, Recursively as is, Social Treatise, by Humane Flair. The Empathetic Bond is upon Agreement of Mental State Brewed Stronger, eft Interrogative or Recursion
 Itself, and Identities Limit the Sanctimonious Unity gradually.

 Interrogative: Renouncing aloft, tis preponderance of a Platonic Acquaintance, prequel; is upon an Beloved Further Interest for the ultimate purpose to Inpsect
 Identites and Bond accordingly to their Likelihoods upon Feedback, a More Self Ilked a More Love. Otheriwsely not if the Concentration is not Personal but on an
 External Gain to the Answer in Question, as all other Loving Equators then. First Stage of Platonic Society but, clearly, all things deemed can be slicingly motivated
 whether significantly by Carnal Love.

 Reciprocal: Conspicuous Deliberations of Kindness when domiciled are, upon this Expectant Type, too procured again if not intrisically to the Responsive Recompensation.
 This Socialized Type of Feedback Loop is generally the Most Powerfully and Rapidly Escalating Instruction by Which Platonic Love is Escalated, for anyun has to abrupt,
 Lopp the Loop that is unwated if the Responsive Party had not to that Punishment, which this would in Per Se BE Punishment, for the Normal Societor.

 Jocular: Of what I, as my Love Idiom, delge Beloved with because of myself likened to the Joculation reinforcing itself through Socialization; the most Visceral
 Reciprocity to experiment and that Joins the Society's Preferences Strongly. A Human Trait of Instant Gratification as good as Fornication, whenver Truly of course
 and not onely Cohibitive of Punishment, of course. A Jocular's Originality is Subjective to the Inductive Wisdom of the Joker, thus implicating a Wisdom's Essivision
 upon Incorrespondence for that apruned Unit Of Pondentness, of Ennexioning Understandment; if otherwardly a Negative Impertinence is Subconsciously Cultivated from
 Infancy to that Jocular's Infrapathy, like Sexual Laughter.

 Tis of Xenomous Absurdism is a Subsistence, that deeft One's Socionormality, off Social Precept, a Perception that is Painful, Ungood, Daft, Unvirtuous canalizes an
 Affiancing of the Unknown Nor Fear; essividing between a Physcical or Awkardness of Pain that is an actuation of Love wherenot a Rebelling in Pain that is of course
 Demoniously Satanical. Hencethen it'd a Paradoxical Hencethrugh to distend Laughter Acrhimoniously Or Scrupulously.

 Jocular Language is vertebrally Satire upon which all Laughter is, instead of Frustation, adverted Happily. Thither's the Human at an Inhibition is Dreadedful, of
 its Pain, and Naturally seeks to abland that Pain whether Sociomorally by Adapting It To Himself Noneless; the Jungian Shadow of Society is, thereof spaking of its
 Culture that decreetes the Satire wherefrom its Stigmas and Taboos are Sprung.

 Diadaptive: When One's Subarchs, or One As Them onto, Lovely Descript as Pantomimickal to their Ovrarch it is God's Quality of Love between his Disciples,
 Sanctificated and Purest Like a Boy. A Boy Loves his Father Most When Imitating him. Upon a Fairer of One's Identity Superiorly, Greater Virtue however much and/or
 any attests a Theist Siphon of Love then, Subconsciously, and if not defiled by its Opposite Envy which is Subtractive and Saturnine; it is the Love Between A Father
 and Child, between Us and God; We Strive to Unity with our Godly Idol, that is the atmost Earnest Device of One.

 Cacodei and Benidei can be Deductioned to be a Discentromoral Mantle Volumetrized by the Sociocolletion. Humans Love Deitic Authorarchs for one's Virtuous
 Insufficiency and Vices, that one should Fancy a Superior Identity, One's Perfective Image, through an Anthropomorphic Personification of God; because Humans are
 Innately Biased to be That Good Which They Are Not, Wish It, to Unity With YAHWEH, Imitate Him, and addcreasingly be Praised in the Sociotheist Hierarchy (of Gods).
 Thus are we Lesser Gods, Demigods, Images of HIM.

Adjudicated this Characterization of Abstrakt Unity denominated a Brotherhood, now the Carnal Pleasure begets its Marital Union: for Marriage is but the Combination
of Abstraktness (Aphysical) and Flesh, a Generalization to the Sexxing Language. Sexuality dwells in the Tactiception of Brotherhood if the Touch is not a sign of
Inceptive Sex and flourisng the Inceptive Sensitivty (Phallus and Pudenda), otherwise a Connubiality. However, this can trace to an Angst of Vice Adulteriously for
YAHWEH wants HIS IMAGE superposed of Soul and Carn Not One Without the Other for a Whole, like Us to HIM, should Marriage be Piously Consumated.

~Prorogare.
Reading for the amusement is, gaining solely familiriaty with the language's expression, waste of time?

Ideas are more concise in formal languages.

Ideate my own compressed writing for expressing meaning with least amount of symbols. Map words to custom and
custom to words
~
~

A Programatic System, as Gamic, can be Computationally Incorrect because it Pretensioned was not, whether it Exceptionally Errs Or through a Procession Of Input an
Unintended State can be isolated from within the Game's Mekanicks, that its Symbolic Transductors amandated from Necessary Shortsightness. Bug Versus Glitch, et latter
trends to Advance Gameplay Speed.

~Fallout, RPG Sandbox Megacompendium; Father with fore unconcern tendrilated me to its grisp.

Communicating without hoveration Deacon from Spanish, Offawith EXDI.

~Humanism, Consciousness, Epistemology, Psychology, Morality, and Behavior- Treatise of Periconditional, Self Causing Beings as Our Stimuloactive Recursion in our
Becoming The Local. Universe It Becomes; Us.

Properly, one is to model the Formal Basis Of Behavior, Subconsciously: First Stimuli and Thoughts are Unitarily connected wherethen a Connexxion Nexxes to Another
and then the One, Tringulatively, and tis is Subconsciously Chusen From Perception to Perception; Secondthly, Responses that Change The Internal Bodily State are
Aliteral and when most Abstract, Amotive - That end's pry Abstrakt Analysis. Literal Processes take part in Active Behavior Upon the External World might which are
always caused by Emotive Aliteral Annexions, either Punishing or Recompesating. That is, Evryall Connexxions Are Subconsciously Formed And Emerged Thence To
Consciousness, Ifever the Act is Adaptively Pungent. Therefore, Intuition is merely Consciousness Upon A Subconscious Connexxion, that is Any Connexxion.

Third Principle, Memory is stored in spaced pereach other a one either Chronosequentially etor Spatially, Extrinsically; etor amidst Intricate Quality. Fourth,
Memorial Centrality and Endurance are directly linear to the Cluster Of Self Referential Recursion it has to itself an Idea, its Connexionality. Thusly, Highly Memory
Inflictive Ideas Artilace Ento Thought Patterns And Personality According to their Plane Of Space And Context, because:

 One Doeth Likedly for Reward, or Dislikedly for an adirection to Punishment ere unbeknownst to Handshaking Acknowledge of Accretioeric Punishment, then Premeditioned
 against if Tolerated not via Repetitioned Forance, for othinely the Lovecraftian Fear Of Unknown thus gained through abstately (against state, of anything, is the
 fundamental base, thus against and from under anything's state) Inadapted Reactions (thereccord). Esoteric Phobiae.
 With too the Procured Wishes and Desires that the Juvenate is tent to his enviroment are suchupon any time Reinforced of a Pleasurable Stimulus, or Exacerbated
 if equivalently proratingly Exposed or not through a Careful Exposure, by Effort tis, then Thoust Browses Alikeneations and Flinchst Pain, and Parallel
 Recursions From Them To Them behadst for PATTERN OF BEHAVIOR, PRETEMPORAL ADAPTATIONS TO OUR LOCAL UNIVERSE AND IT TO OUR STATIVE AGENCY.

 A Self Identity nay, a Social Conmesure of Denotive Relevance and Thine In Others Inasmuch As That Boont Degree, for whose but the Book Of Collective Society does
 Oneself Belong to if Extrovertly devenuing Abrasive Attention (whereon childhood was undimmed by Social Negation either Aesthetically or Anaesthetically) and being
 Reinforced for those Indulgences Of Hedonism from, too, an Innate Stimulation Of said Social Status. Hereby then, the Self Identifying State is absolutedly dissoluted
 if those Moral Precepts are Recursively defined, Actively Upon, for the One's Definite Time, or often Contrarily to the Mandation Itself, whereby Thoust Becomes Social
 Consciousness, without any Effortful Self Challenge; For, the Special Capacity is only gained after Supersetting these Socioposed Patterns, or Deviating for them
 thenwhich One Can Be Measured As Superiorly To Others. A pressection (pre and assection is middle) thencewith is the sum of Social Status supine an Extroversion Of
 Pattern to Sign a Nonsequentially Abstrakt State that is Admoral, or Introvertedly Expressing A Virtue Of Intellect Or Creativity thrucord (through and accordinly)
 Art. Thereupon Praise Of One's State, a clairvoyance about Recursive Reinforcement Of Its Behavior And Expresssion Will Unchancingly Follow and Design The Elder's
 Sophillence (sophia and intelligencia): Thoust Becomes Local Universe As It Becomes Thoust; Multscallar Behavioral Feedback Loops, Prone (until) Ultimvita.

 Therehence, it is blatant that a Behavior Is Reconcillation Of Focalization Upon the Highest Morality, if Consciousness Does Not Override; wes Freewill is the
 Conscious Power of Desconditioning And Dejecting Subconscious Desires, and the concessioned more a Desire's Urgency presupposes a Higher Upset (set up, high) Of
 Freewill, Consciousness, Temperance, Willpower. But Secondth Dame canst be a pall forance of Man, neither modorderly (mod is modify and order, viceversa, reverse
 order) of Willpower without Scientific Scrutiny.
 Forthabout, it is One's Culturomoral Pedestals, of Archetype, that influence most a Society's Behavior; of which filtered variably in Western Culture is Shall Become
 an Office Through Postsecondary, Shant Abuse Psychostimulants. Acast (Apart) General Legal Punishments, by which the opposite hast not dissident of Legal
 Recompensation when appliqued to Subside said Legal Conflict, or Legalizing Reward For Commandements videlicet Adultery.

 And it is Principal that Knowing Thyself Is Thy Higher Self Upon Thy Lower Self, Consciousnes Over Subconsciousness about the fledged Entrelacity Of Memory, thus
 only way of a Complete Identity, for it naught complacent to propound that Memorial Medium would repeat even of gazillions, lies on an Impossibly Of Introspection.
 Where but GOD is the only acquainted.

Introverts engross of their Rearing whereifnot Negative Socialization a Greater Utility Within Metaperception, therefore, they're More Adapted at Inferring Deeper
Patterns between them. Extroverts nonbout (Oppositely) are Utilized To Socialization And External Stimulation.

Understanding is about the Discrete Set Procedurally searching Compliances and Self correcting through Anomalies for Its Nature's Induction; when it be harder managing
Meagre Experiences Versus Myriad. Then whose Memory expands more to the Concept, Understanding will be more accurate to Reality and Quickier. And it is My Postulate
that a Bending of Thought Pattern introvertly and Rapid Memory Retrieval make Genius (FIX).

Negative Emotion is Actively Saved Against and Positive Emotion is Actively Passed To, of course.

Whoevermuch Negative Emotion one gets throughout a Sopodespertage will determine the Miserability: Ease of Anger and thus inflicting pain, or disappointing a Societor,
which at Scale One's Misery Makes Society That Much Miserable then; and viceversa for Positive Emotion too.


It not attains Sensational Connotation a Sendsductive Diskretion if at a Time lesser than Perceptive Bottleneck such Realistic State forsakes. By expedience of reason,
any State that is proclived is Past Information, WE LIVE IN THE PAST. Though it is coherentific that these Sensductive Nerves are Hierarchically Preeminenced: that
Tact is Reflexivly Velocitus, then Smell than Audition, Visory and Daintiness.

One's Subconscious it, as Roots, one then Tree is an unkindling doubt that from Decadent Connoisance with Stimulus, ay Social Agent, is to be Bound To It For The
fortified relativity. On this the Root Progeny it let be associated from those Stimuli it attunes to; Bershall not tithing disaddecimating a Social Interaction that
it can be Feared and, once Disoriented, elated in the Unrestrained Proceeding of Oneself, of One's Normal Personality no longer debugged and abjected by That One Lackey.
ONE THEN BASKS IN WHAT ADVANCEMENT OF SOCIAL COERCION INMUCHAS OF HITHERTO SELFCARDINALITY. And that was had, where Tio Miguel at some would Deject Me Negatively, to
reinforce said Conception, or implement a Lamella of Inexpression by only Visual Claim, not Their Wontedly Obscene Salutation, whereat I would panick upon that Social
Principle then. These are Awkwardnesses of All Social Interactions, overwhich mine is unclaimed pricause (Because of generally what whas said), and leastly preoccupied
by My Brother. Atlast Tio Miguel scooted Off, Off He GOESS to his Familiarly Conquest.

Let it be intraligned the Personalities whereby Identified are Man and Woman between their General Behaviours and Impulses therewith:

 Man is Innately more entailed to Lust: By which    Woman is depart the Woozy Sex and Gluttony more Vacuously Innocuous,
 an Interal Nuance of his body makes him, and       whereabout as the Animal Femine she gets Reciprocated from the Male,
 it withtinius that he is more Untemeperancely      and Waits On and Serves Man; Not to disparage that She can't reach
 Resistant to Undoing in that. Secondly, he is      a Man's Muscolopragmatic Capacity Upon the World, but Harder. A be
 Innately Destemperated to Eating; because he       lief, therefrom, (a) that Woman is more Temperate than Man is True then
 Is Pronouncer and, thus, needs more Food. All      by the definition of Behavior Balances. Womens are more Passive (than Active),
 this whereby their General Personality is          more Submissive, and naturally Less Aggresive than Mens. (b) That Woman is
 Principiously Reinforced to that extent.           hence More Rational Off The Carn and Hallower than Man (Childlike).

 For this reason, is Man in suggestion of the       Whereas a Woman is More Productive to the end of Offspring; to be Pregnated
 Animal Analog More Productive to the ends of       By Man she is Unavoidingly Optimized for and Nourishing the Children, a Feminine
 Physical Handiwork, Animal actively exsetting his  Animal Breastfeeding the Mary milk.
 being to Femine, thus until all kinds Intellectual
 Effort he supersedes then.
                                                    Woman then, Channel Love Singularly unto a Man, if so wilt, and is Naturally less
 And Monogamy, the Selfish Love, is much less       motivated toward the Unfaithful Purist, but more Punished because of the Mate's
 Capable of Man as aforementioned. His Crimson      Emotional Injury; as per taht an Infedility is inherently an Aphysical Punishment:
 Sexuality and an Exclusive Love would be, of       You're Less Than, I Love you Less Than. That, if Socially Unconditioned, will lead
 a Wedlock, ninethely none with High Competence, of to a Wroth Violation of her by his Naturally Incenter Aggresion. Thusabout is the
 course. Either Physical or Social. Otherwise the   Human Psyche of Selfish and Egocentric.
 Reward is not that Strongly Bound, less Motivated
 if not also Punished by Negative Response. But the
 former has, nigh naught Punishment and Much More
 Reward.

To Most Effectively Emphasize or Destruct a Behavior therefore, one Must Maximize One, a Reward, and the other, a Punishment. A Natural Disinclination towards Social
Chastising serves then, of Social Precept, of which Following Makes the One Happy; of Norm that Increases or Decreases Social Status, accordingly. All Human seeks and
oughts to Social Status Naturally. Logically, the addending Rewarding Norms while too Punishing Norms is the META for Dilluding Impulse Preconception and Action.

The Rational Reason, Conscious Abnegator of Roguely Subconscious Pleasures, can be splined between, praxily, a Behavior that is Economically Worse Than Another, or its
Absence, Within the Discerned Scope of Perception; or metaphysically, as the upratense coalescence towards the Temperate Continuum until the Being becomes, the
Religiously Rational Soul. Upon this most Religions base upon. Thus, it is dictated happen that a Human can't be Rational until the Somatic Disseverance But he Can
strive to it by Temperance; and all Extroverts commit More Irrational Acts but all Introverts commit less Irrational Acts, by this hearth; and all Extroverts are
Less Peaceful but More Anxious than Introverts then; from that all Rational Beings, Souls, are Infinitely Temperate, for they are not Seeking Or Desiring Wordly
Pleasures. While in Abstrakt Processing of Uncherishingly Examinational Caliber, the Discreete Disseveration in its state can with tis, Exocarnatic Asicontinuity, be
Meditated upon.

A Perfect Tyranny in the Autocracy of an Arbitrary Paxbibliovre can be mentally planted, first upon: the polarization of the Neutral Undoing forowhich its Temptive
Abstinence would not be Reward but Tis Rather Yes, and Depressioning the Punishment Time and Intensity of Temptive Doing; for the Reward and Punishment Utilities are
also reckoned between their Instancies. An Histographic Duality of Hexahedra, between Negatively Pinning Undoing and Positively Accepted Doing, and their intensities

Empirical Philosophers are Experimentors and Systematic Philosophers are Scientists. We are all Natural Experimentors and Surreality (Sucelest) is OUR GOD, but to
gain Objective Truth must Deepen Our Knowledge about Formal Systems that describe the Universal Reality.

Preconceptions of Knowledge gage the Apriorily Systematic Scientist that Derives Truth from an Axiomatic System of Definitions, Aphysically; and the Aposteriorily
Experiential Inductor that Concretizes Through a Directly Physical Sensedata, Physically. The Systematic Scientist is thus in its Greater Ability of Aphysical Thought
Learned More to it, and the Experimentor upon Outward Reality. The Formal Language is Signed aft the Systematically Abstrakt Scientist (Logik and Matematiks), the
Physical Experimentor's Expression is a predicament of an unparadoxically Natural Language because it is Undefinedly Ambiguous; Physicalities are a Subjectively
Sociollective Perception, Indefinitely Qualified in their Definition because Qualificative States are only Induced Patternly, pending upon One's Experience, thus,
something is never Holistically Known, and a Dissidence of Wisdom either implies a Qualitative Set Hierarchical Relation or a Set Incontainment.

Qualia lives in the Surreal Plane of Being that We upon Experiential Aligment of Instances have an Innate Connection to, Platonic Heaven of Forms, that Subconsciously
feeds Into Us Objective States.

Issing Before Being Because It Has Been Is Induction, Empirical Science, Which Before Being a Probabilistic Multiplexity is Paradoxical because One Is Not Rather The
Other; thus it is an Infinite Recursion of Self Proving Falsehood Even Though One Truth But Can't Be Because Other True Too. Thushence Polymorphism Before Being is,
in nature, rather a Permutation of Discourse Universes Fated to Anyun State by YAHWEH, the Monad Causality of Being; Discrete Being is Destideus.

Minimize Consequential Pain, is influenced by Pathos in adorment of Immediate Pleasure; THAT IS, LOGOS VS PATHOS ARE IN CONSTANT ALTERCATION FOR DOMINANCE IN ANYUN
DECISION: PATHOS FOR IMMEDIATE PLEASURE AND LOGOS FOR ELUDING FUTURELY WORSE PAIN, OR SO DEEMED.

Choices are decreed by their Mutual Exclusivity, the Chooser's be, in nature: two choices cannot be taken at the same time for our Unitary Consciousness and Physical Boundness.

~Desire and Behavior
There occurs a greater Satisfaction in anyun of an Opposite Choice, it appears, that Anxiety for each choice increases throughout time as one derives more Motivation pereach; Choice
Weighing: each Mental Iteration Per Choice increases the likelihood that it'll be comitted, Desire be prennexxed, thus, considering a choice will unindicatingly make the future one
farther likely. Free will implies Choice and Choice implies Anxiety, Behavior is the end of Anxiety thus, until whenever time. SOU, BETTER NOT HAVE FREE WILL, FOR THAT ANXIETY, OR LINGER
MUCH ON THE IRRATIONAL ONE...THE MORE TIME UPON CHOICE, THE MORE LIKELY; THE MORE ONE DOES NOT WANT TO DO, PROVIDED DESIRE, THE MORE PLEASURE WILL GET IN DOING, AND VICEVERSA: Action or
Inaction.

The Conscious Logos is deployed when the Pluses and Minuses for one Decision are Thought to be Unknown, or not of enough subtance to dispair among them, inbound a
certain range of such extremities to one's Limited Knowledge and in relation to One's Ethics, thus TradeOffs could be not unwound. But this, not to, inefficiently,

Minimize Future Pain, is influenced by Pathos in adorment of Immediate Pleasure; THAT IS, LOGOS VS PATHOS ARE IN CONSTANT ALTERCATION FOR DOMINANCE IN ANYUN
DECISION: PATHOS FOR IMMEDIATE PLEASURE AND LOGOS FOR ELUDING FUTURELY WORSE PAIN, OR SO DEEMED. That whenever there's Friction between Pathos and Logos, Pathos being
Normally with greater impetus and strength, for which a Dispute Between

Decisions are decreed by their Mutual Exclusivity, the Chooser's be, in nature: two choices cannot be taken at the same time for our Unitary Consciousness and Physical Boundness.

For a Temptive Choice Set, the Utility of each one is equal in the Sinful's Pain and Pleasure, against the Abstaining's Peace: the former economically Subtracts More Than Add, through
Social Denial, this berated by Rationality; whereas the cheek turnt to Abstinence will Peace suffice. PEACE > SEEKMENT.

Free Will is constricted by the Decision Set or the Utility Function, requiring a minimum of two for a Choice Set.
One will Thrive Inasmuch As One Had Suffered. One Will Desire Inasmuch As One Had Thrived. One Will Thrive Inasmuch As One Had Desired, given that the Future Remakes
The Past.

Futurely desire ascends with rise in pastly satisfaction: the more one is satisfied by behavior, the stronger desire for it will be. The mind is executing the rational
resort for assuring one's well being in the future, of whetting the appetite for that behavior, sadly so, unaware of the Virtuosity In The Pursuit.

The Ingained Desire if Innate nix: Excretum Secretion, Coitus Replikation, Feed, and Sleep, or what comes is a contrast between Energy Dispension and Inclusion, Transferringly, Behavior
thereby captured through these More General Laws. The Desire is Cultivated otherly, by gripping itself the roots and rule of Social Mandation, and could be Motivated upon an External
State that takes Effort to reach, for first by first, Behavior is Initially Learnt from Authority. But all other Good Emotion is Innate and Non Satiable, including said but the Tetraktys
of Biology that thus are Cooleddown and are Satiable to that degree; The Satiable and Unsatiale Vice. Survive one can indeed, without Reproduction, so this Tetraktys of Biology can be
made abstract unto the Triad of Need, but hefty would be thus, to Abstain from it.

Human Comportment can be traced to the Three Branches of Primal Emotion: Desire with Pleasure and Pain with Relief, that a Surge of Desire inescapably implies
Cultivation, it be Satiable or Insatiable, with or without Caressing Peace: Beauty and Caress and Harmony, which are for most Desires Innate, Insatiably, as any
next moment is Desiriously Anticipated for, parallel to the Gained Pleasure, VariConsciously. THIS ILK OF DESIRE AND BEHAVIOR, THAT LOOPS BACK ONTO ITS INTENSIFICATION,
IS THE MOST HIDENEOUS AND LEAST PEACEFUL; This is the most commonplace Desire and Behavior's Motivation.

Now Averted Pain, we the Escapists of Pain and of great disdain, as it Perverts Pleasure and Unsettles Peace, this is, only naught because Behavior for Pleasure has been
empowered and left more room by Pain not being One's Normal State and thus its Avoidal, an even stronger Determiner of Behavior: that a man with enough Desire or Pain
can go to Mad Considerations and Pretensions.

The Subconscious Waters that defines Humankin, his Deepest Desires and Behaviors, how visited is the Sea of Subconscious with Wantacious Creepers poking their wits up to the Rational
Watchman, the Observer of Subconscious Sea, he with his Negativity to Disposed Desire, paradoxically, strikes their mesmerizing gazes down to only Silence or Suppress, that this Body is
of Flesh That Desires and Grimes the Soul, warding from Virtuosity in God and Temperance, should the Wantacious Creeper nod naught with One's Rationality; for otherwise one's is free and
efficient of overtaking from such a Desirious Friction, of Separate and Unshaking Wills, the Mind should be left unworn and Truly Happy at this in Pursuit.

These Wantatious Creepers that, foremost, to reap or rout out not out of their being, have been produced and made domicile in the Sea of Subconscious, intemporally and
immutably, during One's ChildHood Experience that is normally unknownst to be at such Level, paying reason to of course, the mostly Inferior Rationality even to
begreaten the Normality of such Creepers.

Who which is not set calm under the Luke Blanket of Peace, that is convoluted under the Cold and Hot Rags of Pain or Seekment whichin Seekment is spoken for the Desire,
not any colder or lower, that is spurred by a Forecoming Expectation or Imagination of the Acquainted Stimulus, and Normalization therewith of that Level of Pleasure
for same and greater degree of hot after said Desensitization, therefrom forming the Indefinite Feedback Loop of Gratification and Seekment, evergreater. The Cold Pain,
or inexplicably hot to the Hedonistic Farside, provocates Search for Relief, the Cessation of Pain, and a man could definitely commit atrocity for Pain, if greatly
enough.

A Man that Desires is a Bound Man to the Desirious Chains, that he is hence free not and, firstly, must rid of the Boulder of Pain Off His Back, and then he must Pursue
the Sobriety and Satiety of Peace, must he also detract and ignore the Maids of Desire: they look for a Manslave to their Caressing Hook, their Child Furnace that so
indefinitely Enslaves Man, they follow and harrass him, ever, with fornicatious requests and Inviting Legs; right not, that only Desirious Maid and her Enticing Gate,
but Man too, he's Hunger for Pleasure and Unleashingly Will, ever so fatigueous and relenting, that he therefrom Work his Temptive Faculty should he not Give Way to the
Fangs of Temptation. EVER SO CALLING OR SPEAKING THE MAIDS OF DESIRE MAY BE, PERHAPS HER CARESSING MEDIUM THAT HAS INDUCTED AND SEDUCED GREATLY, MAN, ESPECIALLY THIS,
MUST NOT DEGRACE HIS ARCHETYPAL STRENGTH AND DISCIPLINE.

Primer is Stimulus that is then conjuncted to an ultimately Emotional Link, for me noting the Impredictability of the Future in Association first, and such Link
Memorized from Pastly Patterns, thus Conscious Behavior clinging upon Past Experienciation: this being causated for Oneself's Comfort merely so, that Pleasure is an
Emotion gathered from the Sensibility signaling a Goal's Fulfilment or Satisfaction of the Innate, or the Pain's Avoidal too, for its Fear, therefrom: BEHAVIOR IS
TRACED BY PLEASURE AND FEAR, THE PRESUPPOSED GOAL ITSELF; HUMAN BEHAVIOR IS BASED ON FEAR AND SATISFACTION. Wherefore this foundation that is levied after such
sequence, if yet to the Mind's Computation: this the way One Thinks of World and Behave to it: STIMULUS, LINK, BEHAVIOR, an INDEFINITE FEEDBACK LOOP.

Effort is the time that a Goal takes, and additionally Subjective for either Extreme. The More Effort the More Pleasure in Attaining a Goal by either Surprise Or Inexpectation, in which
SubGoals are being subjugated up until said, or by Unregulated Desire: DESIRE LEADS TO MORE DESIRE, IF ONLY UNREGRETED IN EARNEST.

Desire leads to Behavior and Behavior leads to Desire, that's the Cultivation of Desire.

It does not, as if it did, or at least with slightest approxmiation replace, Man Needn't Woman, does not grant satiably to Calming Stance him just having his Way with
Woman Through His Stroke or Hand, or any equally stimulant surface for that matter... Woman's Caress for his Hungry Desiring is keyntessential for a Greater Pleasure
and Intrinsic Bonding, of the Soul, that each other may deem the other a Delicious Fig Arbore of ExtraPhysical Love and both have layered Romantic Bond par with said
Caress.
~

~Praisal, Society, and Human Behavior
The HungryQuencher may as well be as the Family Husband, or the Modelative Family Man: that He Provides For His Maid and children whichfrom Maid Nurtures Children, and that it passes out
of doubt that Her Beauty is to be submitted to Man, for said service... Him, the HungryQuencher, is thereby associated, with his Good Dishes, as a Maid might feel Safe and at Peace, with
Happiness and Serenity to the Nurtured One; HE CHEERS AND CHERISHES THE HUNGRYQUENCHER, DULY SO, HE DESERVES HEAVEN ITSELF, PERHAPS SERVED IN A PLATE :> This was myself that I explained,
and already knowing it readily from Kenia, Chicha, and Tia Luisa, in same ascendant ordination From Best to Worst, that these people I OUGHT TO THINK HIGH OF given them gifting Satiation
and, leastly, Happiness in Plate to me upon the Gorging Desire, so much galvanized by my Gluttonic Abstinence throughout the former half of day.

When at Peace is he the HungryQuencher not: looking for Praisal in his artful endeavour of foodcraft, he sought that from that same Hunger He Quenches, except of Desire of Praisal, and
thus they both be served in their actuation: ANY ACTION HAS AN EQUAL OPPOSITE REACTION, NEWTON'S THIRD LAW, HA.
~

It is all Hallow and Cursed, Trascendental and Descentful, Incandescent and Oscure, Precious and Untasteful... Foul and Fair... that the general natura by which the set 
of particulars, that is compared against the adjective's object, is determined by the Self's Memory, whichin the attentions that the mind passes surveillance populate
and nex, that is, it is special and local to each One's Past Experienciation, whichfrom he then casts upon Conscious Allocations prepending one notion as opposed to the
other. THE APPLICATIVE EXERCISE OF OPPOSITES UPON PERCEPTION HINGES ON WHAT SIDE IS CROOKED UNTO, FOR THOSE PERTAINING TO A DIFFERENCE OF INTENSITIES, IN RELATION TO
ONE'S NORMALITY OF INTENSITY THUS, INTENSIVELY RELATIVE AND A POSTERIORI FOR THEIR STATEMENT. But, at first and at once, with the apprehended intensity of such certain quality of object,
the quality itself, when analyzed with the general aptitude by disparation therefrom, is an Absolute Opposite, either one or the other, which manifestation in the Mind has the object
be engaged in the Neutral Middle of neither, and one an instance more or less than the other after said classification. OPPOSITES CAN ALSO IMPLY AN INTENSITY, ONCE HAD IT BEEN EXPRESSED
TO ONE OR THE OTHER, LET IT BE PERCEIVED FOR INSOMUCH FOR EITHER ONE, MORE ABSTRACTLY. ONE'S NORMALITY 

The clever clairvoyant with his mind put to Past would Predict the Future by those Pastly Patterns from which Generalizations are made and the Future is Thus Deduced;
the mind clobbered clairvoyant, of mind flagellated, or Wandrous, might attribute disparately his Prophecies from approximation or estimantion and, in lieu, to
anothersome Deity that he happened chused to be an oracle of.

I have the potestity to, being raved raptously by those Affairs of Others, heresay that it is of delging and incontaining, BLOODY SMOTHER, thew sparked Curiosity and
indulgence emanance from his unknown fables to me Observer; so much even, if the unfolding voice before the self has pleasanty to audition.

~Prorogare.
Morality is rooted on emotion, moraility without emotion

Only-rational, insensible, society

Eyes, shyness while looking at someone, attraction, girls, behavior, psychology

Comparision, ability, person

Subjective because of limited human perception, knowledge, etc

We think in extremes, everytinhg defined by extremes

Hunger can make a man mad

Searh for superior learning speed, for life is finite

Time vs effort

Asemantical cues for recalling

Instant and Delayed Gratification. Seek excuse, break discipline, justification. Preferences biases towards
sources of gratification. Why Instant Gratification neglect effort for reward, makes one cringe before more
difficult tasks. primary sources of gratification: entertainment, food, sex, etc. peanut butter case

Behaviors are the abstract, general rules, that manifest through objects

Recursion in understanding/learning

Hypotheses per second = smartness xd?

To earn generalization is valuable because of all the possible tangential ideas that can emerge

Systematically controlling what I am going to think throughout the day. problem to think about for the day

Happinesss through pain, not pain through happiness

Existence vs reality

Qualities are abstractions?

Attention or Concentration on Tasks depend on gratification,motivation,dopamine

Prefrences are [[biases]] towards [[sources of gratification]]

Candelabrum - Art is Beauty, or Art is Anything that Appeals to Emotion. Emotion is a characteristic of any stimulus from any of the senses: caress - touch, beauty - sight, etc,
association between emotions and their sensible sources.

Every one, Man and Woman, has each of it in itself both Manhood and Womanhood, it is just Traumatized by society not to display those Parts. God created us halves, this makes sense we
would have a Innate Attraction to both, because they both have their virtues and charms.
~
~

~Corpus Lexicon Cathlogus, autodidactically introspected wordrrays (word structures).
wes: and;
whereheadof: of which head, from which, wherefrom;
ber: but;
ver: versus, against;
gaineach: eacha again;
bershall: should it be, in comparison, however;
selfcardinality: freedom;
taht: that;
pricause: because of that, of what was said;
pelicontology: sequence of text, storytelling;
(ambirinth, discombabulus): an indeterministic, random system, discombabulation;
conquest: house, home, homeland, from adapted enviroment;
ashad: near;
abest: directionally right to, because best is greater in number line to right;
nona: prefix opposite;
reinstate: restore, reset, restart;
upunto;
maxodulate; max, modulate, increase;
nextently: next intent;
posistate: positive state, activate, enable;
mapogram: graph of map, map;
contrapositive: opposite;
admote: walk to, mote is movement;
combabulus: normal group of things, not disorderly;
princilmatum: temporal duration, time is an offset from start;
withtinius: from spanish conseguir, continue with;
pronouncer: bigger;
mary: female;
incenter: greater;
upratense: upra is supra, super intense;
by this hearth: therefrom, as a result, consequently;
cherish: smile;
asicontinuity: separattion, difference;
paxbibliovre; book of peace, pax, biblio, livre;
forowhich: before which;
instancy: moment, situation;
metremutor; transporting vehicle of any kind;
firstoderly: intensely;
metrodimensional: of measure;
pernon: each, per once, per one;
nowwhich;
matemancy; practice of math;
compar: along;
dexterize: achieve, produce something amazingly;
semansis: meaning;
anyall: any and all;
herethen;
exnote: express;
contuple: couple, tuple;
pudent: able;
treatise: treatment;
societor: social actor;
essivision: divsion of essence;
deeft: despues, after, eft;
hencethen;
hencethrugh: action, physical means through which an impulse or motviation is betook;
ennexion: connect;
prennex: preconnect;
infrapathy: negative emotion;
devent: decrase;
diadaptive: imitative, adaptation between;
descript: describe;
ovrarch: boss, king, over arch;
atmost;
device: intent, job, undertaking, like devise;
cacodeus: bad god, demon;
benideus: good god, yahweh;
discentromoral; about moral opposites, non center moral;
addcrease: increase;
tactiception: tactile perception;
anagregate: permutation, different set/structure;
destideus: fated by god, destinity, deus;
sopodespertage: definition of day by its conscious waking time, soporiferous, despierto;
verimediation: relation of truth, truth table;
thenceft: after that;
~

~Sabogastric Ontology, an irreconstitutional confabulation of dainties.
Combinations of Rice with Sweete, Rice with Fruit Gel.
~

~Calculus, Triangle's Supremacy of the Abstraktly Matematikal Comprising - Pythagora's Epiphany; Metrodimensional Relations of the Triangle's Brims - Trigonometry;
Curvilinearly Bidimensional Motion, Hypothenic, through Four Patterns of Increasing and Decreasing, or self same, makes Cycloids.

Rotation around an Object is an Orthogonal Circumferential Revolution of the Other about it.

The fundament of a Circle's Area were it not yet Spherical, then, it begets the one Unwhirling Process into a Rectangle of myne Fantacious Behest accruing the area
pernon not: for Obliquely Inclined Radii Overlap in the Rect Figure; then at Twice the Radius thus, (2pir^2)/2. Hencewith is Half Circumference And Radius To 2 tis
sciencing leads upon. Nowwhich Pyramidic Pentahedra compartment their Sphere about, to render beholdable its Surface Area: each Pyramid parts from the 1/3rd a Prism
Description as its Quadratic Base Changing with Height then; and in their Radial Assortment it is synthesized that they form the Outward Plane of the Sphere, hence
consolidating its Surface Area for the Sum of Bases, Square Areas. Ber adrift once grasped the precise myriad of Pyramids is the Sphere's Surface, then by Induction
of Matemancy a Guru consequented that a Sphere is 4 Circles with its Diameter their Areas Complemented in Sum, as priorly contemplated; thus each Greater Circumference
of it has its Area's coalition of Pyramids: 4pir^2.

Alternating, the Volume is assured then as the Pyramids' Volumes additioned; a Height each is Radial, thenceupon 1/3(br). Inferentially substituded compar the Surface
Area: 4/3(pir^3).

A System of Position Analysis thereof, upon that Ponderation's Topic beckons of a Polar Coordinate System, with Uncartesian Angle. Each Position has an Angle as a
result of Hypothenic Change, and a Radius about the Circumferential Motion such Triangle's Hypothenuse relates to. Earth Spheroid a style of tis has been devised, first,
a North and South Poles Around which it Rotates Anticlockwise East, horizontally; Reference Axes horizontally an Equator from which Vertical Latitude soars, and the
Prime Meridan opening different Horizontal Longitudes, those Meridians. Their maxima of Parallel Latitudes is 90 North and -90 South; Meridian Longitudes 180 East and
-180 West. Thereby a grant given Earth's Radius, semiperfectly, any Geocenter is confidented.
~

~Computer Science, Computing; Art of Formally Computative Writing.
~ Prorogare.
Empirical induction and my thinking, help thinking programming.

Naming of varibles, choose most popular ones

If instance is one, then generalization doesn't make sense. if one file, then why create categorical dir

Pointers?

Recursive calls call stack

Cursor moves in curses after char insertion that's why (h-1, w-1)

AI that'd infer functions/generalizations/pattern from input-output relations/tables. maybe it rules the
world?

Geometry in command line

Floor Division Implementation

{{{python
import random


instance = True
while instance:
    a = random.randint(1, 100)
    b = a+random.randint(0, 100)
    c = b+random.randint(0, 100)
    if c <= b and b <= a and b <= a >= c:
        instance = True if (b <= a >= c) else False
}}}
~
~

~Algebra; The properties that expressions originating inside arithmetic show about basic operations, their effect on numbers in relation to number itself and structure,
are concisely summarized by Algebraic Expressions. Matematikal Metaphysics.

The directional relation between proportional quanta, either directly or inversely, shadows forth the principle of the operation from which one is derived and wherein the other entwined:
that for a direct proportion one is a multiple of a constant factor, the proportionality coefficient times the other quantum, thus the coefficient to be successively equated by dividing
the product over the latter factor, that is not constant; coefficient(quantum)/quantum = coefficient and coefficient(2) < coefficient(3), product over one factor yields the other and
ceiling of any two factors increases their product. Lastly, the differences between the based products are in function of their bases' differences, x as a factor, multiplied against the
coefficient of proportionality, that also maintain constancy compared with same distances between inputs.

Now for the inverse case, it's exactly the converse since the coefficent is in effect dividing for us thus establishgig the opposite, multiplying both proportional quanta to fetch it:
a/b(b) = a. The independent variable passing as dividend and the proportionality constant numerator as such, ergo just a division from which a basic relational principle can be acquired:
the selected quotient will be smaller inasmuch as b is bigger, because the bigger the dividend the less of it in the divisor, be it whole or fraction.

A Slope or Rate is the accumulation of a quantity with the progression of another quantity, a Proportional RelationShip of Multiplication, that is Put Against the Variated Domain;
INASSAMEAS THE OUTPUT IS COMPUTED FROM TWO FACTORS, ONE THE SLOPE AND INPUT, THE OTHER FACTOR CAN BE COMPUTED WITH ONE, AND THEREFORE, THE LINEAR FUNCTION PAIRINGS OF OUTPUT WITH RESPECT
TO INPUT, DIVISIBLY, IS A PROPORTION DEFINING IN SERIES THE SAID RELATIONSHIP, ANEW, OF INPUT TO OUTPUT AND VICEVERSA.

This Property of Linearity: a Constancy of Distance Between Consecutive Outputs, or the distantiation between outputs being an accumuluation of a constant rate, presents a case of
Proportionality between the Outputs and Inputs that, by the nature of the Multiplicative Operation, Increase With Each Other. Disagreeing in opposedly disposition with CurviLinear
Functions: with changing relation between Outputs, that the Input is included in the Rate, and, hence, a MetaRate. The Convokation of Curvilinearity or Circularity is thus apparent for
Changing Slopes amidst successive points.

~Prorgare.
Powers of 10 divisible by 10, powers of b divisible by b

Mathematical operations as conventient ways of denoting quantity

If n is even if n-1 is odd, n is odd if n-1 is even

Law vs prop math

[[note|if c ≤ b and b ≤  a, then b ≤ a ≥ c]]

Pattern of division over 2, or even number, x//y|xmody=0 == x+1//y until x == 2y

Negative numbers do not make sense physically

How many zeroes fit in a: a/0, none, less than unity

Contrary/synonym? operations: vs /, + vs - , power vs root, etc. (a*b)/b = a, same for power and root

For a/b, a % b always <= b

Variable letter designation, operation option, change its behavior

Proportional and multiplicative/? view of division. Odd number = even+odd, therfore, even = odd+odd (why?) or
even+even which is equal to 2n. All numbers are multiples of 1 and therefore themselves, quotient. 0 is
multiple of all numbers. odd+1 and -1 equal even, even+1 and -1 = odd, all-to-all relationship? all prime
numbers are odd. way of describing odd numbers?

Most math operations require two parameters. Direct proportionality with math operations.

Proportionality: 1/2 = (1+1/2)/(2+1) = (1+1/2+1/2)/(2+1+1) = (1+1/2+1/2+1/2)/(2+1+1+1)... empircal induction on this?
~
~

~Aritmetik, Theory of Numbers and their Basic Operations; Numerology, Numerancy.
~Prorgare.
why scientific notation move dot to right or left, reason

Common factors and distributive property, factoring vs expanding

Multiplication opposite of division in words too (division is how many fit). 

Floor division is lazy and normal  division greedy

Division is just an exhaustion operation

Most important numbers are 0,1,2,3

Subtraction how many above or below number

Viewing proportionality through circle pie.
~
~

~Set Theory, Functions, Maps; Collections are Complexity Through External And/Or Internal Link.
~Prorogare.
Generalizations over sets of patterned input-output relations

Input-output tables for noticing math patterns or equalities between operations/equations

Addition is set union and subtraction?

Unit is equal assemblage of objects

Units are arbitrary. 

Units from units meter is 100 cm. Units are relative, maybe to physical objects

Units are convenient abstraction for measuring objects, to the human mind

A *function* is a [[rule]] that maps to element of [[set]] B per element of set A

A *function* is a [[rule]] that equates all inputs to exactly one output

A *function* is a [[generalization]] over a set of patterned input-output relations
~
~

~Logik, a Type of Reasoning; Formal Language System for Expressing a Convergingly Objective Reality Through an Axiomatic Set of Verimediations.
~Prorogare.
Circular reasoning

Circular reasoning mathematically

Circular dependecy
Logic as a system for asserting reality?
~
~

~Physics; Empircal Laws of Enforced Material, its Movement thenceft.
Newton's Lawsation
Even if the Newtonian mouth had whisteled not, to our Sound and Symbol Getters the Law of Inertia, one can possibly indeed be blossomed in the discovery of it by mere Induction: that
a Physique either in locomotation or stative can be changed its course or speed by applying a Greater Than Force, as it occurs that this Body has such a Transferred Energy
therefrom, ingreeting a Locomotive Change to but an Unbalanced Eater Force; AN OBJECT WILL REMAIN AT ITS MOTIVE STATE UNLESS ACTED ON BY A FORCE, Inertial Law or Dependence of Change.

It is palpable how would one, thinking folly in Action Equal Opposite Reaction, of no Force Imabalance therefore, and that neither Physique would be GVkcaused
displacement upon that, but, by stepping further onto the idea, it is derived hollow indeed said if the Reacing Physique is not acting on itself but on the Acting
Physique, equally so and in opposite direction, that this is contemplated and the Equal and Opposite Forces would be applied to each independently.

Newton's Third Law: that a Physique in so much as it has been Applied Force will apply in an opposite fashion, intowards the other, because the Atoms exert at that point of meeting a
Repellance, this fits harmoniously with Inertia, or the Conservation of Motion, and that a Collision of Physiques thrown at each other will disturb their natural course, and if thrown
with a certain acceleration, either itself will Yield Away, both that could not thus withstand the Force, or the other one against a limit force that this holt grander. This is a
satisfactory explanation for one that pushes a Physique upon an earthly surface, with Friction, it recognized to not move until a certain Force is Applied: in order to overcome
Frictional Bump, that it'll Yield Away at supporting said Limit Force, but, at anylength, the Force Will Be Tributed Back, with account of the Pusher's Resistance.
The Puller, with its Bodily Force, will be pursued forward by that Opposite Pull, in the same frame, but will be in his same force pushed backward as he puhes on the
floor forthward, and, the Frictional Irregularity would Yield Away at that determined Force; or inwithin Ebony Void with a little Friction here and thither, to be
neglected for considerably massiver Physique, that Puller would be pulled forward, even if not volunteering for, as his Body would lack the requiremental rest to stand
upon; same with Pusher. That it scrabbled was at great length to prepare in mind: WHEN FRICTIONAL FORCE IS EXERTED, THERE'S ONE THAT'LL YIELD AWAY IN RESISTANCE AGAINST
THE OTHER, OR BREAK, AND SPATIAL PROGRESSION WILL BE DECIDED FOR ONE WITH A GREATER FORCE THRESHOLD, PROVIDED THE WINNER RESISTS ITSELF'S FORCE, OR SUPPORTING IN
ANOTHER MASS, IN SAID THIRD LAW'S PAIR. THE EXERTER HAS COMING HIS SAME FORCE, AND THE FORCE APPLIED TO RECEPTOR, THUS, FORCES ALWAYS OCCUR IN PAIRS.

The Acceleration of a Physique for a given Force, as derived by a = f/m, will only effect inaslongas the Force is in contact thereon; otherwise if only Hit, the Physique will be left
with Constant Velocity.

When Two Physiques At Touch Commune, whither extent one will go if decomposed not, or the one that decomposes within the Noticeable Scale, I etch to be the former
Winner: it went the least distance from Clashing Point or the Loser broke, or it mingled inwithin less mass, Acceleration is Inversely Proportional to Mass, and, ergo,
happened to move a greater yonder. These Atomic Masses Clash at Each Other and connect to stomp upon ground downwwards Earth's Suction, when, through enough Atomic
Attraction to be vested Solid Physical Structure, are not carried on by Wind, thus the Physique accelerates downwards with the Normal Force the ground is, that by
Friction slowed down and subjected to its Natural Motion, with said Earth's Gravitational Pull downwards; otherwise, then it portrays in the walks of Gas: carried on by
Wind.

Newton's Reciprocity is also the reason for bouncing, a specific case of Collision in which the Appplier is pushed from the surface in so much as it pushed on it.

The Inertial Law is clearly applied of its definition and clarified for the purport of one's indoctrination when vowing that, either a Force is indispensable for disturbing a Physique
that is Perspectively Static, or, equally Unchanging, that the Physique is only stopped fromward being shoved in the Application of Equal Force, therefrom: A PHYSIQUE'S MOTIVE STATE
WILL ONLY BE DISTURBED IN THE APPLICATION OF AN UNEVEN FORCE.

By Force are Atoms conjoined, by Force are Atoms disjoined.

Tension Force is two addended to opposite ends and directions upon and from the Physique, Applied most fittingly upon Flexible or Elastic Physiques that they may be straightened by it.

Cricular Motion is, either the Inward Force being a Push or Pull, the Centripetal Force, an incremental directive deviation of a Physique's Motive Tendency in a Straight Path, outwards
the Center, and is thought to be going radially away from the said Center by said Inertial Tendency, in the former enumeration: the laundromat operator would be apt to affix thereupon,
that the motorical intertwinings of the makina, the Angling Centrifuge, applies a Centrifugal Force to the clothes, with enough Force and Momentum to resist Downward Gravity, which the
said garbs form the Force Pair in Forward Push Backward Push, Newton's Third Law: this rotunda of the centrifuge reactively applies a CentriPetal Force. 

The Latter Case: a stone being swirled around a Center mass, a force of Inward Pull will be fed back as it pulls the Center, refining its motion to be in a certain radial span and
causing the incremental change in direction, generalized to be Circular, as a Constant Net Force that is balanced by the Physique's Outward Inertia, otherwise hurled away or colliding
with such center Mass, and the Center's Inward Pull. That this Force Interaction, when equalizingly partaken, convokes to mind Circular Motion.

THE CENTRIPETAL FORCE MUST BE ENOUGH TO KEEP THE OBJECT IN RADIUS AND AN OBJECT'S INERTIA ENOUGH SO FROMOUT THE CENTER.
PUT IN INERTIA PARAGRAPH. A PHYSIQUE WILL APPLY A FORCE, OR LACK THEREIN, ONLY WHEN IT HAS BEEN INTERACTED WITH AND TRANSFERRED BY ANOTHER PHYSIQUE, WHICH, IN KORE
CAUSE, THIS LIES ON BEHALF OF ATOMIC REPELLANCE. THIS MOVEMENT AND FORCE CAPABILITY OF ANY PHYSIQUE, IS THUS BEARED UPON THE FORCIBLE ROOT, THE CRADDLE OF FORCE: There
was incepted this Universe as whole, innately sown with all Atoms, and the Artful Hovering Hand divined them to Speed or Movement, and they'd Collide with each and, by
virtue in Property of Attraction, they had aggregated into Substance, keeping in companionship with one another. He The Hand, must one kneel down before lest One Be
Ungrateful for one's own living that had come come into substance or being, and endowed Pain and Pleasure and Peace thus; that is, for Atom Attraction holding Matter
clearly, the Seemable, Tactable, that which is seen or held versus space, together.

Indistinguishably, a Pull is a Push thought not so but accurate that, with same direction, the movement of the Physique would in effect would be same for the motion per se. Only the
Pusher is before, and Outwards and Detracting, and the Puller is After, Inwards and Attracting. For the Action At Distance Forces, this distinction between Exerter and the Applied is
even less rigid and blurry in the utmost for the Puller and Pusher: the Puller Physique could be, or so corroborated, could be not the Exerter and instead there could be an Inward Push
upon the other Applied one; or that Pusher could be Pulled, leaving one Searching in Circle. THE PUSHER IS THOUGHT TO BE CLOSING INWARDS THE STATIC APPLIED, WHILE THE PULLER IS THOUGHT
TO BE, INVERSELY STATIC, ATTRACTING THE APPLIED. THAT IS, THERE'S MERELY A STRUCTURAL DIFFERENTIATION OF FIRST PERCEIVED TO BE STATIC OR IN MOVEMENT AND THE SECOND VICEVERSA. PUSH IS
FIRST MOVING SECOND STATIC, PULL IS FIRST MOVING SECOND STATIC.

Disintegration of matter is the separation of atoms, that is, the unoding of molecules.

Atom that Threads Matter Together is, insomuchas it integrates, made of a Nucleus amassing Protons and Neutrons, the Womb of Atom, and has other Particles orbiting
around it: Electron, Amber in Greekish; that have Charge insameas Atoms, thought be antithetical to the Proton Positive Charge, and therefore they Pull each other. 
Orbit, Circular in defintion, is to be maintained thus of some distance from the Center, or approximately, by a Force, and the Orbit aronud it, or Shell, being
positioned in the same structure and so on.

ATOMS ARE MOSTLY FREE SPACE. ATOM IS THE INDIVISBLE ONE.

A SUBSTANCE IS A PATTERN OF MOLECULES WITHIN A PHYSIQUE, A MOLECULE IS AN ATOMIC COMBINATION, AN ATOM IS A SERIES OF PROTONS, NEUTRONS, AND/OR ELECTRONS.
~

~Prorogare.
Yestermorrow, it had revealed to me upon this beautiful annexxation on her body, reflection, on the indoings of Femina's Valve about her Beauty: fastily deemt to that
virtue, upon width, a curvature towards the rectum that instates a swellness around the upper base, this dunnest of attractivnes and therefrom hotness within my same
spot, and that curvature spiraling up to being backborne, and ideally culminating in a deep, taut, and sphround arse; the Ensnaring Crest, that is, to be ensnared by it 
in its nature to be closed, and man shall make passage through a stretch, shall be not undoth of praise that, when its Labial Delineation is sanguinely imploding,
without textile, or cloth above overmarks it.

The execution of a function is a [[processes_evolution_of_states|process]]

If the computation of a function f at x issues different outputs, with the same input x, such function has
ensuingly suffered alteration

If [[past]] and [[present]] output cannot be sensed distinct but able to be confused with one another, then
unalike functions were wielded for their production. Thereby, all functions express perpetual procedure
for yielding an output

To express with set theory jargon such, any element of A uniquely bonds with one element B. By which, to
mimic the previous' paragraph consequence, an input of A only maps to different outputs in B, jostled present
against past, when the rule that modifies and produces output in B is different too. 

Set A is called the *domain*, B the *range*. The range is defined as the set of all computations of f upon x
such that x belongs to A: B = {f(x)|x∈A}

Given element of A, input, is that B feeds on for output. There's dependence of B upon A: output relies on
input

This relation of dependence is perceived better transparently by the [[equation]]: y = f(x), wherein y is the
symbol affiliated with the output which is computed by feeding an input x

Alas it was able to be conveyed tersely but didn't I, *input (x) is independent and output (y) is dependent.*

Functions center between [[quantity]] relation, where one quantity depends on another. 

domain arbitrary?

All [[external semantic media]] are [[abstraction_and_generalization|abstractions]]. They're only shortcuts for [[reference]] to the [[parameters]] of a set of bonded [[reality_and_existence_the_deepest_underpinning_constructs|objects]]

*Circular reasoning* is the process of 

It terribly happens that for any such circular argument, an infinite loop is traveled in search of truth
In which the truth value of proposition P depends on proposition Q's, and Q's depends on P's. The speaker's
belief about any plausiblity of such argument comes from an anticipated assumption for the conclusion to be
trues

Empirical induction is valid

Because it has served truly in the past

Why should it do so in the future always?


The Bible is the Word of God

Because the Bible tells us so

Disputing against [[empirical induction]] in inference from a finite set of instances, mathematical induction seeks
to prove truth of a proposition in a rigidly nonempirical and mathematical style for all its possible
instances, infinitely accruing pile

The principle of this totalitarian induction, given the infinite sequence of integers, for any instance Aₓ from
a general proposition A there hence exist infinite cases of A: A₁, A₂, A₃... for which there's always to set
out next Aₓ₊₁. All in all amounting to, if A₁ is true and it can be sucessively proven for the neighboor
instances, then the general proposition A is said to be true; and false otherwise

1+(n|n mod 2 = 0) is odd
(n|n mod 2 = 0)-1 is odd

1. A₁ is true
2. For all Aₓ, when Aₓ is true then Aₓ₊₁ too

Then A is true

domino?
{{{python
def is_there_distance(p1, p2):
	return p2.x > p1.x or p2.x < p1.x or p2.y > p1.y or p2.y < p1.x
}}}
{{{python
class Object:
	"""
	Abstraction widest in generality, utmost in abstractness, that represents all; the base, parent class of
	all, even for other universes
	
	Attributes
	----------
	being: str
		'reality' if it happens to be an objective truth (or just truth), OR 'existence' if a subjectivity
		
	plane: str
		'physical , OR 'ideal' if it dwells inside the mind
	"""
	
	def __init__(self, being, plane, qualitative_state, procedural_state):
		self.being = being
		self.plane = plane
		self.qualitative_state = qualitative_state
		self.procedural_state = procedural_state
}}}
Sets are defined by their instances, or with farther propriety, elements, and their interrelations

Bearing different perspective, a state is a set of quality given on an object; a qualitative set

There ought to be an special method, for classification when an object belongs to both reality and existence

Reality and existence are defined by their instances/elements: objects

The means for happiness (vs temporal gratification?) is only suffering. And by which also soul's vigour,
in resistantly undergoing temptation, is propelled

A plane is just a set of points ascribed to the possible positions of height and width, bidimensionally, that
indefinitely expands

And spaces?

In order to determine the independent variable of a function, to alienate the cause from the effect, one has to
find the variable whose explicit cause lies outside the function; to intent that if the cause of a variable
is one calling inside the function's encompassing, then such is the independent variable and, invariably so
by the possibilties confronted with under logical negation when a proposition's truth is earlier known, other
dependent one

Tracing the causal chain of human behavior isn't an indefinite process, the base cause of it is satisfaction

Futurely desire ascends with rise in pastly satisfaction: the more one is satisfied by behavior, the stronger
desire for it will be. The mind is executing the rational resort for assuring one's well being in the future, of
whetting the appetite for that behavior, sadly so, unaware of the virtuosity in the pursuit

In that same vein, das

The greedy management of an object's search within an iterable, stepping until last instance of said object, is
proceeded by the repeated verification of the object's existence farther last instance of it, until no more
copies of it are found

{{{python
return index if index < len(iterable)-1 and obj not in iterable[index+1:] else obj_index(iterable[index+1:], obj)
}}}
Infinite vs Indefinite?

All processes originate from one, unifying process, process tree, dir, fork

Pendulum case, perpetual motion of living things. That their power to change themselves is an illusion. The
faculty of organisms to change themselves, is maybe consciouness

One is constantly extracting away, attention and resource wise, in the performance of any behavior. And there's
not a clear point in which a behavior becomes subconscious vs semiconscious vs conscious

Knowing ignorance when one knows some quality but not whole vs unknowing ignorance

To know is a boolean/binary operation: you either know or don't know wholly

Knowing/Unknowing ignorance vs objective reality truth

We seem obsessed with positivity first and negativity last, or left and right, in antithetical notions

Painted hole case for existence vs reality truth

Logical vs Rational, rational about satisfaction and logical about abiding by the prescriptions of logic

A link is the bridge built when a commonality, a common ground by which to equally compare rooted out by
abstraction, is recognized between two ideas

Ideas are qualitative sets (states) and the communication amongst them, provided they maintain certain
closeness, is enabled by links

The length in enumeration of the ideas that are based upon a particular one, accents the generality of it

What abstraction offers, as a paliative to complexity and thereby understanding, is a manner by which two ideas
soever repeling can be equally regarded

A sequence of the repeating phrase, "that reminds me of...", from any idea to another is equivalent to an
incremental practice of selectively mowing qualitative grass against obscuring heights that further permits
progression. Doing so, the linking offset is shadowed forth: the quantity of ideas it takes in order to bind
two ideas; even though the mind performs this automatically and it may be then strange that actually road to
be walked for linking, a progression is to be completed so seemingly usual that a custom is. Moreover, this
makes it clearer for it to be expressed by computation

It is up to the basic desires of feeding and reproducing, the style in which All-Father contrived enviroment with respect to man, that the sense
through which one obtains data of utmost account is sight. The capacity and superiority of sight can be
understood by negating the other senses' existence: subtract all senses other than eye and, sure, survival
probability and comfort decline but not of weight greater than sight's absence. For, firstly, eye's reach is
far superior than the other senses; secondly, accurate awareness of physical movement bestrides in relevance
and it's the visual apparatus that allows it; and thirdly, the most emphatic predictor about the trajectory in
which hands oscillate, them beign extremely important for the interaction with the enviroment, is visual data. Visual is more important because the speed of light is faster than sound,
and all the other objects perceived by other senses?

A priori and a posteriori

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Permutation
Graphing permutations of a list relative to another list, according to distance, distance relative. In which
it is not necessary neither pattern nor particular nature for the elements inside the array, only their postion
is taken as reference

Distance relative, turning head 180 degrees, distance is interval y < x > z, or interval notation

For a*b*c..., (z*a)*(z*b)(z*c)... = a*b*c...*^n. And for a+b+c..., (z+a)+(z+b)+(z+c) = z(a+b+c), distributive
property. For a-b-c..., or a-b for b could be expression multiple terms, (a+z)-(b+z) = a-b. Also for division

For (a+b+c+d)+x, x only added to one, not like distributive, only for multiplication, probablity of choosing
one determined by BCI xd, prior knowledge

List reverse vs medium, antithesis

don't sin program

https://softwareengineering.stackexchange.com/questions/198284/why-is-0-false
Loathing thus from the widespread attached booleans for 1 and 0, true and false respectively, but not only from
shallow convention for the semantic translation to existence also corresponds, bash's logical flux functions in
consideration of exit codes for which the numbers indicating executive success mean none other than their
negations in such sense; execution that is succesful: 0, and unsuccesful: 1

In other words, the universality in thinking of 1 existence of truth and 0 unexistence of truth

prescriptive vs imperative vs procedural vs active vs normative vs how vs dynamica vs a priori vs  VS declarative vs qualitative
vs passive vs static vs what vs descriptive vs experimental vs a posteriori

{{{python
class Procedure:
	def __init__(self, modifier):
		self.modifer = modifier
}}}
state

Program that'd check for boundary errors, linter

Functions/procedures merely establish state modifications to perform upon an object, separate from the force
that exerts it/calls such procedure/feeds input

Infinite divisibility, for time, step of procedure/process

It may well be that quality is not real, only a product of our mind, therefore there's no objective quality/
truth outside mind. 

Denoting relation between ideas through set operatos

Discord sophia

After losing a wit, therefore granted one utilizes in order to identify an object the mapping between its sensation from one
wit

Comparision/mapping between senses

Permutations with balls. Floor dividing number and doing permutations/possible sums of it, substracting from
one and adding to another accordingly (5 = 2+3 = 1+4 or 1+3+1). n-2*2 for separating balls, x2 because when
reached middle the same as right

All ideas are ultimately rooted upon experience

The more suffering the more joy

Learning projects?

Input/output terminal setup idea vs development, intake vs outtake

The concept of an idea as applied to itself

If max(x, y) == min(x, y), then x == y

x*y == a*b if a == x and b == y, or a*b == x/divisor*(y*divisor). 15*2 = 15/3*2*3 = 5*6

Geometric transformations, symmetry, y = 18-x, y = 8+x, 18-x = 8+x, x = 5, in the 5th iteration, both equations equal
9 17
10 16
11 15
12 14
13 13
14 12
15 11
16 10
17 9

3d cli library, geometric transformations

Learn drawing for machines/devices, sliding mechanisms, friction of sliders

Skinner box

Fake instagram anonymous messaging link

School corotos business

School photomath program

Circler device

Temptation, derailing cli program

A numerous assemblage of links towards any idea, thither lying for consent commonality amidst thence
disposition from one to the other, petrifies the farther its memory against forgetfulness with the temporal
go by

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Display_aspect_ratio#256:135
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dimensionless_quantity
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ratio#Units
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Proportionality_(mathematics)

Movement (or displacement) is an expansion of measure, natural difference between points, amidst which in the former
consideration beholds space from a held initial point to a new one (therefore its terminal point); a difference from
earlier to later or a procedural disposition towards a quantitative extreme

But the latter by which the interference of time as the enabling entity is considerably disparaged, but hereby unhazed:
for the mere abstract act of change needs time, so hence counting and particle composition. That it's distinct to moving
the object perse, we move our mind until the end of it

Thereupon the precedence of measure over all acts of movement, as a based notion: that either necessarily connect to 
space, but one aims to the gauge of liberated space by force, and the other any space. Otherwise its unexistence and thus
equality between

Directed quantity for if direction be accordingly selected and can possibly include influences to the measure. Scalar
quantity, however and more basic, for such that 

A computer that sits in seclusion from client conduct is apprised to be a dedicated server

There is a classification of network types after evaluation of the physical distance between its connected nodes: Local
Area Network, LAN, for short distances like a home or building network; Metropolitan Area Network, MAN, for greater
distances; and Wide Area Network, WAN, for distances definitive of countries or cities

Twice data pulsations after which an interaction of asking and so receiving is rendered, and only just with that seizure of
ability, interweave what is the dantiest network between two computers; that it be unnegotiable the commonality, the
bridge, the interaction to germinate amidst them

The client requests and serves, for in requesting there's serving of it, so, same. While in server there's exclusion of
request but merely responding to a prior request. Particularly, the demarcation in the exemplary network between them is
structural and timely: both mutually talk but one after the other, client then server, and the latter in concordance with
client replies with the desired data. That is, client requests pastly and it be overt for a future response

A switch is the central apparatus to which all computers are connected and interconnects them integrating a network
Network cable ports lodge in these for connection within the computer activated by a Network Interface Card, NIC. An
electronic circuit that consents networking via radio or cable. For which the former's dependency hovers upon a Wireless
Access Point, WAP: an artifact harboring a radio transmitter and receiver plus a cable port that is attached to a switch,
router, or hub

A firewall is a security system that digitally guards the network from the massive Internet

A special instance of a, network in which its nodes are affirmed as peers with the pretension of either sharing and
requesting, that are both client and server and therefore equals, is a peer-to-peer network

Internet's compartment is made accessible by a router, which connects the network or computer to it. They're often bundled
with a WAP, switch, and firewall; for that manner, they're nominated as wireless/wifi routers

Two physical formats of data traversal, or communication, are at disposal for connecting computers: cable and radio

It seems getting good at any ability requires mere practice at it, as opposed to all the fluff individuals make about it

Breathing as an abiliy to train, regulation of it, nervousness before girls

A program that would derive things based on a person's instagram

A logical proposition processor that would also show shapes with sides equal to the quantiy of atomic propositions
  
Universal shortcut program
Wrapper programs for unwieldy tasks/libraries/applications:

Hacking a person; its instagram, getting info, etc

Stalking a person through instagram

Local school dating app. Like tinder, but in school

Visual arithemtic operations

Objective Emacs vs Vim experiment

Agar.io, population as dots, size depending on relevance of individual

Translating tasks/instructions/programs betweeen programming languages

Abstractions vs Hierachy vs Connections vs Knowledge vs Complexity vs Component vs Simple

Cli sleep tracker

Daily Planner, Sleep Tracker, School Homework Prioritizer: 1h

ChatGPT homework doer. 

Psn acccount maker, ps plus trial

Life is just prioritizing action order, import of action order depending upon action, different action order same effect

It is down to the alphabetical particles of text units as far one can penetrate into its decomposition, that unsignifiable
even deeper off letter but the unattributed geometric structures. Summarizingly: there's no mentally supplied drift for
the geometric compostion of the letters themselves, it is only in deliberate organization that their lines make up meaning.

The changing subroutine (c) erringly laid on word starts overlooks space fore the cursor, so the start (w) and end (e)
word motions cannot be apprised apart

Operators that design operations upon motions, that by their range define units of text, are prepended; so by the
ordination of such effect to such extent is this vim's fundamental work for edition

Time is a structure, vectors/arrays are structures. Everything is a structure

Editing increasingly lengthy units of text in which turning over the keyboard's indulgence is needless, thus a paliative to
complexity and time for the edition act, is vim's wilingly luring basis. For even with no that extra sub-action and
directing only mouse, it is a further temporal investment and complexity for the expression of symbols, even for the most
efficiency in response time and travel; whereas it's altogether a rote practice of key jostling for the keyboard

A change of output by the prepended combination with another key, wherein order and structure is to be cared for, is a modifier
key. Order and structure distinguished against the combinations of a set engaging the commutative law, with no sense of
structure nor order whatsoever, given the collective context. This is differently an intent of a one that changes the
other, not biderectionally. Ceasing but remarking the last incompatibility to the set combination, that the modifier
bearing on itself machinates to nothing

The modifier key supposes an expansion over the preconceived functions of normal keys. Only two of the ongoing modifier
keys, Shift and Caps Lock, change the symbols in liue drawn by their inactuation. As a way of system guidance then,
Control, Alt, and the such stand

A chunk being intertwined and a trailing retroactive bestowment upon, of world generation, is an enactment of retroactive
generation (retrogen). Concordantly, sparing the undertaking of chunk search anew, or in all a sheer reconstruction

a/b*x = (a/b)/x, a/(b/x) = (a/b)*x

All units compose and are thereby composed by previous and posterior ones

Why irrational numbers called irrational?

Superfraction, infraction, multiplication is just proportion of the sided quantity

Rational vs logical, rational subjective and logical objective about formal structure

Improbability vs impossiblity edge case, programming

sequent, sub-sequent, con-sequent, latin, retroactive, grind, minecraft, refine, enact, slapstick, in, lieu,
check out, erratum/errata, data/datum, small pox, hemisphere, intractable, type, assortment, pamphlet, debunk,
purblind, vest, trustee, pulpit, indolent, indolent, resolute/resolve, synod, pistole stroke, emolument,
methink, hindmost, litera scripta manet, proselyte, feign, scanty, trans prefix, enthrall, intertwine,
transpose, regurgitate, be synonyms: dwell, land, lie, place, occupy, take up, lodge, settle, exist, await,...
precursive, canopy, amenable, amalgamation, quassi, median, precurse, presage, predate, posdate, endemic,
landmark, vace, format, fare, the feeling ain't no blue, gunny sack johnny be goode, vexation/vex, setting = 
context, pivot = basis

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Stethoscope

Statistics in consideration of a skinny-fat fella group

Adjective is quality addend to noun, adding quality to noun its function

Reading DS3/DS4 controller signals and controlling window manager

Preprocessing and abstraction in linux commands, echo {1..3} = 1 2 3

If one knows truth then doesn't have to know its falsehood, and vicevera

Law is mandatory, deductive vs Property, that a set displays, inductive

Noun+adverb+adjective, what+how+quality

Distance is below or above number, origin point/position

Screw mechanism without cover

Opposites differ in the fundamentals but do share some commonality

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Operant_conditioning_chamber

Arrays and vectors

Sentiment analysis, opposites of good and bad, and middle
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sentiment_analysis

Tendency of associating left and right to start and end, numer line, left/right brain hemispheres.

Negation of a number is subtraction

Brain is a pattern machine

All numbers are connected to all numbers, or positions, suitting an infinite relational web of all-to-all;
counting with too recursiveness the regurgitated property, for each number to any particular universally
relates and is related.

Through the geometrical and graphical tint using more closely to the staying world of shapes: any position, say in a number line, can be contacted
from all earlier ones and, as such, all, infinitely, latter ones from them; being the "relate/related" language
sound too, all numbers be composed and compose of prior and elder numbers.

I like exploring edge cases in code xd.

com on/off command, turn on/off my esoteric code comments.

Music for concentration because of its predictability.

All-to-all number relationship vs computer network, internet

Program for getting all improbabilities and impossibilities of inputs of another program. Improbabilities and
impossibilities are conditions, propositions.

Expertise just gained by turning attention to its very object.

bashrc sourcing dates file, timer.

A game in which you had a limited amount of buttons for an unlimited/copious amount of actions and  you had
to decide which button which action.

Words, sentences, paragrahps, essay/book/treatise, are composed by the previous unit and are defined by
delimitation. The nature of textual units. Eveything has meaning, we assing meaning to everything not that it
has intrinsic meaning.

Minecraft making house underground vs overground, that underground is destroying as with an sculpting rock vs
starting from zero, filling. Underground has upper, lower and horizontal limit (roof+floor) and it is thus more
controllable vs overground that only has a lower limit, less controllable.
overground which only has the latter (floor)

Integrating AI into my work.

A quantity of ram allocated over periods rather than all at one point in time.

Independent function vs dependent function. To identify the independency of a function check if output changes
according to succesive inputs. Functions are relations, types of relations independent/dependent. Functions are
also structures, types of structures. In an struture, the meaning of tokens changes according to organization.
Verifying if a list/array is a function. f(x)=x/x=f(x)=1 independent or dependent. A vertical slope are
multiple function stacked upon each other. An horizontal slope is a many-to-one relationship, vertical is
one-to-many, and all the other functions many-to-many. n-to-n relationship, functionally, being x first and
y second, otherwise different meaning. Function without contemplation of procedure is black-box, domain is
black-box input and range output. Most math operations are defined around two parameters.

All numbers are outputs of all mathematical operations, many-to-many relation. Are there unknown mathematical
operations, math independent from mind, objective.

Repeating/periodic (from periodic decimal) functions, functions for which output repeats across inputs like
f(x)=x//2 and f(x)=xmod2.

At any and all points of a list it is sorted if landed upon and afterwards area all greater, lesser than or
equal, if ascendently or descendently.

Numerical line plus notion of time and intensity, order and progression of such line by such notions. 

Types of infinity/finity. It does not make sense to say: approaching infinity, or a a finite distance to
infinity. Starting/origin infinity does not start at infinity, given it doesn't make sense, starts at a finite
point towards the end that is finity.

Number 0 does not have start nor end.

Codepulsivity, code delayed gratification. logging module.

Code impossibility/improbability checker.
{{{python
if (abs(a)*b >= abs(c)*d[1]) == (abs(a)*b > abs(c)*d[1] or abs(a)*b == abs(c)*d[1]):
	pass
	
# Indexing conditions of a conditional chain, selecting conditions from a conditional chain, implementation on
# a progrmaming language.
if abs(a)*b >= abs(c)*d[1]:
	if condition_1: # = abs(a)*b > abs(c)*d[1]
		pass
	elif condition_2: # = abs(a)*b == abs(c)*d[1]
		pass
}}}

Program that formats code lines, and segments, according to the length of the current screen.

A structure is any set of which them constituents indivually separated in quantity and/or time: the original
being objective, outside time, the second concerned with the mind's eye membral prioritization; that is one
member that *previously* persisted in a fella's performant memory, and *afterwards* another that is, duh,
exclusively as such in relation to said persistence.

From the art of inference then, to either direction a member is *subsequently* perceived doesn't in and of time
itself signify a relative quantitative inclination, for a set about intensity, but that the global milieu in
liue, dictates an infitely negative point, that is left-handed, from which a quantitavely ascendent reflective
sequence of perception should start; therefore the direct association of posteriority with quantitative
greatness.

Operations that are demarcated upon the precedence of its operands be asymmetric structural operations:
conditional, divisive, comparative, exponential, radical, subtractive, etc. One identification for two
nominations, to operation and operand. However, the others that appeal to commutativity for an indifference
of order: addition, multiplication (thus), max, and min.

The more connections an idea has the more memorable is it. 

One's determination of the temporal relation between ideas upon the simple condition of, an unconscious
mekanism (sequential existence that indicates structure, like binary semaphore):
{{{python
mind1 = mind2_state = Mind()
mind2.add_idea('second')
if mind1.state[idea1] in memory and idea2 not in memory and idea_1.tmp_relation(idea2) 
}}}
multiplicative tradeoff, x+min max-x: of -1,+1 ab-a+b-1; of -2, +2 ab-2a+2b-4 , ab-a+b-1 = a(b-1+b/a-1/a) =
b(a-a/b+1-1/b), make sense of it, general formula?

passive income don't have to do shit, inaction, versus active income, in which you have to do action, that's
why active. passive income priority for decreasing action and thus time, passive income cheaper on time, active
more expensive on time. passive income one-time temporal investment, active infinite temporal investment.
investment is trade-off. maybe temporal investment upon passive income sources is greater at any one unit of
time, but it is of course greatly surmounted by active that is the same as multiplying a quantity infinitely
(x*float(inf)). an investment is a trade-off in which the loss is hopefully and desirably less than the gain,
the gain is greater than the loss (by some distinguishable extent, perception's limitation?). from active
income, one should further the breadth of passive income sources.

pyramid number progression, pyramid is 2d list, list of lists, list is a structure, structure is generalization
over computing list. a list is a representation of a structure, instances of generalizations are
representations.

newspaper paradox, that if only good news were displayed then good wouldn't be average, what is shown in the
news is out of average. control paradox, if a force controlling your consciousness and you dispute it, then
how do you know that force is controlling you to think that very same thing, recursion. how does the brain
determine the temporal inclination between

brain mechanisms for determing intensity and temporal inclination between things

A game in which you had a limited amount of buttons for an unlimited/copious amount of actions and  you had
to decide which button which action.

Words, sentences, paragrahps, essay/book/treatise, are composed by the previous unit and are defined by
delimitation. The nature of textual units. Eveything has meaning, we assing meaning to everything not that it
has intrinsic meaning.

Minecraft making house underground vs overground, that underground is destroying as with an sculpting rock vs
starting from zero, filling. Underground has upper, lower and horizontal limit (roof+floor) and it is thus more
controllable vs overground that only has a lower limit, less controllable.
overground which only has the latter (floor)

Integrating AI into my work.

quantitative intensity distance from 0, numbers. comparative intensity merely about greater and lesser,
comparison. quantitative intensity  individual units, not comparative intensity. as in verbs myriad vs large,
amount vs space.

gradable vs nongradable adjectives. metric vs absolute/binary opposites.

Warframe meta of farming, parallel farming, not quite being at the same time but at the same time window of mission.

If you buy all objects of certain type in a market, then the price can be so established arbitrary. Formal subject of economy through the game warframe.

Transcribing abuelo's story with balaguer.

Maybe all extremes of ideology (e.g political) are necessary for balance.

Observer's paradox from warframe vid.

Write a tribute to mom.

Pains that i am currently experiencing: lower right corner in the right part of rib cage when i bend over. Listing pains habit.

Schedule a muscle gaining routine for girls xd.

Getting money from multiple sources, doing multiple things at the same time = parallel money earning.

x*y = (x//x)(y*x) or (x*x)(y//x), same with y. tradeoff.

All numbers infinitely delimit to and from which to move of distances.

Fix my hair loss, early.

A program's control flow is the executive schedule of its computations. For any declared proposition the intention of adjacent execution will be thence disposed (or indisposed); for a
repetitionally patterned set of coordinations these can be abstracted to a uniques set that'll be haunted n times with the end's rim definite. The engrossment of un computational ruling
to habilitate, the other without, this being selection; the latter iteration. These are thus control structures assessing the content to futurely compute as issue of computation itself
for mathematical truth.

The order of procession appearing from topmost to on bottommost, this referenced as sequence. This direction opposed only towards vertical positivity during the iterative control
structure; I hypothesize this downward turn because of western writing.

A code unit is any finite set of computations.

Can a method be called as a function?

Happiness is proportional to pain, or viceversa.

Java it makes sense type casting double -> float or int, or any lesser storage data types?

Asymptotic function f(x) = x/x+1.

One can predict if code will jump back to loop with its condition.

Book about new human civilization in mars, from a male and female, after earth has been annihilated by asteriod.

Mental focus involves a narrower visual eye focus, as opposed to broader/more creative focus.

Java static object in non-static context error? In java you can't pass a function to another function as its parameter unlike in Python, :( Python is faster for the act of programming.

google adsense bot? Attention as a function of out_of_average(object) mental check, the infinitely impressing object that would always impress you for all its aspects, if something
impresses (it is out of average) you will attend it and it'll be better memorized? TikTok showing novelty which causes drawing of attention, and dopamine, which causes more searching
for more novelty and so on... a feedback loop

separating ideas written in inbox.wiki by day and relation subsequently With two line breaks by day and related ideas on same line It is more efficient to only use d It is more
economical/efficient storage-wise to separate text with only capitalization as you are sparing the punctuation with which the subsequent letter would have been anyway written.

Explore the idea of capturing the state of a human mind and reverting to that same past state Which would effectively mean time travel for yourself Useful for experiments Multiple
instances of the same thing in different temporal positions vs spatial positions Physical objects are differentiated by space By which they are said to be discrete from each other
Vs a differentiation by time By which one object is different from that same object in later or earlier time Same time multiple spaces vs Same space multiple times See this
bidimensionality?

oop more about the state of an object Its qualities While functional programming.

Converting code to factors = functions?

adjacently afterwards synonym list.

polytomy word.


capitalize on synonym for impose on Capitalization

Keep going on after exception in a program?

static vs dynamic typing https://www.sitepoint.com/typing-versus-dynamic-typing/

why can't do recursive definition of methods/functions in java


Plan for retirement videogames?

everything has an axiomatic limit ground.

A system, concretely deterministic, is a bijective/surjective function that maps states of a domain to other states in its range, in a one-to-one/many-to-one fashion.

The attachment amid a system's input and output, the bijective/surjective functioning, can be mirrored with an abstracted un, thus curtailing the complexity in those inducing states that
factor in onto output, for these preceedings need not to be asserted at the adjusted observe level of the behavior; this is called simulation: bear closely alike output through same input
by an abstracted process link.

A proper subset is an abstraction over its superset; an abstraction is a proper subset. Invariably, a parted decrease in cardinality, instantiating a non-empty set, poses an abstraction
over such subset's superset.
debloat vim Removing punctuation marks for less space

idealize, conceptualize syn. lt

cardinality, processor register

imitate, mimic, simulate, emulate, reflect, duplicate, replicate, clone, resemble, equal, equalize, mirror, parrot, repeat, correspond, reproduce, echo, recreate, remake, match

connection syn list

ways of writing: definition first then name or viceversa, the presentation followed after the content or viceversa.

partial syn lt.

inclement?

complex numbers, injective/surjective/bijective functions, feedback loop systems

dogma, doctrine, religion, ideology, conviction, persuasion

hit, stroke, blow, whip, scourge, lash

pain media: whip, lash, scourge

rod?

tool, medium, implement, instrument, agency

treating inequalities as normal equations: minus to one side minus to the other, same for plus and so on...

screech synonym of squeak.

type synoynm lt.

indicate as express synonym

merely attending an object shows its difference from its enviroment, that an object is defined by this notion of difference and discretion.

transient short-lived.

mighty syn list add magical

how do you know what you eat is safe and healthy for you, for certain?

function is just a reference to a line address in file.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Function_prologue_and_epilogue

programming language in which variables could be used as functions? programming language without memory? proramming language with only goto statements as variables as functions, that
in other to refer to their values would be to goto a specific line in file, cool concept mofo.

What medium does a powerful programming language confer for associating names with expressions? Variables (and functions too)?

It's the product of ponderation upon an idea the emergence of tangential, [...] (immature, software engineer) ideas. Anki way of memorizing words.

1.5+1.5 = 2(1.5) = 3 integer vs 1.5+2 = 3.5 always decimal/frac. therefore, 1.5*2.5. the index in the radical, by definition i guess?, can only be a natural number.

root aproximation formula?

exponentiation with fractional roots, choose a time to search for women later in age in another foreign country with women of my color and good noses :), True False association in 3d
cartesian plane state-> state is a function.

in nth root/radicals, if the exponent is even then the result is always positive, -- -- = + + = +, --- --- = - - = +, and so on.

negating a pair +- is same as swapping them, and for a list of pairs too: +-+- negated is -+-+

a/b/c/d = a/b*d/c.

vedic math book. registers in computers? decimal representation and decimal wikipedia pages. gait word. ams irrational aproximation

if a non-terminating non-repeating decimal, then infinitely changing, random number source, effectively?

rc file is run commands file, cf file.

In bash aliases, why does quote enclosing does not disable tilde expansion?

interval and sets and number lines and geometry line, ray, segment and finity vs transfinity vs inifnity in both vs one directions

Thinking about finite things is the average human experience, vs infinite objects. Weird, finite infinity vs infinite finite xd

Something is said to be similar to other thing when that thing is not similar to many things?

By the overbold jurisdiction of the flock, and baselessly not for its farther complexity and a contrapositve to lowercase, sets have been symbolically interlaced to A,B,C,X,Y. Nay that's
but a pint of the letters, I extend that to ALL letters with positive capitality: [A-Z].

In a set of two, a pair, the opposite of one is the other and viceversa.

globbing for files and regex for txt, globbing is a concrete case/specialization of regex, they're both regex.

Sustained focus will make switching again into focus easier, this is GOD.

script anothe word for program?

depend syn lt.

-(5+1) != -5+1, instead is -5-1, cubesumdiff

reciprocal of number vs conjugate

anki putting domains of special products and others

interesting property: root of quotient = quotient of roots, reversed?

contiguate as synonym for link.

in anki putting blank sentences is pretty effective

memorizing patterns in curses programs, of centering objects in screen and such.

getter vs setter methods/functions, review packet ap csa

gotta write every valuable thought down because then ill eventually incurr in it again, waste of time?

umbilical chord syn for basis

list comprehension python cant do multiple comamnds, sad, well only with function.

implentations of programming languages' library methods/functions, or built-ins, inside it by the user, like wrapper curses python my implementation.

im just gonna assume the domain to always be real numbers, anki, for the sake of terseness

rise start syn lt.

ankify java type casting stuff (int)a*b != (int)(a*b), and casting between different types. school ap csa. ankify stuff in cs packets too.

i can feel my pulse when adopt certain position upon my right hand.

why is anki sumOfEqualFactorProducts true? Delve into low level math proving stuff

Source code, or just code, is the set of symbols from which a program is made up of.

wherefore, thereof, whereby, thereby, thence, pronominal adverbs.

result syn ltW

An object is a data unit from the world scanvenged by anyone of the 5 senses, being thus subjectively: optics capacitated to only nontransparent spatial subsets, aux gated to a sound
frequency range, touch and smell under minima of weight and distance, taste to concentration. Why, a common factor melodically bouncing each, a limit to intel and awareness of the world.
A secondary battery of apparata sculpted by God unto us, and limited by him likewise for our sole fulfillment, that is: x+1 is higher while infinity therewith forgoes not that elevation.

One's existence's whole intent is one's effort for portraying God, which would be a blasphemous folly to ever even commit comparison with God, as obvious offset as finity to infinity.

capture, gather, get, collect, recollect, recover, pick, grip syn lt, apprehend, harbor, possess, obtain, acquire, scavenge, salvage, fetch, derive, attain, wrench, captivate, clutch,
snatch, ensare, annexx,

limit, gate

enthrallment

One will thrive inasmuch as one had suffered. One will desire inasmuch as one had thrived. One will thrive inasmuch as one had desired, given that the future remakes the past.

A function is a map from A↦B such that every instance of A maps to only one of B and every B is mapped by zero or more A, that is, all instances of A must be linked to one B but not all
in B must be linked by an A. B can be left unlinked if not already by one or more A. B can have many A.

Now dragging said upper frontier of references to B, imposing an exclusion up to one A per B, exhibits an injective brood of function, an injective function, which is made different in
the binary cardinality of A's that one B can dereference from. B can be left unlinked if not already by only one A. B can't have many A.

Surjectively, a function maps each A to only one B and B's are mapped by at least one A. Thus, there's no exceeding B. Two opposites, injective and surjective, for in the analysis of the link
cardinality to B, the former founded unitary or empty array, while the other, in an inversely ascending operation towards infinity, is of one or more.

And exempting this multiplicity of linkage, the bijective version is spoken for: any member of A mapped to exactly one of B and viceversa, any B mapped to exactly one of A. This being
product of stirring together surjective's and injective's accounts, every A maps to one B and every B is mapped to by at least and at most one A; Bijective functions are both injective
and surjective.

Two sets are equivalent if and only if a bijective function can be conducted from one to the other, that is, they carry equal cardinalities.

Injective/one to one function.

Surjective/onto function because onto alludes to the whole coverage of B by A, no element of B is left unlinked.

All surjections procure a lesser latter set if not equal, for all in it must be threaded to by at least one object. All injections procure a greater latter set if not equal, for all in
its domain must thread to one object. Straying from the principle of function for the latter by input unlinked, and paradoxically leaving output alone for the former.

elucidation word chatgpt xd

Inaslong as its posteior text unravels, the \r carriage return escape character doesn't prime the cursor to operate before the previously printed text, in place, it overwrites.

Newline/Line break/Line feed

python =+ or =- just normal assignment

\pm upside down is opposite sign, ye!

program that has side effects?

floor(x+0.4) == round(x), floor and ceiling functions staircase graphs

python compile vs exec vs eval

(8-8)*(-9+4) =  0*(-5) = 0-72 = -72, (8-8)(-9+4)-(8*9) = -2(8*9)+32+72-32 = -144+32+72-32 = -144+72 = -72, dsa

examples of surjective functions: abs, ceil, floor...

compulsive vs impulsive

brainiacally, mentally. somatic, bodily, men+tally ?

measure, gauge, span, length, dimension, extent, vastness, extension, stretch.

divide, bifurcate, split, segment, partition, from cut?

oneWillGainInAsmuchAsOneInvests/Loses youPayInRelationToAPerceivedWorthOfPayUnitsAndReward whatMightBeHardForOneIsEasyForAnother 6ft5GuyPullingCarrotsExampleGettingGoldFromCarrotBuying
person allThisRelatedToTradeoffInEconomics tradeOffIsIncreaseInRelationToDecreaseOrViceversaFromWhichAnExtremeIntensityIsPickedToDetermineAnotherState

(4-1)(7+2) = nb+(a+n)m = nb+am+nm+ab TradeOff Product is (a-n)

Comands are delimited by termination of their corresponding processes until the other one.

errors in code are just objects that are not linked as one state to another function

Nhumber for whole number and Nnumber for natural.

quantity,valence,quatum,adicity,arity,cardinality,number,numeral,assortment,set,group,list,collection,structure

python is so much easier/better for type casting flexibility, weakly typed language?

the greatest god-given endowment is abstraction.

temptation inhbitor device/chemical

theAbstractIdeaOfASetImpliesNoDirectionSetsHaveNoDirectionOnlyWhenAppliedTheSpatialPhysicalNotionGeometryIsDirectionAppropiateSetsVSSpaceVsDimensionTimerProgramInAllLanguagesThatIknow

Space as a function of time and two objects cannot be at same space position at same time or one object cant be at different positions at same time, function(time,space,object)
parametric function, time-space function is a bijective function, the nature between two objects to repel each other, two objects cannot be at the same position at same time.

economics of knowledge exchange, knowledge workers, from john locke essay concerning human understanding

content of structure vs order

When one is in hardship, the comforting resort for the mind is to think about a pleasurable think, of course.

java lambda expressions, learn 

fibClock.java c(a+b) = multipying each addend by c, if multiply one, how would be? variables for decreasing typing in competitive programming, uniline codeblocks vs polyline, with
conditions too, for cp? also interpreted vs comiled langs

a/b/c = a/b*c

bit = binary digit

at some point after resisting a change of state, there will be a critical point, at which the force of resistance will get tired and give away to temptation. 

melodysheep video human future, the greater a set of items, the more abstractions/subsets can be made of it, inevitably.

!= is < and/or >, from flag anki program for verifying if y == fH//2, or within screen coordinates

my desire for woman and porn and sex is an inner desire of love, and for being noticed in society, desire for love, maybe because i wasn't endowed with love?

computronium?

Im fascinated with curvature of the human nose, and roman nose, inquire into it

accumulator, constant change of state of variable until final result, recursion

sqrt(9-40) is perfect as sqrt(9+40), what is this called xd?

circle equation is just pythagorean theorem and distance formula too. why is the circle equation like that, connection with a*b=c, (a*d)*b=c*d

angle types by operation and range, supplementary and complementary, and obstuse ,etc..

chord special case of secant, circle fragment hierarchy

psionics, psi, chinese candle clock

posit meanign

overfitting statistics george hotz

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lindy_effect, george hotz

everthing is connected

betoken meanign word jordan peterson round table on numbers bible chapters.

For a latter random number to be certainly greater than the other expressed asin an interval, this un's rise must be at least equal to a sum of 1 with the former's maximum value
possible. Otherhandedly, for the converse case, its end instead so, must be at least equal to a difference of 1 with the former's minimum value; to post and prepone one segment with another.

finfinite set:sorted proper subset from an infinite set that has been started upon a first member

emolument,payment,money,grant,dowry

A span's aggrandization and another's downfall is a tradeoff, by either correlation and/or causation, intermediary to, in comparison, as the much of the original and such uptilted
quantities; mathematically: a+c b-d or, viceversa, a-c b+d, with respect on one to another such is tradeoff. The remarkedly economical facet of this is thereof, the
science of comparison and expedient election therewith, can be transcribed to one a triffling mathematikal rule of adding the inculcated operands and, merely when
they're positively or only negatively entitled, the choice will at once have choiced; otherwise, it is an image of the original.

Now put to say, multiplication of a tradeoff, a product tradeoff or different addend sumdifference product if you will, settles to, for the specific case of the added
and subtracted being equal, translucid inclination amidst a greater or lesser distance between the factors against the originals for the same opposite foresaid
relations; or which is also switching the pair order as equitatitve as negating a structure. The gap's gauge is machinated, the operands as two discrete units set off,
by a binomial product minus its original: (a-c)(b+d)-ab = ab+ad-cb-cd-ab = ad-cb-cd, that it beautifully apprises of, into a deeplower concretization, the sumdiff
product pattern these reals' equivalence satisfied: (a+b)(a-b) = a^2-b^2.

If it is posited that the addend and subtraend are unnull and equal, then (min(a,b)-c)(max(a,b)+c) < ab, for if one is null then the relation's structure is insistently
clear; the inverse is also precise: (max(a,b)-c)(min(a,b)+c) >=, that is equal when the addend and subtraend equal the difference between originals in that same order.

Thereby, it secretes from obedience to the algebra about abstract arithmetic norms that the any one of the factors or addends can be calculatively unveiled with the 

slope, tradeoff, decreasing vs increasing, slope is opposite of empirical induction idea from unconscious mind while semisleep

a-c b+d repeating trend pattern at some point, at which, 5+1 6-5 = 6 that infinite loop

(a+-n)(b+-m)-ab = ab+am+bn+nm-ab = am+bn+nm, when n = m and tradeoff + and -, (a+n)(b-n) = a^2-b^2, diff of squares -> product of sum and difff ye
(a±n)(b∓m)

clear,unambiguous,crystal,crystal clear,translucid,transparent,open,

polarity,extreme,inclination,knack,tendency,disposition,aim,proclivity.

sprawl vs home syn lt meanign

equation hours to money, example of my hour's worth 14 dollars, unit conversion between quantities of differing nature.

correlation vs causation as function mapping, conditionl vs biconditional operators for determination between the twoo

identity concept as the basis for math, all functions are identity functions, identity function parent of parent functions.

rube goldberg machine analogous to programming, connection to if-else one liners that i did for the leap year/or not program for ap csa class.

go to live to santo domingo, ultimately, to increase my chances of survival

The out-of-average human trick in order to catch someone's attention  better, analyse this

All these uncertain, lore heavy games are based upon an idea, and the bearings of that idea get impersonated into characters in the game itself. That the base of any lore rich game like
bloodborne is a simple premise that can be thus traced back.

theres two modes of life, delayed gratifaction and instant gratification.

probabilistic programming algorithms

erasthosenses sieve, prime numbers, looks like floor function a bit

escualido = scrawny

relegate meaning

wolf-bane menaing, the werewolf movie, jest that movie, backward and foolosh
dogeatdogworld

tome4 game systems, builds that are focurses around stats, just analyze game systems xd, offense vs deffense, debbufs, all that sutff, tome4, economics in here, steven yoder link
role of an engaing story in a game, like fo4

vignette meaning, half life alexelcapo

alexelcapo half life 25 aniversary context:
coalesce, link syn?, alexelcapo half life, ,silo, cabal, orthogonal, gauss gun, gargantua, surface tension, diegetic

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=__c2HfFxYco:pentameter

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7Zs4XDnhXzA:nub,uncanny valley,wheel of chaos, symbol of chaos,tabloid,parasocial,entitle,jose,porcupine,movie in which deaths are no bullshit quick xd
related to the no bs/honesty in this vid,bogged out, bug out

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-zaj2J7A-fM&t=1689s:yapping,pulling punches,revving them up,continous vs discrete space, fivehad move

structure of writing: defining then telling name or viceversa xd.,

serendipity

malady word

inextricable, for the good of the order doklan and humour me, wailing, exuberant, etc words from graphic organizer

https://123chill.to/tvshows/rick-and-morty-season-7/?action=watching&server=2&movie=rick-and-morty-7x6: stink to high heaven, anyone's game, grift/grifter

cater meaning, tome4 lots of difficulty to cater

providence meaning

desire resistance, three types of pain: emotional/physical and  desire, desire resistance, cognitive load, mental ambivalence, etc

accort = acortar

snake_case to camelCase and viceversa program, convert between all cases and PascalCase

euthenaize meaning

modulu operator function looks like sine or cosine, modus operandi

tantaalizing word meaning

incongruous menaing add to anki

Get your money up not your funny up duvany, discord

proleptic calendar meaning, network programming

oh, drats concept builder appled physicis, dataway concept builder, oath meaning damn

at its very source, recursiveness =  repetition? connection with mod operator, tam program

bifurcation, lop = fell, lopp = loop

crazy emily, name character for videogame gotten when nicho watching tiktok

maybe saying no out loud to a temptation helps more?

groove = habit, rick and morty, getting my groove back

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=b-YDWPio2T8: ensemble, locale

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8uwYo_M_I5Q: shawty

eponymous

cusp = cuspide

fafsa backup code: 1SNLPQMLJTRC

fafsa father info: 2 years business, ATP pilot certificate

code instructio pointer ip making its change  from line to line take less time, cpu optimization?, and control structures links to it, the progression of the ip over line graph theory

if something is receiving force, over time, then that resistance will eventually yield away, addiction

To evoke idea, feeling, to write, is to have power over the state of a mind, the very person itself

numerology and other esoteric sciences, witchery

one have the audacity/nag expression

treemap jonathan blow

from the sensible conduit of sight instantiated

A tentive object, or a perception,

If on two depth relations, relationS of relation, then such relation must be either appended at end or the line itself delimited underneath with one additional blanking.

the only circle with equal length and area: c=12 and r=2 or d=4, 2r=r^2, 2pir = 2pir, when d/2 < 2, r^2 < d and circ area is less than length, otherwise, greater, for pi assuming is not
3.14 xd, a custom value. also applies with normal pi 3.14. the unit circle has area equal to pi and its area is less than length.

a^2 = 2a, a^2 = 3a, rule: a^n=a*a*a*a..., related to prior, for a/b, if b/c < c, then (b/c)^2 <= b, for the 12/4 case, otherwise, >=. a more general rule for positive reals, extend to
negative ones

transaction is TRANSferring ACTION.

everything is recursion?, godel?

Seen that, first, a/b <= a, b >= 1 or b < 0, viz: a unit or one with a Part, but Unity, 1 upon which a is induced, will fit into the Retainer less than what's actually innit, barring
when it is the very foundation of the retainer under which it is invariant therefrom. More, the opposite quite not but with equality, if a <= 0 then a/b >= a for all integer b's; so that
with both minuses the quotient will necessarily be greater than both by their Cancellation. These hind mathematical properties can't help but shed the light upon the domain of dividends
and divisor that translate to a Fraction, by inequality of course,

maybe consciousness is self-knowledge/self-recursion/self-reference, seeing yourself in the
future, understanding other people through yourself, or recognizing yourself?, response to
stimuli, a computer?

art is a form of metareality/epireality. reality of a reality?/

metaperception, perception of a past memory or experience, self-knowledge, as related to consciousness. the ability of self or consciousness is related to understanding yourself through
experience of the interactions between objects in the External world, and understanding the outsie through oneself. all this related to consciousness. we are agents in the Physical World
any agent of any reality must be aware of its space, soever dimension.

time is a unidimensional entity.

code contracts

division is 20/2, for example, number of halves in 20 xd

There occurs a greater Satisfaction in anyun of an Opposite Choice, it appears, that Anxiety for each choice increases throughout time as one derives more Motivation pereach; Choice
Weighing: each Mental Iteration Per Choice increases the likelihood that it'll be comitted, Desire be prennexxed, thus, considering a choice will unindicatingly make the future one
farther likely. Free will implies Choice and Choice implies Anxiety, Behavior is the end of Anxiety thus, until whenever time. SOU, BETTER NOT HAVE FREE WILL, FOR THAT ANXIETY, OR LINGER
MUCH ON THE IRRATIONAL ONE...THE MORE TIME UPON CHOICE, THE MORE LIKELY; THE MORE ONE DOES NOT WANT TO DO, PROVIDED DESIRE, THE MORE PLEASURE WILL GET IN DOING, AND VICEVERSA: Action or
Inaction.

Choices are decreed by their Mutual Exclusivity, the Chooser's be, in nature: two choices cannot be taken at the same time for our Unitary Consciousness and Physical Boundness.

For a Temptive Choice Set, the Utility of each one is equal in the Sinful's Pain and Pleasure, against the Abstaining's Peace: the former economically Subtracts More Than Add, through
Social Denial, this berated by Rationality; whereas the cheek turnt to Abstinence will Peace suffice. PEACE > SEEKMENT.

Free Will is constricted by the Decision Set or the Utility Function, requiring a minimum of two for a Choice Set.

Reincarnation is Inifinite Dreamage.

Pain and Pleasure modulate Attention on their object.

All forms of Entertainment appeal to Emotion, and that's its entice.

It had presented too me, too late of course, to write of the upstanding Seductive Force that would absolutely and utterly befumble to the ground an individual, this Gentle Voice, of low
pitched nature, checked against my relaxtion affirmatively so, so much. It'd be a very useful Principle for enamoring women, or men alike...

Two quantities can be thought to be equal if they're directly correlated, at all extents and limits, in regards to the Object they represent. Fauly logical fallacy example: As effort
increases time increases and viceversa, thus, effort = time. Assign a proper logical fallacy term to this.

Any Behavior is aroused by Cultivated Desire, that is in turn if not Innate sparked by reaching some State of Self and/or of The World, reached by Social Approvation and/or the
attainment of that arbitrarily singular State. And Emotional Part?

Personality is Patterned Behaviors and Self is Memory + Patterned BEhaviors ,generalization.

Psychology is easy because its recursive through self. innuendo, shiver my timbers/topsails

common interest relation vs praisal?

Dominator punishment and control.

hipocrit past and self. mirror

craving desire yearning

get, beget, procure, acquire, obtain, attain, ingain, contract, appropriate, take,

not, naught, nought, nay, nix, negative

eat, feast, aliment, feed, consume, devour, ingest, munch, dine

forthput

except, barring

BABBBA rythm, temporal space plus pitch, that's music.

decretum, quire, barf, metric prefixes femto, acquit

python -8/5 = -2, java -8/5 = -1, python is more compliant with math vs java to the programmer's probable intention

number variable swapping with arithmetic: x = 6 y = 11 x = x*y, y = x/y, x = x/y, albert.io, and with addition and subtraction

python/c voice by me app, or pulseaudio lib in c. or low level screenshot.

6*6%10 = 7*8%10 = 4*4%10, pattern, gestalt psychology

Terraria MetaReality has each Real Update relatively conjoined 1/60th second of the Third Obverser's Time, ours: 60 TPS/FPS and 24 hours in 24 minutes thenfrom, the Update Speed being
reduced by a factor of 60 for this General Time Unit. 

gale: strong force
havoc, ruckus, prepotency/prepotence, potence, exponent.

arcade game needs not know of its past, while vs.

jab

n Theseus: Athena, Athens, Thor, Thalamus, Thesarus, Tessera, Thanos, Athanasius, Anastasio, Thalamus

Any Idea or Platonic Form, from the Ideal World or World of Ideas therefore, is an Object Encapsulation that is Induced from Perception Upon Self or Physique: the former treats with
Emotion that can't be Touched, naturally; the latter, wherefrom Physical Manifestations of these Properties and Laws are thus Referred, through the Wandering Eye laik so. ANYTHING THAT
CAN'T BE SEEN IS IDEAL.

The modus operandi of Attention or Perception is that, much to like Terraria's Wandering Eye, She wanders and meanders in Recursion towards Predilection or Interest, its Pristine
Pleasure; or Pain's Escape from the Player taken to cut She asunder.

Laws are Generalizations that Predict the Future. uniformitarianism

n travele: one who goes distant from home
pilgrim:=religious redhead jew,person who travels to a religious place=n,travel=v
journeytaker:terraria
traverser:geometry line
walker:hel=norse goddess of Hell or Hell itself, enemy god of war
tourist:americans in dominican republic
migrant:new york lots of latinos moving in
footer=bottom of text=end=a
mover:basic,spanish
tripdoer:stumble upon word
tripper=super metroid enemy name
navigator=program that allows Perception and potential Access to Objects
explorer:dora la
passenger:airplane
passer:=exam,one that goes by
voyager:voyage
wayfarer:wayfinder
wayfinder:game
pathfinder:asmongold secret diablo-like game
adventurer:finn and jake,guts is a dark fantasy
wanderer>=fallout 3 player name>=Lone Wanderer
peregrinator==pilgrim

Not a farway one of possibility for me being Highly Agreeable, that I have entailed Negativity to Disagreement from Childhood Punishment, and of course, due to the implanted Desire for
Social Compliance therewithin.

behavior<:n
demeanor>misdeameanor=minor crime=n,
mien:entry point,
manner:spanish,
proceeding:process
address:shipping,bearing
way:traveler,game
idiom:language,dialect
style:css,color,art
stride:bouncy mickey mouse
personality<patterned behaviors
outself<out
comportment:conduct
bearing:composition,position
account:online,narrative,report
deportment:nypd
attitude:angel grandma gave him self help notebook
conduct:pipe,warframe

disagreement<n
quarrel
strife
dispute
dissent
debate
argument
discussion
parley
difference
diff
conferring

ALL ONLY EQUALS ITSELF.

A woodsworker that twacks an orifice upon a stripe of wood, does too to the table, to the floor and underlow's, he has the Power of Force Transaction, this is the connaisance and
affectiveness between Physiques. The Force is Transacted by Application and in Energy Transference Chain From One To The Other, thus: INTERACTION OF PHYSICAL OBJECTS IS MERELY
TRANSACTIONAL IN FORCE.

Upon account of Plato it is picturable how would One's Figurine Distract in Understanding and Conscious Prolonging: the Body itches, icks, URGES, Innate Urges that're encrated in the
Subconscious to their Conscious Allocation. That one as vigorous and rich as Plato in Understanding and Deep Thought may want a cleansing of those Distracting particularities, without
the Body, but not me; his Platonic Dream for Disseveration.

The Subconscious pushes the Conscious One back from one's Line of Thought, upon the Understanding Checkpoint which towards goes the Conscious One, that he'll try if sufficently against
the Subconscious pushing back down, inasmuch as the Conscious asserts virility uptowards. Thus, the greater Conscious Virility displaces and belittles Subconscious Manifestation. But
Plato wilts his desertion from his Body, HE IS PLAINLY LAZY, it is that indeed my Dear Proctor.


donkey<>n
ass=arse

ass<>n,
buttock<ck
arse:deer thing

The Receptor Lemma or Premise prepones the Server's already attributed resolution of the Reference's Value, or Mechanism thereupon, that a Memory Address was Initialized with the certain
value in previata inwith the same Client and, thus, the Server can more effectively and less spatiously Communicate Data on behalf of the former Client.

metareferences in language, the vs a, which are pointers, HA, big HA

Hilarant Annexxation, HA, is a Creative Link between two Objects by Qualitative Abstraction that seems to Tikle the Brain and Soul, the deep Fabric of Self, HA ;-)

hedonistic and plato

haptic

The Terrarian MetaReality, as any Creator from Programmer, Matematikan, Pintor, and all, Bearers Of Reality, has their Ideas eventually scrutizined from Our External World, potrays a
Relative Time Unit 1/60th of our Second, besized by a factor of Sexagesimal, thus the trailing nifty equivalences: 1 in game day = 24 minutes and 1 hour = 60 seconds. Gravity could be
said to be stronger, if this web is connectedly made inbetween, in Our World than Terraria, according to Einstein's Relativity.

We, and duly so, as Agents of Space and Time, are constantly Perceiving and Thinking of them.

Its Enemy Spawing System, per World Update, is Player Position Based, and, excluding his 1x3 innocous contribution to Space: Enemies Spawn outside an initial 124x70 area, or 62 either
side and 34 up and down, excluding the Player's Hitbox 2x3; but nought piercing through greater a 168x94 area, or 84 sides and 47 vertically.

Enemies will Spawn outscreen because, given the maximum 1920x1080 monitor span, the game only allows for 60 and 35 Tiles horizontally and vertically.

https://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=2456755199

inertia force delay

The MetaPerception of Dream, that could be decided to be Reincarnative Memory from Past Lives of Recursive Reincarnation, or merely one a Perception of a Subconscious singular Interest
from What Beguiled Attention the Most Recently, but, anyrate, The Dream is a MetaReality: DREAM IS BUT A REFLECTION OF ONE'S GREATER ATTENTION AND INTEREST UPON REALITY, OR THAT IS
REALITY IN INVERSE? And Deth could be Dream or Truth, Relatively Uncertain, a Dream of Void or an Awakening unto Truth, or into another AnaDimensional Object from the Secreted
Consciousness or Soul.

Human Comportment can be traced to the Three Branches of Primal Emotion das

Two Objects are Realatively Uncertain if a Relationship between them is only structurally denoted by Perceptive Normality, other than an the Nature of the both themselves that is otherly
equal, in which case a type of Self-Reference or Recursion.

ART IS METAREALITY, THE DEPICTION OF ONE'S REALITY WITHIN ITSELF.

MetaPerception = Memory.

All Percpetion hast an Objective and Subjective component.

Meta is the Recursive Prefix.

Pride reductio ad absurdum, abuela case.

Women facial patterns for monsters.

Psychology is easy because within Self.

The Writer's Spirit that tells him what words to put ideas into.

Babel is small, like Mrs. Babel.

Rage shows our ultimately egotistic nature, egoistic.

Bloodborne Towers represent other dreams.

Messengers worship the Hunter.

Circumference for sound pitch/freq.

Exercise is work against Gravity.

Attention time and Emotion increase with Memorability, biconditionally? mmeory enconding vs decoding

metaprogramming, metalanguage

Every action, or thing, has a certain "feeling" to it, like kistler's new woodglue feeling, perhaps can use/leverage that for writing.

metacause cause of cause, vs formal cause immediate cause before another, causal chain

blob as sort of test name in programming, tam program.

politic as synonym for directive/norm/rule

anime in which demons feed off shame

perculator, coffe, perculate

the worse the more pleausre and the gooder the more pleasure, as it approaches zero less pleasure? antithetical lines

doxo prefix of doxography and doxology, meaning belief/opinion

I'm The Alpha (1, α, A) and The Omega (ω, Ω). Alpha and Beta Male; dominance hierarchy, manosphere. Alpha and Beta program version.

Gamma: 3, γ, Γ, ceil function, gun Fallout franchise; Digamma/Stigma/Episemon: 6, ϝ, F, ϛ. Delta: 4, δ, Δ, beta male, math difference or change; Epsilon: 5, ε, Ε,
infinitesimally small rational real that isn't zero but approaches it very closely.

Zeta: 7, Mothership Zeta Fallout 3 DLC, Zathura movie, spanish letter pronunciation, letter of GOD.

Eta: 8, η, Η, η-reduction lambda calculus, economics elasticity, eta theta; Theta: 9, θ, Θ, 

random number i thought about 11126408

tear proper superset destroy: rip, crumble, tease, 

v shake
vibrate:sex toy,physics concept,singing;quiver:atreus arrow,waiver;shudder:lift:n=elevator;tremble:milk sickness;waiver:key lower?;quake:n=earthquake, Musk was very good
 at this game;convulse:epsilon,key epi prefix group?

p epi: over,above,upon,atop
epilepsy, epiphany, epilogue, epic, epinephrine

infinite squares explain everything make in graphics2d java lib

11146408 and 11126408 random numerals meaning, bibl

perfect, over, under, imperfect numbers, self divisor thing

factor = divisor

It is argumentative scaffolding of great sas, but can't help but to impose a bijection between falsity and truth to absence of member, an empty set cardinality, 0,
against any real degree of being or presence or containment R > 0 + R < 0, if you will. Evenmore, gift a confitting oration of surjective function to 1 and beyond!;
if there are not link to a parent set, no member no set, neither so any mode of being.

Under such premise of condition or boolean type casting should number be returnt bool, or optatively, making a drastic change to 0 and 1 as measures to booleans and
assigning them other logos; dsa

Equimetric Vector-Boolean Map: -1 and 1
Bit-Boolean Map: 0 and 1
Nonzero-Boolean Map: 0 and R < 0 < R

The presence degree of a set is its cardinality.

0 is The Absence among presences and The Absence of Presence and The Presence of Absence; 0 is The Null; 0 is The Empty One and The Empty Set; 0 is The None and Nothing.

1 is Presence; 1 is Unity and The One and The Un and The Unit, and The First and The Zeroeth; 1 is The Foundation and The Abstraction. 1 is The Discrete:

a^x-a^y, x E Z = GCF(a^x-y-1) OR

Operation with convergent factorial descent for and amongst its operands, all of them for pluses and minuses or merely the abstraction of them thus that's the other
of multiplie: ca+-cb = c(a+-b) = cd; fore is, in equity, or rather common factor upon all numerals to be wilt abstracted for the contrapart: c(a+-b)/c = a+-b, which is,
correspondingly, cd/c = d. 

A number A is a generalization over B if the latter's cardinality is lesser, alluding to the antipolar abstraction thereupon.

The inciting geist of numbers, that are made of and generalize smaller numbers and make bigger ones by said, towards it in reverse abstraction, to one's ease of
reason and with limitless incistence. That's the ideal beauty of quantity, being able to be infinitely incursed.

Seen first that a/b <= a, b E Z, 

n(n+1)/2 *1/2 = half of 1+2+3... half addend?

Surmise there's distinctibility between and against two civiles upon A Quality of an Apple, it is not 

How gorgeous is the beauty of Attractive Multiplie, or, upon a greater Canopy of Generalization, is the Aritmetik Sekuence for two elements one from Origin and
Terminus, perviewed Each After Each until the Meeting Middle, this nation pertaining to the half subtracting end and start, the Offset thus. Being one and other, if
odd, or one center if even, with belowing the Greater and embiggening the Lower, this one constrainingly.

And their Product can be expected, so desiriously! To be a reincarnation of Circle, and in succession one encompassing within's recursively, all liberated from a common
center: Shell Sequence.

Never ever any application by which subtraction and addition, TradeOff, may result in lesser but greater quantification that would be leniently deduced for Taking
inasmuch as Gaining, grantt Attracting operands, that for Addition says equality while Subtraction, otherwise Absolutely lesser or Latter Greater, will tenant for the 
positive absolutely greater and the other lesser, a lesser uner Offset thus. How gorgingly I take this Greater Generality, oh this serveful and good fruit, oh that it
has a bitter end: it follows structure like the Subtractive case, wherein it inuner is if reversely, Lesser and Greater, otherwise lesser.

TO RECURSE IS TO REFERENCE ONESELF, THROUGHOUT A FINAL PROCESSION WITH A BASE CASE, OR IN UNQUENCHABLE PRETENSION BEDOW INFINITE RECURSION.

psreponderate, gulag, dredge, galvanize warframe weapon

imperial units of measure xd

Everyone has a Writer's Spirit that tells him ideas

Beauty Genocide/Project: eliminating all uglies from world, good satire

Sickle word. Succubus vs Incubus Berserk

Bloodborne bloodletting beast - A behavior too close to emotion is a Vice.

stoicism disparity between expectation/imagination and stimulus, the fundamental premise of stociism, that the pain felt in such disparity is greater than the pleasure
in expectation?
Laundromat

Thinking about or working on an idea per day, like with games too, or even per month?

The more something happens the more likely the next time, or totally the opposite.

WHW - What, How, Why

All those you know, but have not physical contact with, are always in one's life, one just has to look for patterns of face and behavior.

Theoretical videogame enemy that'd be like a cube, that he would move around it.

Even if the Response to a Behavior is already Imaginated, or Deduced, ONE CAN ONLY PREDICT INASMUCH AS ONE KNOWS, not to always correct.

Bloodborne symbol that i saw in space, constellation?

The more restrictions and rules on behaviors, the better life?

It'd be very funny, and prideful of course, to invite people to my would be house, serve them food, with an arduino score screen xd, ha

Program that'd allow the picking up of virtual objects like a physical interface.

Drawing for Imagination is the Art of Abstraction.

The End Behavior of a Function are the Points, as Generalized to be always degrading or increasing within a Quadrant, to all the other Directions of Coordinate System in relation to
Horizontal Xsation: Left and Right. WHAT IS THE RELATION AMONG ALL LEFT AND, SAMELY, FOR RIGHT, UP OR DOWN? Let to wonder not that, otherwise, the name for said at current unlaborious
conception means other than the Curve or Line, in both its ends, the Function and Graph extend towards.

The Quadrants of a Coordinate System are made separate by Inequality from Origin, which what they are of course, at a one such discrete infinite area to be x > 0 and y > 0, the First;
x > 0 and y < 0, the Fourth; x < 0 and y > 0, the Secondth; x < 0 and y < 0, the Thirdth.

Units are just References, equally accountable for they're Abstraction that Map To an Object or State, or Data, as independent from what it Dereferences To. And, much to copy Computer

Reference, it is a must of have the Property of Discrete: that one Reference must commit difference with all others but, in spite of, can indeed hold the same Value.

cull, tilt meaning

Reference, it is a must of have the Property of Discrete: that one Reference must commit difference with all others but, in spite of, bijectively.

My Line Of Stride while Running happened to dwell in sight upon the same pattern of angles and points in the Moonlight Sky, AHA, that it is a Constellation, one found that had yet to be
found! This Tetratic Constellation, at precise present, has been exhibited to me with four Stars, thereupon, and a Biangular composition of Obstuse ones with a surfeit of equality
amidst.

Hail and much adulatation to Light of Discretion in Our World, in the Physical Space, for in its permeation over it One Can Discern Between Physiques, that is, by the
Color that it paints, differently amongst Physiques whereby any notion of Depther, Downer, or Upper and all alike, is procured. DISTANCE, DISCTINCTION, OR DISCRETION,
BETWEEN PHYSIQUES IS ONLY PROCUARABLE THROUGH COLORATIVE TRANSITION FROMWITHIN PERCEPTION. And this Relation between Physiques, if at one's end the other's start doesn't
immediately appear, hence with Distance between, is agreed to be Open or Free Space, apart from proving by Touch that is; LIGHT HASTILY STIRKETH THROUGH THE PURELY
TRANSLUCENT AIR TOWARDS OPAQUER OBJECTS, OF COURSE, THAT ARE SAID PHYSIQUES.

The fact that either Bounces or not, a Polynomial Function at some Point, is rather to be more satisfactorily defined as an opposite change in direction from prior or
lesser Point. Consequence given that, because for a Square the Output will only identifiy as 0 or more, even with the X Squared by itself or it subject to
Transformation thereof, this the Case of Evenness; now it turnt to the Oddness strand, one can evidently see that Negative Composed with Positive Yields Negative as Odd
Is Even Plus 1, and thus, just after the Empty Result there'll be an Xaxial Cross from Zero, conversely to Bounce.

The Quarters of Circle parted by the Middle Cusps amongst its Curves, are, by any sucession of two such quarters and two right angles, they're structurally identical in the homogenic
procession from Left to Right Greater, or Left to Right Lesser; videlicet that at fundament there's a Parabola, of two Curvilines, with an ascending or descending structure to both left
and right, viceversa in a HalfTurn. The latter one, however, opposes this Uniformity at any Adjacent Quarter unto a subsequent one thus. CIRCLES HAVE 2 PARABOLAS AND 4 CURVILINES.

blodborne vermin, monster? alimana.

12/2/2024
When Two Physiques At Touch Commune, whither extent one will go if decomposed not, or the one that decomposes within the Noticeable Scale, I etch to be the former
Winner: it went the least distance from Clashing Point or the Loser broke, or it mingled inwithin less mass, Acceleration is Inversely Proportional to Mass, and, ergo,
happened to move a greater yonder. These Atomic Masses Clash at Each Other and connect to stomp upon ground downwwards Earth's Suction, when, through enough Atomic
Attraction to be vested Solid Physical Structure, are not carried on by Wind, thus the Physique accelerates downwards with the Normal Force the ground is, that by
Friction slowed down and subjected to its Natural Motion, with said Earth's Gravitational Pull downwards; otherwise, then it portrays in the walks of Gas: carried on by
Wind.

Functions are Discontinous for values that their Range is foreign to.

Asymptotic Lines are those Limitted to Zeroe.

foreigner, outsider, outlier, outcomer, immigrant, 

There's a Matematikal Model for All Points Between Two Points, would one want to Deduce the Unknown Through Known: which by Relating Known, the surmise is preconceived that it shall be
be echoing about that Relation, this one is beckoned by Linear InterPolation. It is, philosophically interesting and deep, in coming to newbornly Knowledge with the Mind, that scuttles
towards it with its burrowed Expective Patterns That Plight Before Normality, albeit only an Approximation to be thus taken with suspicion and lighthood; Logical Threading is used, that
by thought, Conclusion Upon Conclusion are threaded together, and this how, is to be attributed, from the Interpolant, the Interpolation by equal relation.

Specifically, a Primary Cause, Condition, or Premise is weighted, for the first point, and a Final Effect or Conclusion that is to be traced baed on the Interpolant Relation. That for
Logical Threading or Thought, which could be said equally for Intrinsic Relations. THIS, BY IMPOUNDING NECESSITY OF INTERPOLATION, MUST BE IN SEQUENCE AND INTOWARDS THE FINAL
CONCLUSION AND FROM THE PRIMARY CAUSE, OR BY VIRTUE OF TEMPORAL ORDER THAT IS, WHEREIN EXTRAPOLATION WOULD BE DEEPER IN THE ABSTRACTION OR COMMONALITY BETWEEN POINTS, PRODUCING A MORE
GENERAL RELATIONSHIP, THUS EXPANDING THE CATEGORY OF THE TRIADIC SET, RATHER THAN NOT IN INTERPOLATION: WHICH, DEDUCTIVELY TOO, SEEKS TO CONNEXXION TWO WITH A MIDDLE.

It is Brain Tickling, or Rubbing, that this Logical Threading in Thought is entitled, in affinity with a knitter's handiwork of threading to artify an Artful Piece: the Logical Tinkerer
that, according to his System of Perception adjusted to his External Environment, will accordingly equate Perception to another in reason, EMPIRCALLY IN ESSENCE, and he'll therewith
expound Arguments and claims and Engage in the Process of Reasoning by the Induction or Deduction.

There's predominantly two sources, one and opposite to another, by which, its cogs' work, Propositional Justification: by either, one is the product of ideation on mind and inference by
some conceptual rule, wherein ideas are bound by axiom, ultimately, or abstraction or generalization; and, thenwards, one other such is the product of External Examination by some of
some Subjective Truth or Quality from the Senses fetched. 


Love implies Repetition.

The Tactile Excitation of third law?

some conceptual rule, wherein ideas are bound by axiom, ultimately, or abstraction or generalization; and, thenwards, one other such is the product of External
Examination by some of some Subjective Truth or Quality from the Senses fetched. 

Everything and evry notion in the mind is derived by relation between ideas or objects: be them equal or unequal, and things are derived thence.

15/2/2024
Heregain tis mien, At Relation Generalization, whichthru the matematiks of Limit borrow upon and advertises itsely: by a the Inductive Conondrum passing that it bears
one an equation to a certain number towards which the number in homination tends onwards, the difference itself ever shalt dicreaseth, thusly, THE APPROACHING IS
APPREHENDED TO BE LIMITED BY NUMBER THAT IT TO REACH NEVERWILL, AND THOSE PROGRESSING VALUES ARE GIVEN THEIR SEQUENTIAL RELATIONSHIP TOWARDS SAID LIMIT.

oldest<:extremely early in time<aj,
eldest:gentry
primeval:spring season in spanish
ancient:egypt

Relation between numbers and the geometrical vertices in them.

connection
crosstanding

dunderhead<:n
crabhead

The Love of Oneself is Love of the Soul Versus Love of Flesh.

Tallow-catch, knotty-pated, shakesperan symbologies

The damn HollowHeaded One, Amygdala, has insisted to my death and begritted me much, and hast eroded on my will and patience for its, wretched fuking beating. Hitherto, that I have
discovered, took abortive pains of course, dancing Under Amygdala's Tail, that me being slithered under it shall see to its damage after all of its Attacks Patterns, as me learnt
with said unfrugal disgust.

Degratiate the HeadPoked, he has drained my left termination in supply of Patience and Motivation. I'm most feeble not for, with more fingers than palms, enumerating Trial and Error
attemps at Seeking State, or at least more than Socially Normal, and I'll thus head to the Soothness and Lightheartedness of Terraria, ALAS BE MY GRIT.

Victorious have I suceeded, with trembolously scribbled words and much excitement, in finally defeating the Bloodborne Amygdala, using the previously eloborated UnderTail Strategy. This
will make my night's sleep, and for some reason that I hold this Mental Itch to have been subconsciously dragging me down in me not being enough resillient to keep trying until, for I
drifted onto the LightHeartness of Terraria, I HAD GIVEN UP ON A PURSUIT WHICH IS AMBIVALENT, FROM SOCIETAL STANDARDS, TO MY CORRESPONDING BELIEF IN VIRTUE OF UNRELENTLENESS OR GRIT,
this will make my night's sleep one more drenched in satisfaction and fulfilment.

hole<:inequality/unevenness<n,
nook:crooked finger,and cranny:fissure:icicle,spearhead,griffith sucidial attempt with pointy stone
crevice:crest
hollow:insincire promise,empty phantasasm shell<bloodborne weaponic buff arcane damage 60 lasts 60 seconds cost 3 bullets get byrgenwerth central tower top
recession
depression

Fear of the unknown is only a type of fear, that is, fundamentally, aversion of pain, survival

Quadratic functions are nooks/holes syn group, trianguluation.

fromward, gad verb, hinter prefix bloodborne hintertombs hinterland gow egypt setting gods, indispensable, hiatus, hi prefix

potential energy, engineering tech 1

naval is ombligo in english gp

many people just live life and understand it through black boxing, not most efficient i'd say, better understand deeply

in the walks of phrase by me

option, case, alternation, choice, numeration, enumeration 

12/3/2024
I dreamt that God forsook me and I felt very bad and sorrowful afterwards, ronald was in that dream, i had decided not to greet or salute anyone, he got mad, that was wrong?

invoke, summon, convoke, evoke, conjure, call

lerping, limits, continous functions, euclid's elements book, etc

14/2/2024
cohort cohesive coercive coerce, extenuate, corral, reprisal, exodus, excommunication john wick

inclination<:expression of discrete object as in relation and opposed to another<n,
propensity,
predilection,
preference,
extremity,
extreme,
bias,
knack,
focus,
discretion:conceit,
one:un:warframe konzu plains of eidolon comic,oneness:dabness guy in class,
unity,
singular,
particular,

showcase, exhibition

stipend, benjamin frankinl work and west chester u email, pell grant revenant movie pell robbage, tonic vodka, atonic, parade birth,

onity is oneness

wandrous or wanderous is crazy.

compendium, providence.

im obsessed with noses, roman

harbinger, bloodborne heart, hunger

hill
mound
heap
protrusion
curve
curviline
parabola
irregularity
swell
surmission
surmount
convexity<all polygon angles less than or equal 180
lump:gnarl

recession
submission
depression
concavity<one polygon angle is greater than 180

mathisfun is very good source for math explanations, of all echelons seems like

link<:nonempty intersection between sets<n,
relationNT
similarity
commonality
intersection
connection
annexxation
pattern
repetition
union
unity
bind:bid
bond
knot<parabola,1.85 km/hr
tie
equality
equivalence
equipollence
reminiscence
web
bridge
middle
affinity
likeness

being like miyazaki, imagining the meaning of words before looking them up

fafsa contributor backup code F4J8RJGXE1CA

in tandem = together

20/2/2024
With the consciousnes that is given to a Desire or Behavior whichabout it is by one Part of Self Good and conversely Bad by the other, it is a an Opposition of Tugs toward anyun or a
Wantacious Friction forasmuch. This Desire is Cultivated for that which innate not, by the stronger Coalescence of Stimulus to Behavior pereach time acted upon, it becoming more Bestial
Desire and the host itself thus by every one, as Wantacious Creeper of Mind, unscrupulously Beckon Attention of self and should one be a weakling and pursue to one's demise from one's
irrationality, of those positive reinforcing slavic deportments; therefore, as I had adapted the notion of Bodily Muscle, have Feminity not been suscitated on it and praised it enough
for its thereby strong instation in One's Remembrance, or Bodily Endurance, tis offers the same way for Strengthening the Temptive Faculty: by grating it towards Abstinence
iteratively. THE KNOT BETWEEN STIMULUS TO BEHAVIOR IS STRENGHTENED BY EVERY SUBSEQUENT POSITIVE ACT... AND STIMULI ARE INFLUENCED BY PREVITY GIVEN THAT THE SUBCONSCIOUS, AND FROM THE
SECONDARY MEMORY WHICHWITHIN IT IS STORED, SHOULD THE CURSING BE JURAMENTED UPON MEMORY AND FIRST OF EXPERIENCES.

Adduced been this, I rationally and reasonably introduce, therefore: one should by WillPower and awareness of the Pain in Pursual Abstain fromt the Undesirable Desire refrain from that
vile connubiality and any stimulus sakefor, pray one be made fortress in GOD and Logos for the Demonic Temptation, may they also be Demons the Sinful Desires but a Reflection of
Fractured Self, as Gut's Alter Ego, the Beast of Darkness, is an antropomorphization of his Alter Ego of Darkness, gnawing in constantin ad hominem Gut's Alter Will. 

Desire is firstly Cultivated upon an Acquaintance with Pleasure that is prioritized by the Subconscious and stored in Secondary Memory, with the Causal Stimulus, consequently,
IF THE BAD MORALE OF AN UNCHEEKED BEHAVIOR OR GOAL, A RATHER UPTONED CURIOSITY FOR THE PLEASURE KNOWN TO OTHERS, THAT THIS RESPECT BEHELD, ONE SHOULD NOT FOR MY SANCTIMONY STRAFE ALONG
THE ACCURSED AND GLOOMED PATH OF THE INCEPTION OF VICE.

Walking towards My Haven, I ere set talon offrom the school's vessel, I happened swiftlily after to tend an Ebony Crow sat upon an electric cable partaking in his expected cawings that
one would imagine so, in the yonder, but upper I heard another bird's tongue that I quickmindedly associated, in Battle Against Evil, it to be White Dove God watching on me, invisible
for I had been decepted in looking skyward, it ever lieth within me contour not, inserted at this particular braid of time, at the poisonous imbibings, whichfore I had worked on myself
a long healthy and of ease Abstinence from the Bestial Lust of Woman and the Boundless Seekment in Internet. IT SEEMS TO ME, AT LEAST, OR MAYBE I'M DELUSIONING MYSELF WITH SELFSUGGESTION
OF A GREATER PINPOINTED FUTURE THAT I SHOULD BE MORE CONTENT 'BOUT, THAT IT IS NOW MORE APPARENT THAT I POSSESS A GREATER CAPACITY, THANK god, OF TEMPTIVE RESISTANCE IN THAT I KNOW MORE
KEENLY THINK ABOUT LIKELIHOOD INCREASING WITH EVERY SUBSEQUENT ACTION, AND I'M IN GREATER APTNESS TO AVOID DOING IT, NOW THAT THE HARDSHIP OF PROGRAMMING ISN'T MILKING ME OUT MORE NOT,
AND I'M BASKING MORE IN THE DELIGHT OF PROSE WRITTAL.

THE CULTIVATION OF VICE IS A POSITIVE FEEDBACK LOOP FRO AND TO DESIRE AND BEHAVIOR, FOUNDED UPON THE CATALYST OF DESIRE BY A CERTAIN STIMULUS, CURIOUSLY PRECONCEIVED IF BEGOTTEN BY
CONSCIOUS LURKATION.

STIMULUS LEADS TO BEHAVIOR AND BEHAVIOR LEADS TO STIMULUS, THUS, STIMULUS LEADS TO STIMULUS AND BEHAVIOR LEADS TO BEHAVIOR: BEHAVIORAL FEEDBACK LOOP.

The Direct or Primary Cause is the one that concurred first the forest at a time, for Effect, that is oversailt by Leading or MetaCauses and is, the Principle of Extremes From Middle,
owing therefore to the unleaping inference for it, of any other before said primogenit one, to be a Cause, hence, what should one conclude is the distinction between both names of cause
and that they thereon collude in tandem for the general term of Cause. The Cause in Our World has a donned time component, that is a Generalization over Logical Structures, which an
individual may express such Causal Chaining the thought is equated, subconsciously, of a temporal distance between these Changes In Estates, that Inertia applies to every of our Spatial
and Physical Gutturances that one makes tenttion to, as it is all crowned upon Motion, but, nevertheless, are in vere a mere alternation from truth to truth that the Logical System
crutches on. STATES HAVE MULTIPLE CAUSES BUT ONLY ONE DIRECT CAUSE; THEREFORE, THERE OUGHT TO BE A FUNDAMENTAL CAUSE.
 
Relation of Moon in Bloodborne and Berserk. in Bloodborne and Berserk.

craven: cowardly,coward related to bloodborne, kraven the hunter mavel, crazed
consternation feeling of annoyance,anxiety,pain?
convent of nuns, spanish
don: wear, related to berserker armor, viking wiki page
oft: often
jurament:promise
gondola:boat
splinter:split?
coalescence:combination
tug:opposite pulling forces
chaperon

understanding that any subsequent relapse will make it more likely for a future one is crucial for habit breaking.

1 2 3 are fundamental numbers, like the tetraktys

combine: coalesce, collude, in tandem

The Platonic Idea or Quality, all, is the substance from incision upon the chord between Object and State from which it is seen and Generalized, the grappling thus at the Dissevered
Quality, for telling of or consideration as if it lieth separate from mind, which not is, nor it is being attuned to sense by a supremacy: this is rather not that which we are innately
born to capability with, or reach to access some portal through which those Platonic Ideas are supplied, literally, but something that we develop about One's Normality and he thonking
sir left was not too; all this said, so much troth, inasmuchas his description is taken with the gruntness of literacity and unintent upon the Metaphorical and Figurative interpretation
which more so weaves to his prosal flamboyancy. Or was to his Mind known waveringly, that it follows as an implication, said Platonic Form is of another distant mother
in being, whatnot but Mind, and is relative and dependent upon Our Imagination thus breeding not unto our sensibilities witihin the PhysicoSpatial World: QUALITY OR ANY
IDEA IS NOT REAL, ONLY SPACE AND PHYSIQUE; WANDERINGS AND IMAGINATION ARE BUT AN ILLUSIVE IMITATION FROM THE MIND, A WAY TO COPE WITH SELF INSUFFICIENCY AND WORDLY
CONFUSION ABOUT ONE'S PAST EXPERIENCIATION. That Plato's protests an eager head for Death, lifting a fair excuse, to be sure in consciousnes departing towards a good
mode of being of thought and reasoning, deriding the Body, in its Desire, and Senses in their variability hindering one off drinking from the Fountain of Truth;
ONE'S SENSATION UPON THE EXTERNAL WORLD IS PERVERTED FROM TROTH, OUR INFORMIDABLE TOOLS FOR SENSATION REPRESENT THE SEPARATE REALITY, INDEPENDENT, BLURRINGLY AND
IMPERFECTLY. Therefore, Plato's Commune with the World Of Ideas, of Patterns that have emerged in lifetime amongst objects of attention, is to be embraced dearly as the
inconstancy and imperfection between those objects would be nevermore, and the Idea would be compactedly a torrent of greatness within one's reachings of thought, there
would be a beautiful asimplification of the due perceptions wherein one be left the business of reaching the level of compatibility until all the imperfect
incongruities were cast away, THERE WOULD MERELY BE A PERFECT CONSTANCY.

Relaying of Language through either Hand or Mouth, even if Abstract Ideas are eventually kinsman and envision some specific image in Mind, works in the likehood of the Platonic Form
to its Physical Manifestation, it is a similar process of Qualitative Encapsulation, what these Forms represent tis transition fore exhibit, within a nice Singular and General Packet of 
State, Quality, and Knowledge.

posthumous
limbeck
attune
gall

When a bypasser strolls across the earthly slate, he encounters what is a Hole, his concern being not such to the extent of another's artwork, the Walker bends the
instance of touching over it to the mandate of naught could he drop in pain, tis done in custom; subsequently upon another voyage, he at once notices his feet to be
within that undesired container of Hole, after which he, with no busy business of time and having centrifugally reeled the foot, notices that he did not fell, thus,
having had touched it, he now knows the Hole's depth is but falsity: he was a blind subalternate of Hasty Generalization, that, EVEN IF A QUALITY SPREADS OPEN HER LEGS

BEFORE YOU, ONE SHOULD FURTHER EXAMINE CORRESPONDENCE THROUGH THE OTHER SENSES. This is a case of Separate Reality which we are Learning Agents of, of Truth, that permits ClairVoyance.

expugn, impugn, hermit/hermeticism/hermetic, reel, stroll

tasting food is like pondering on a thought, correspondence between senses

perhaps we only like persons inasmuch as we perceive our beauty as a coping mechanism to not get rejected, like my case xd
famish:hunger

Communication between agents, with language, is like encryption and networking, book cipher, platonic ideas are what the message refers to abstractly

mead = cervesa beer?

pockets of stress, brian defining all physiques by geometrical areas.

wickowl, wickwall, wickwoll

True * True, True + True, in python vs java, using other mathematical operators for logic gates?

quell?

the sobbing of a person is a pretty stressful and anxious thing to hear, especially as a tv background noise xd, guttural sound of pain worst to my distress

comte<man from nobility,knight
decaminous<low/bad/deplorable<deca<px
punch<in a barrel,punchard,hole

decidious<shedding its leaves in fall and regrowing in spring<inconstantly changing<dynamic
bract<leaf from the axil of which grows a flower<axil<angle between leaf and stalk from which it grows<stalk<main stem

cordate<
heart shaped<n,
cordiform<cuniform

reaper<deathsetter

https://pressbooks.bccampus.ca/greeklatinroots/chapter/10-latin-nouns-first-declension/

perch:terraria bast

25/2/2024
the writer, as the drawer, is interested with the abstracting description of objects, as in language, given a more general tree abstract it in describing its particular
qualities.

frame and rack, interjection meaning

26/2/2024
My HungryQuencher that I am most beloved to is in counterbalance the more harbringer and pestering to me, of me lips can not Abstain her red, drowningly untiming
scourge of Social Expectation, intimating itself to every unabiding fella: TIA LUISA. Though for that, I should, and needn't, scold with my mind by that deed as I'm,
as observed by anyone a longer, thriving in a wealthily propitious Pool of Leisure, my Fatherly GrandParents giveth not a shilling such that is my personal business of
Hard Thought and Gaming, rather, she that cast her ferocious thunders upon me, through my Father's oration, after I had left some untidied end on the business of house
cleanliness or combabulation, that I will, de gratia, oppose the least in less thought when under the roof which I lurk is no longer avowing to another's estate:
COLLEGE, LONE LIFE AND THOUGHT.

27/2/2024
cackle<laugh

Had this present Conscious measure been not ever more, upon the body's reflexive query of Yawning, that which is setting Mouth in motion, and evidently, is the Body's
Disanimation and Need of Rest, or Sleep, or otherly posited that the arted imagination of such Behavior, even when negated to happen, is taken by the Subconscious in
impulse and decides the manifestation, tis a bewildering Qaulity Of The Mind, towards the Conscious's and by then Act.

Her face's held tight, unmoved against her body's stratagem about proceeding, each dancing unit structured after the other proceeding before me Observer's Eye, so much
plump, is persuasive to mind having been unset, the ecstatic like that'd be warping o'er those phat cheeks, and them turning back, which greatly numbs against her long
and inward face, rather unpleasant, but otherwise her satisfying conjuctive structure of the nostril's, arched or crooked downward rectly... The English's Sub, Ms.
SpellMan is one that attracts my sight, as water falls and whirls within the bucket stuck, that I can't help but look, find, and look the Grace Of Her Face.

28/2/2024
I've been an Attent Observer upon this day disposed by an Unwanted Will, to ravish and be ensared by those deserts of cloy to Sight: the mesmerization of well adjusted,
that of more beautifulness than ugliness, sweet faces, either unneutered or neutered and especially when I thought of them, to me, Praisal. Hitherto since long had I
been relentingly confronted by this Haunting Desire, upon such Unwanted Pursuit, cultivating such a chronic Seekment as to disrupt Deep Thought and Ideal Imagination,
philosophical resources of mind, more even so, that I'm Egotistic and Egocentric, or the looming traces of it doth indicate its presence for evry situation that I have
stood upon and chosed my Benefit or Pleasure but any unother's. The Concurrence of my face's upstanding to other's beautiful facets and my hair's is no Strictly
Correlated Coincidence, rather my now longer hair nooks a partiality of my Face's Ugliness and also increases my Physical Attrativeness, whence the Praisal Rate on
me I've derived to increase, my Physique's Beauty thus.

If the Potence is harkoned to be within the Radical, rather an explicitly kind Base to an Exponent as effectualing Potence's Inversal UNTO A LESSER QUANTITY, the
Radical Index can relate equally or inequally, either direction from the reproduced Exponent: GREATER IS SMALLER ROOT THAN BASE, SMALLER IS GREATER, AND EQUAL EQUAL;
rt(x, a^y) < a : y < x, rt(x, a^y) > a : y > x, rt(x, a^y) = a : y = x. Or if it be what was the Root's Potence within the radical's craddle: that the Root is, as
separate from the Radical's Potence, or posteriorily, Raised anew to the Index's Power such same Radicand or Base would be abrought, EQUIPOLLENTLY TO RT(X, A^X).

29/2/2024
gild withal: macbeth

Grandmother Carmen had recollected my wish for White Rice And Chozuit from her daily fulfilling plan of moving the spon over the cauldron, hovering through lines of
gust into the nostrils the smell of her celestial munching object, which she prepares gorgeously, and that I gorged on of course, through a senile hunger muzzled since
the Eggly Breakfast to Emmaus School's exit 14:25, and 8 hours of a distracted Hungry Desire for that Beastly Glut.

1/3/2024
locket<
 et<>made of<sx,
  muppet,
  jacket<jack<
   hole<keyword,
   bison,
   n,
  octet,
  mullet,
  locet,
  bullet<bull<great strength,
  hamlet<ham<flesh<carn<definition?,
  ballet
 n>
  object that makes seeing and/or changing another object impossible>lock,safe,

fantasy droughts my mind whenever i try into hard thought, alack!

fallout 4 each thing learnt to improve game efficiency is like a new nooked cornered discovered and gaged on 

apart from human Natural language, I like learning Formal Language's Syntax like programming languages xd

Certain hints of Acorporal Company seem to blush at me of lovingly familiar shadows from those in My Life that were freed to the Surreal Realm, whenever I encounter
myself darkly away from the vimming Fragance of Love, engulfed within a shadowy dense mist with My Sight wandrous unto the surrounding love alack to me not delivered.
Either that is my psychical Copation, the mind let loose by a survivally poor satisfaction of love would, wellmeaningly so, already compute against the Mull of Desire
to be Loved for me so hungry and ferocious forebe transitioning deeper into the negative self, everall, or GOD is a topulous good carer and illusioned me My Mom's
shadow, should I strap mind thereon, and further, lest it not beware that HE LOVES ME AND CARETAKES MY BULL OF LOVE.

2/3/2024
parallax villain and astrophysics HA

Now Waking Fore, My Conscious was at tis blurry Reality of Water a boat capsized 'der it, subconsciously, and I with that Heatful Memory correspondingly seized such
for was my vehement request back under Conscious Bidding: I dreamt of Mom and Dad, interlocked once a point whichfore the Hellish StepFather was recreated by The Waters,
by Me, would it concur and flow with the substance that my Eyes delivered from tis irreal Emotional Desire, Sadness cast down rain of water whereby the Eyes are more
naught a reverendous impediment and Droplets of Emotion physically manifest onto the External World. The likelihood by my charge upper, that is in yestermorrow's
Nightly Reflection before the Lullabies of Sleep, 1/3/2024, that I had been felt Lovavly Deprived and Lone, thus It took indisputably GOD'S CARE to show me HIS LOVE.

kid that looked like garrido, bunny teeth pallet, and liked diana? videogame character lore xd

the more emotion, the more subconscious, the less conscious discretion/power. thus, better not to feel much emotion?

game fo4<
 enemy>beam assaultron<head laser beam<attack,
 radscorpion meat<
  item heal,
  cost 55,
 iguana on a stick<
  item heal,
  cost 33,
 boatfly meat<
  item heal,
  cost 8,

fallout 4 leaving power armor on location avoids respawn?

The writer's art is making the unseen seen through his relation.

Today was a diversibly Abnornmal one, at present night signing end: had it been a Normal Day of Fallout 4 whichfter Luisa with her imperative stern application of the
request operation upon Brian, that ought one nod, for her inglamorous fruitless state of anger and aversion, should one be an eternal fugitive to that if, I, that is
thoroughly displaced by my, congenital underwhelmingly, Sociomoral Process Of Expectation. Tis was also activated pyromaniacally in the Trampoline Park that Brian,
under the sweat of said translated want, want he not our satisfaction but her's then, which I hold him not lovingly much anyway; that one entertaining unit a space, 
that was of only but not restricted to the innocence of infants, and I had preferred my amusement there was the obstacle course trivial, but merely at first,
physically, mentally, it was Society's Considerations haunting me, lopping my virtuoso bragment of physical virtue at one commend or disparage, ever, but I did get
abnormally unshaken by a Blond Caress as a result of my deeming, from the third person, it would have been a farther deal of pesimism and cringy if myself brooding out
or meeting eyes with her, for approval or abscence thereof, should I modulate my behavior, and what she thinks!

3/3/2024
Again, not anew, had been a bright theory that I should scavenge to find her glistening core and, equally, for those interesting guarding stalks, Digital Interpretation
of Consciousness was what I awaked to from Dreamage. That when Human Consciousness is attained within a Digital Device, at it fullest scale possibly, Physical Emotion,
or Feeling, would be ambiguous and questionable.

fallout 4: power armor left on medfort hospital seems to hinder enemy respawn

4/3/2024
I feel my will's disposition a great grade less, lest the Unsettling Desire that tis naturally Enslaves Soul to the unsatiably is potencially nicked in the Mind, with
an inevitable hollow of perpetuation inescapable from upon which one would stand and crane the neck for the fairness of Freedom and Peace, this that I did not after
refraining upon that ritual fap in the bathtub upon my vim for relief, after the legs were intercalated in sequence for that state which I seek to brew within My Body,
after the soreness defies muscle, the harbinger of relaxion without my back discomfort or pain.

5/3/2024
Anger is the Calcination of Peace, her barbarous Beast at once laminated within that entumecence by Sense of Pain, from her Subconscious Lair she seeks, when her veins
are of fiery bullition from such Light of Sense, for the irrational thaw upon the Coldful PeaceKeeper would he now have to fret the Stasis Of Peace to allelate the
Emotion Clamoring Control, the Control of whom which will be Strongest from either, the mental capability's loom of frequent practzation, or an unleefully lewd warmth fore that Beast,
worstly, with a critical indisposition for Cold Headed Conscious Control, of Reason (Rationality) For The Breadthening (Generalization), And Depthening (Increasement), Of Personal
Utility (Personal Utility Function). That this dolorious and heretical process, for the Avenger in his Painful Stimulus the Chaperoner of Pain did so chanting to that Beast, thought so
Fair and Just, but Foul indeed, heresay an Indefinite Feedback Loop of Vioelence would end incomparably consequentially (very badly, catastrophically), which would only be pathed with,
for better prospect, a truce by inaction of one, or Conspicuous Childlike Kindness; A DISPARITY BETWEEN STIMULUS AND RESPONSE: As of an obtaining clause for the kinetization of the Feral
Calcinating Beast, the Pain is subjectively Cringed from the discrete opinions according to one's prescription, WHAT IS LINKED TO PAIN FIRSTLY, if the Painmaking is Not Due To One's
Previous Response, Empathetically examined so (Subjective), the Beast is frenzied left to the Peacekeeper's Apeacement and strength about it, UNDUE OR UNJUST PAINMAKING RESPONSE WILL
MAKE ANGER.

This Angry Beast kings of Evil and Irrationality as a quasiperfect tableland whichcross Sight, it being the quality in rendesvouz of such general whole plain, and easily it recepts lightt
of two discernible imperfections, appended with their basic sections whence they rise so: the both identities are with the upset of a Balanced Social Interaction struck to the
countertempering institution of harmony whereby Bad And Good Is Good, Good And Bad Is Bad, Noncommutatively Structural Map, and same to the duality if even lying between (Good And Good
Is Good, Bad And Bad Is Bad. VIOLENCE LEADS TO MORE VIOLENCE IN A VICIOUS FEEDBACK LOOP); Secondly, it is an unseaming pretension against the Biblical Morality the Desire of Pain to
Other, of the Neighboor, rather it is forthfully a Pleasurable Propitiation that One's Egoism would vantage on the though subjectively demt fair or just heatness of others, should the
other reprisal take not for the Pardon of the Wrongdone and his satisfaction in that Painmaking. THIS IS AN IMMORAL, BLASPHEMOUS, IRRATIONAL, AND BARBARIC CHILDLIKE DISCONTROLLMENT.

The revoltings of Anger are the Painful Receptions from the Canales of Sight and Sound that are socially learned and linked to such implication if tis Emotional
Negativity nonetheless tends evillishly on Oneself's Esteem, is experienced as truthful a pain from pulling a coarsed string wound to a genitally sensitive negative
application to self, and, this bastard tentive work upon those standards and rejections, either indirectly, has an ever instigating appearance of a Painmaking Will
within the mind (the instation of Another Personality within mind, as opposed or contrasting with other wills). THERE'S AN ESTABLISHMENT OF A NEGATIVE VOICE WITHIN THE
MIND AT ONE'S EARLY SOCIAL DEVELOPMENT, INFANCY, ACCORDING TO SOCIAL STANDARD AND REJECTION.

These Beasts of Heatful Desire are triggered from their Sensical Lethargy of Sleep by the Light of Sense ope ab Conscious Rationale's Control, Wills Retributing, loughtingly, that they
are laired within the Subconscious Metaguard, through the Light of Sense enlightened at once they're Sent to the Conscious Rational Rulekeeper, Semiperfect Maximizer of Good that is
most economical, presently and futurely, and available to one's lendment (mind), Semiperfect that wherefore, exclusively (exclusively because only one will control at any one time) to
the Determination Of Behavior a Dispute Of Wills. And, when be Light of Sense shone of the Beast's preference in colour, both the Tempogeneral Conscious (considers future and present,
subconscious only latter) and Desirius Beast at that strike of eye, such light to one outcry, another malign, straik and strife within the Conscious Exclusion Room from limit of livid
darkness, esoteric oscureness leaves the Conscious but in a cubit thus denoted of ingettable confounding and haze, sliver the Light Sense is onto the Subconscious Beast parading against
the Conscious Peacekeeper should he at all till nirvana subvert and control the beast.

EMPATHY IS THE CORRESPONDENCE BETWEEN A PAST STIMULUS AND A THIRD PERSON'S.

Water is the infamous substrate of pain syllabizing with a gluminous melodical wave to Eye that, what a pain clasps the mind with an Innegligible Desire, should be
Reflexively expressed and menguated through the Substance Of Water, the Excitation Of Tears from the bodily reserve. This Unlivable Pain it being tended as a
Dispararity Between Past and Present Stimulus, shades of Nostalgia, when the former imperial Pleasure, with Present's insufficiency's, is at most but lost. WATER IS THE
COVER OF PAIN.

all desire and behavior from emotion?

inedit, bardor, oblivious, innuendo, lewd, lewdster, ludicrous, incumbent, inclement, leeful, mollify, subscribe, innept, livelihood/livehood, subscribe scribe fallout 3 and 4, elate,
vindicate exculpate redeem bloodborne vicar amelia, bulwark tome4, chaperone, suscitate excite, eye for an eye bible verse, thane macbeth, meat hook and anger fallout 4, anoint, saif
bloodborne weapon, elope eminem, trinket trinker trinqueta, thrall, tuker irk engineering tech class girl expression, painstaking painkiller game, heredity herida, angler anger fallout 4
angst angry, turtlet small turtle turtuman vegetta 777, fife strife, alack, forthfully, seam unseam macbeth, stead instead in lieu, vantage gage on, point lookout fallout 4 dlc and 3,
vagrant catfish vagre cs, unadulterated, propitiate, plow labrar spanish, sassy grassy ghastly ssy sx izzy bloodborne, affluence influx, lought loch lockness lake lock bloodborne,
oblique oblivious, stipulate stimulation stimulate, destillation welding metal alchemy, cull leaves mod minecraft cultist terrarria, none the less contrast explain,
cawd raven, revolta, plier applie, tally toy story 4 forkie, provident, launder laurel, mire lurk fallout 4 quagmire and lurk, dog pen bloodborne, minefield fallout 4
miguel, estandarte standard terraria and minecraft, letargious letargical letargious, cage capsule imprisionment prision containment contention enclosement closement,

lought is link. withacker lastname blackstone class, preternatural tierno, bane thane batman arkham city, gein impact, luthern window, lunacid, prun prune fruit abuela constipation juice
clockworks basis, sliver and liver, aphoric, livid intense, lantern verb shine, gry small thing, slat, pristine pristina name, enamel fallout 4 welding metal, corral, sacristy,
legate fallout 3 4, intimina while doing exercise, postrate evil goat horns

6/3/2024
GOD, I have from read sin cast it before you even overtly more, under the revealing resplandescence of sun, and through my naked form which can be discoursed of myriad flaws and heressy
a gry regret which label receives not of the Fapping Sin, that my Desirius Heart ayed and handed for the visual but 'loof entertainment with female figurines, frantically at this morning
before school, I did not sleeve the peripheres of face with the coat's hood for I luxuriously hoped from my hitherto ashen practice, 1 week or so, of elating upon The Observer's 
Contemplation of Himself,  that my face is such so fair and fine, or I am such good, that from faces of people thiter I extract said good judgement insameas how mine would behave
thatfor. Goodsleep FATHER!

7/3/2024
Perhaps the dreader virtue of physical beauty about my time's gent has deceased despite a weller spring of health, yet of more beauty the older generationns, today at
Mr. Rupert's convent we were held recipients in the conversation from two Beautiful Men set apart by their Orative Faculty too, such gladious consistency of the Entuned
Lyric hast not been my eye fond of prolonging now since, with an alluring Daintiness Of Smell to add of note, the one most bringing to the table eyes gorged upon and
bloodshot admiration be his Ideal Tone of mineself so fiercely, and his trombous musculature betweenn those divisive lines emtween of robust masculine geodes, a
centurion health and tactile nimble love representing the Observer myself. BOTH SEXES THROUGH THEIR ATTRACITVE REPRESENTATIVES CAN BE SEEN TO BE GOOD OF THE ELIXIR OF 
GOD INDENDENTLY FROM ONE'S STRINGING DESIRE UPON THEM OR ANY GUILTFUl SEXUAL BUSINESS.

came bloodshot with admiration

fallout 4 lock advanced locations: slocum's joe corporate hq, national guard training yard, revere beach station, four leaf fishpacking plant, jamaica plain, parsons
creamery, cabot house in basement, public boston library (master) in red door, hubris comics in penultimate floor, water street apartments in blue door, general atomics
factory 2nd floor, milton general hospital floor -1, pickman gallery (master) 1 floor, the dig in goodneighboor (expert lock)
fallout 4 hacking expert locations: cabot house in zeta gun place

fallout 4 npcs occasional dialogue about quests or locations

I thrusted not my palm sinfully around my phalanx to the Lustful Beast's, to my damnation but in admiration of GOD'S PRINCIPIA, for was tis deeply postponed by my
Gaming Entertainment propensely upholding thus through this night, one notch less a day, the producing Anxiety of such sacrilegy and such also the greatingly repeating
likelihood of the behavior, and detour more suffocated towards Abstinence.

8/3/2024
Woke up at the terminate 4:50 but, my eyes roughed up bitly, chosed not to stay such; I have had formulated in my head, moreven now, that tis scarcer sunrise happens
from a greater time to bed on previous night. Let it be unscrolled to, the tridimensionally unyieldingly slender bed that is furnished to Personal Sleep incites the
sneerable a production of comfort in attempt thus,  the insipidness of my brother's arse besides, and my Occult Fear all in all pinning the plausible face of possibilty
more distantly downards from gleefully ingrunting sleep.

Today was a day of convivence with Luisa she would have otherwise found pleasure unrelayed in seeing to the tongue's desire before satitation, future be not the
ingression of tasty but the satiation of hunger, of ours Nico and Me, within her motherly womb warmly and industriously kissed us with the Gluttonic Entertainment,
and her seeing our stop that is expectant from her routinous step of inferring that she was sufficient in her duty, and underwhelming thought not said 'bout her from
herself, or whether not from the other's trial, if not the Stoic Pain hazes her spirit.

9/3/2024
From Guilt the information of but the myself's mirror through, at Dreaming Metareality, My Eyes replaced as of black beetle, smooth circumvallation par with an
irrepulsive course, and My Personality, Myself, alternated, that I had been told later that My Family knew tis but to be a bad harvest, whereafter the Anatomic Heart
wavered short of content and Eye's Vat punctured, the terrible Pain with the columnially Afflicted Heart flit out the limb; ALACK, A HEART SLOWLY POUNDING HELL OF PAIN
THAT CEASED NOT UNTIL MY RISING AWARENESS. What my interpretation can conlude thus: that I do feel a very great Wrench In Sinning both from the Anxious Seekment and
GOD'S besetment from My Soul's Blight should he godfarsake me.

the writer's spirit also angst/inst me to write like the famous writers, ambiguously and strangely, goodly?

I do transact My Writer's Spirit sleekly for these symbolic exchanges and the combabulation that I should do so with dense Effort, across The Indefinitely Extended 
Vocabulary And Structural Complexities For Expressing One Idea, vacillating naught from the Social Moral of Advanced Writing bracteating upon the Famous Writers,
tisfrom, I perhaps should concert a half systematic maxim 'tween for the sake of my specialty should I be, more noticed thus, and satisifed from the equatingly
social agreement and praisal upon Idiosyncrasy: I WANTATIOUSLY WANT TO BE PRAISED...

10/3/2024
I have not Bribed My Hand For The Greed of Soul, enlived by Womanly Caress, since the thrice sun before this, upon which the 7th day the benefit, albeit tis heathenous
Desire Hath Bewitched My Mind awfully across, is expected to be a mollification of Anxiety with respect to her thought of me, as expounded from the World and to Eyes
mineself.

Today was a general payday, abnormally, of greeting from the ellicitence of tasty food motivated hence, pivotally against the more expected or likely establishment of
a day about what will be in relation to one's pleasure that would be thus punnier to than, and the Bodily Praisal that had also been an enlightening glitter to my
perusal upon which I rarely wore an amber arboreal flannel; We the Bautistas had fore Brazillian Fechuada, Salty though and did not have my Peanut Butter, My Tongue
therefore did not weld much around it, it was dilluidly fair in comparison to Carmen C.'s irradtion of tasty fondess upon her cookman concontions, and love.

statue and perhaps other objects in fallout 4 move other ones in buldind mode

11/3/2024
little value than animals are we if not governed by rules, john wick 3 quote

The cultivator's eyes upon me Society herself induce my Right Expectation (both Right and Up mean good) at the posterior moment from such Praise, Doth Undoth Me
Negatively Imagination Dispaired, therewithal, the Woman at which gripes only through Sight are made by me shant, as it inquantibly hath and disoptimally, exempted from
morenever the Professional Knowledge Of Lovea and I wilt mantelate myself to avoid it in order and thrall those sterile motivations.

interesting patterns, possible language for expressing numbers in symbols, alphabet map, ha?
0 0 0 0 0 5*(5/2) ?

00 000 2*(2/2)+2%2
000 00

0 0 000 3*(3/2)+3%2
0 000 0
000 0 0

0 0 0 00 4*(4/2)+4%2
00 0 0 0
0 00 0 0
0 0 00 0

12 sums/permutations/organizations/structures

0 0 0 0 0 0 

000 000 2*(2/2)
00 000
000 00
0000 0
0 0000

00 00 00
0 0 0000 middle if divided odd and gives odd, so, not this because 6/3 is even even though 3 is odd
0000 0 0
00 0 000
000 0 00
0 00 000
000 00 0
0 000 00
00 000 0
0 0000 0

0 0 0 000
00 0 0 00
000 0 0 0
0 0 0 000
0 00 0 00
00 0 00 0
0 000 0 0
0 0 000 0
0 0 00 00
00 00 0 0

0 0 0 0 00
00 0 0 0 0
0 0 0 0 00 dup
0 00 0 0 0
0 0 0 00 0
0 0 00 0 0

perm of [1, 2, 3, 4]
[2, 1, 3, 4], [3, 1, 2, 4], [4, 1, 2, 3]
[1, 3, 2, 4], [1, 4, 2, 3]
[1, 2, 4, 3], weird
[2, 1, 4, 3], [4, 1, 2, 3]

[2, 1] [4, 3], [2, 4] [1, 3], [4, 2] [3, 1], [4, 3] [2, 1]

[2, 1, 3, 4], [2, 3, 1, 4], [2, 3, 4, 1]
[1, 3, 4, 2], [3, 1, 4, 2], [3, 4, 1, 2], [3, 4, 2, 1]
[1, 4, 2, 3], [4, 1, 2, 3], [4, 2, 1, 3], [4, 2, 3, 1]
[4, 3, 2, 1], [4, 1, 3, 2]
[1, 2, 3, 4]


[1, 2, 3], [3, 2, 1]
[2, 1, 3] [3, 1, 2]
[1, 3, 2] [2, 3, 1]

[1, 2, 3, 4]
[2, 1, 3, 4], [3, 1, 2, 4], [1, 3, 2, 4], [2, 3, 1, 4], [3, 2, 1, 4]
[4, 2, 3, 1], [2, 4, 3, 1], [3, 4, 2, 1], [4, 3, 2, 1], [2, 3, 4, 1], [3, 2, 4, 1]

[1, 2, 3, 4] [2, 1, 3, 4], [2, 3, 1, 4], [2, 3, 4, 1], [1, 4, 3, 2]
[4, 1, 3, 2], [4, 3, 1, 2], [4, 3, 2, 1], [1, 2, 3, 4]

12/3/2024
As it had been provost of the kosmic desire with its pleasure as the kosmos as big so, left a scotch after eyes' limation upon insertion onto my face it troths to me
the lascivious hook that her likes me and I am Virtuous in Beauty with a liberal force and thanous snap within mind, nibbling the structure of motivations formerly and
more intensely after the Unruly Festing, which caused the sinning tis sun.

13/2/2024
After the Run's Climax Sprint Peace from her ornate continental throne commended me through her celestial scepter and up to see the sun and its greatness, and I felt
like a child against mother's arms, et Pleasure that the wanted wonted activism of Hot Shower would againly be aplacated.

15/3/2024
abraxo cleaner<
 abrazo<hug<expression of physical love,
 brass<yellow,fire,Kevin Rupert Class,
alarm clock<alarm<
 px>
  a<opposite,atypical,anorexic,antagonist,amoral,attune<say<key,alliterate,apathy,amorph,aversion,
   ana><
    opposite/different>anachronism,analgesic
    anamorphic<opposite/different,
    again>analog,anaphora<phora<sound,
    up/on>anvil,anadromous<upward change
    anafe,

    px,
 alarm<counterclockwise,larm<left arm,game fallout 4 item armor
 clock<spatial representation of Time
aluminum canister<aluminum
asbestos<
 hard rock mineral<mineral<object originating from earth,
 best<first<key,
 ephastos<latin/greek name,movie marvel eternals,

All the fafter of a light crease was Reason interruptingly snuck under and overeached by the Ebrious Will, the High Expectation that attunes it, videlicet, and
transmutes the Hedon the bloodier, Reason without the same dare, predated, before the vicarious remembrance, ho pity, through the senses reared such imagination; thus
tis leading to the Temptive Commitance or Sin.

16/3/2024
spline<curved shallthin material

The Peaceful will was reinforced today, whenever not a Befalling Under Temptation, by the polyamorous conjunct of splines which fruit made the glee at tis, of the
parallel Entertained Attention about Boredom's Sicary: Videogames; and the Fearful Pain that the Vicious Will fathom nuker scarletness, hence, the Orgiastic Hand more
ebrious about such Temptation to Logos' sunder.

18/3/2024
label<libel

marble<fallout 4,merl<bird

laity<observation/awareness
foray<array

callisto<project,mass effect clone,callous

insipid<intrepid,inert,centipide

exegete<language interpreter,exegetically<historically

embolus<locket upon a blood vessel,blood pressure<pressure,embolism<bolism,ebola

gloss<bright<movie will smith

libele<
 lyric<lyre,
 Steven Yoder Class

andronomous<gta v aerodrom

voltaic<game fallout 4(< or ,)item mod power armor (HA, <media category from which I got the word> <specific media name>

game fallout 4>lose one's marbles,your marbles

servobot<servorium,game fallout 4

water<hapiness,smell of wet cloths i associate with good memories of diversion

What is labelled the Egoistic Side, surbliminally the anteponing baltic against the Good Altruistic that is but marveled and motivated by Pleasure from such comradery, is encruxxed upon
the glossy unfitness through the oration of the Mental Limbeck about Selfless Neighborhood but one versed more in the Contemporary Utility (or Wills' Tensity/Hierarchy more suitably),
for the callous liutenant inerts the weak will: social ingression of hapiness, that exegetically is bolstered of less motivation thus; PREMONITIONED PLEASURE IS THE VOLTAIC CRUCIBLE OF
WILL (ITS STRENGTH WHICH MAKES IT MORE LIKELY TO BE BEHAVIORIZED).

The hand can tell how healthy someone is?

respect is admiration

Should the Conscious Will have had an ensounder port upon the Ideal System, only just, if not he had been absented from the 1 sleepful hour that at which 22:00 Nico and
Me arrived, dot to, the limitlessly alpha movie, within the Tavern's delging chameras of incalculably comfortable tunic about the body: Dune 2.

19/3/2024
Natural World predicates to Sensor that, in its same unclerked in the Homosapien Datagraph or forebrought present Consciety, the Forcible Transfusion occurs everall
such Physical Interactions, and tath a more deeply encrutched mass or velocity, not found upon but equal or less without a Tradeoff Range, would be generated pertinence
of a Greater Force; or for the same Physique a Greater Velocity would endorse such boltier maw as the Nerve would thous he which to the loss of pain imparts it on one
such extent sledge. Momentum: let the Mass or Velocity bail the iridine for such Greater Energy that is but Conserved between the Physique; mathematical identifer is 
the both quantifications increase if individually the Momentum Force that this thus receives the Proportional Qualification therefrom; P = MV.

Acceleration in relationship to Force when stated within the Momentuous Energy, Force Applied Over Time: Newton Time, that this Force Acumulation at the even merced of its Caused
Acceleration, tis Impulse, such force can be Algebraically Monolithed by Opposite Division of Time which would by the Delta Velocity herself commodate Acceleration, tis formulation
thus the Algebraic Cancelation thereof By Multiplication: F = ma, F = m(deltav/deltat), Fdeltat = mdeltav. IMPULSE IS THE ACCUMULATOR OF FORCE OVER TIME.

pokemon game i used to play in wii, revive moment and buy a wii, wii u?

The speculation that nods with the Thought Of Behavior But Dreading Opposite, rather swirlingly paradoxic, will manifest itself interspersly with the better Conscious
Want, soin the Unwanted is expressed naught the Wanted, as hath incurred daymorrow upon the pediatrist, a luminous Blond Caress, had indulged in my Praise of such
myself's which done is Virtuous, and the state it suscitates, upon which the nerve took scooting race off with trembling thighs.

pokemon game i used to play in wii, revive moment and buy a wii, wii u?

20/3/2024
heirloom<game warframe>pc class>nova, frost

difference><
 discrepancy=increpancy
 adamancy<game trove
 impertinence<
  meddle<medal,stubborn
 immutuality<interaction between objects change of states
 antagonism<antagon<agony<great effort<book<berserk<
  genre<dark,fantasy
  char guts<the struggler

 n

stead>homestead

Disencrumbrement of two physiques to opt the mutual act upon such Physical Intralation, by the either verity thiter, the Net Force That Was Applied tents Acceleration,
and their Impulse accumulate the Momentuous Energy that is, it be a bird's flap upon Collideous Link by which the Momenta Are Oppositely Exchanged, invariantly:
CONSERVATION OF MOMENTUM.

Predicament far better persisted, tucked 'der the Conscious Will whichof august shine the dark instigated the canonical Blood Pressure upon morrow's analysis the sleight comment me to;
and, of course, which dorse graced through praise my face, from Luisa's demistification our eyes ingreeted about My Virtue ever so dethly and insistently. But the barkings of their
geists, GODNESS, wilt the now, not the adopts apportioned of Physical Humanism and further less the perhaps within my fur, Luisa and Carmen C. hold stir at any Blemish Of The Body from
upto the frontlet of a warding the Moonlit Supper, as consequense.

When a Factor multiplies itself within a Product, thus Potentiation, and if groping as such whichout itself wheter Prime or Composite in an unmutual Prime Dissociation: Firstly, then
the Exponentiation formal to the Log's Base operanding within Log when multiplied by a Lesser Number will give the exponent plus a Zeroth Exclusive Fraction, wherestead a Greater Number will
give a sum with a Mixed Fraction, regardless: the Log's Base when initiated upon the Power's Place, or not ushered an uniform power thereon too, multiplied with antagon tis wilt
equipollea Log Sum, or naughter Log Power Mult as, in the former aligning Power with Base such is isolated to a one log, cleft to the other Undescendant Factor that is calculated fro the
Same Base within said Factor that enchamerates the remainding gage; logb(nm) = logb(n) + logb(m).

ostension<ostensible

Armor withal its confection on the Physical Reality, minorily, hast whereall to for the Firm Of Benefit At Life a property idolating it Death thence gainst User or Player Character,
that to a scrutiny between resisting it against the offension within the Reality is mapped therewith its value to an Objective Representation With Quantity, from the metalsmason
interring it the Doth of Jove's Kinship. To provide a precise definition: ARMOR IS ANY OBJECT THAT METTLES AGAINST ANY LOSS, OR IN VIDEOGAMES, NUMBERS AGAINST NUMBERS.

Alike the ternure of the Most Of Herd, Fallout 4 implements an Anatomikal Armor System whereon each Body Part can be outfitted with a Defence Valuation, if not antedated by Long Armor;
each Armor Tier ceded from such system and each one agreater inital Base Value: Raider Armor the bandits' bezzlefrom, Tier 1: Chest Init Base Def. 4 +10 Upgrade, Cost 18 +15 Upgrade,
Weight 7 +half chest upgrade 5; Arm Init Base Def. 1 +5, Cost 6 +75 Upgrade, Weight 3 +4 Upgrade Cap 10; Leg Init Base Def. 2 +half chest upgrade 5, Cost 8 +half chest upgrade 5,
Weight +arm upgrade weight 4 Cap 10 (such is inseen tis that Armor can be uberized from n to Light, Sturdy, and Heavy, such is the Armor Upgrade System); Ballistic Def. is otherwise
same to Energy Def. than Raider Chest, Base Init Gy. Def. 2 +9 Upgrade; Total Bll. Def.:Light 4+2*2+1*2=10, Sturdy 14+7*2+6*2=40, Heavy=24+12*2+11*2=70; Gy. Def.: 2+2*2+1*2=7; Cost 
Light 18+8*2+6*2=46, Sturdy 33+13*2+81*2=221, Heavy 48+18*2+156*2=396; Weight Light 7+3*2+3*2=19, Sturdy 12+7*2+7*2=40, Heavy 17+10*2+10*2=57.

FALLOUT 4 CAP PROFIT META IS EXTREME DELTA TWEEN COST AND WEIGHT: TO CARRY MOST AND GIT MOST, OR MINMAXING.

21/3/2024
The Subconscious Punt in its course uncertain but certain, the zest of its waters of be or not from previous attention in determination, will superfluously wade the
Desireful Waters of dark that knives the sould down, with its unfiltered denseness of sadness, that one classically knits gainst the Stoic Basis; temerary sadness made
My Mind unsure between Actuality and Wish had been hert to the latter but, the wards, My Lesser Actuality of Womanly Loneliness. DESIRE IS OF BEELZEBUB.

23/3/2024
fallout 4 idea mod to change power armor shape, left side, depending on power armor third person look.

24/3/2024
sold ps4, elaborate more of course

25/3/2024
had dream of lucrecio, in isajuba, I had menstrual blood in my hands from Paula, elaborate more

fallout 4 diminishing returns from damage and resistance formula general conception?

26/3/2024
The bass imp that smears the facet, so agilly profane at one any sweep, upon the Facet of Accord that deices the Mind a paste upon, when twacked a cocoon that the mind
wouldst peek no bile instranslucency, once it hath marinated and dallied to the ostension of translucency, of course, she the Idea wouldst as anyun that quellst past
by suprarching be themed the greater, and for, such sides wast the capted visibility and unto disconfusion allineated, welding the walls of mind Generality Pleasure
a greater mush to commute against its carnous chambers, I want to leave my pretensive idiom, tersely in fin: the Discovery of General Principia is a premier insight,
as had it been not in One's Memory, tis is the sanctimonous objective of a Philospher, to consign matrimony with beloved Generalization.

At one beart day this what in its specific exemplary of Generalization, Recursion, had struck to me otherwise without much penitance to the skin, from Deep Conscious 
Thought without the Writer's Spirit, subconsciously: the Process or Rule links to itself, such is thus that upon execution again said, for the definite extent to its
Execution the requirement of a Consecutive State Changes and, at one Base Condition or Case, End Recursivity; and tis I found vehemently be of essence in Temporal and/
or Spatial Relation: THAT AFTER OR NEXT TO ONE THERE IS ANOTHER AND ANOTHER IS ONE.

2/4/2024
My juror of sophita, it is, aglomerated with that which it finds commensurable to itself of whom the Physical Impetu trods the same 'bout: anyall Stimular Signal were
it Physical Force by which it is unhastened, interaction by a prior physical force, will be transferred as the nominal Momentum to another object and to itself; in the
stern of the coin same then, an origination will affect the soul in the lot as prys the customary family of thought within the user, its subjective force on him, and
will ordain behavior be intravenous, or reflection, or extravenous, or a subjectively apaired expression outwards. In the relation of what self gets will say or do
as he seigned and viceversa for this is, tis manner of denomination and society, corrresponding interactive system that calls The Logicorational And Of Reaction et
Stimulus: IMPETU IS CONSERVED OR ONLY TRANSFERRED AND ITS INTENSITY IS EMOTIONAL APPEAL. Thereafter, the avid candidate of case would be, thus saving mental tar of the
inclined interlude from a Pain, to dispense such Painful Impetu as the innocent the conscious when the Body is of such wary, the affianced subconsciousness of physical
transmission tis.

A Network is a system in which each object its last residue is of State Transference Onto Another or the amene is being it that Message is at first escepted in one, and
then projected onto another to their equality, at the end's mean such is: equality of data intertween such actors gives Communing Communication.

An Unrect Angle is of one radius and another inneath, the Triangular Base, or soever other code might leg, base, or hypotenuse be, to radie of Differing Slopes have between them Segments
a unique Hypotenuse that is greatest in pathlen of each segment but lesser than Their Square Sum, of course. This abreviation of the Radius As Hypotenuse is duely so comprised for the
most slopes, infinitely, that are Slanted Not Rect, given the against both shorter segments that in sequence first represent Dela/Change Y and Delta/Change X; THE HYPOTENUSE IS AT THE
TERSELY ESSENTIAL DESCRIPTOR A COMBINED BIDIRECTIONAL CHANGE TISEVER ENTRAILED WITHIN A CIRCLE SAME, THE RADIUS CIRCUMVENTING, THUS IMPULSING THE LENGTH UP AND WIDTH DOWN, OR VICEVERSA,
AND TRADINGOFF SUCH FOR SAME HYPOTENUSE; h = sqrt(a^2+b^2).

A unit of the circular orb, Radial Unit Radian, mays upon the same ness as Pi but the Circumference paint through each behested distance a radius, thus 2pi radians = circumference. This
unit veirs the more intutive its returning base wherefrom said, as Radian Comes From Radius But Degree Comes From An Arbritrary Physical Convention, More Ambiguous And Subjective. 

An advanced Blood Pressure Blood Pressure the gulches ported yet anow to be amendt tat, and since had the roots of the Writing Groove gelt from My Unamned Laziness but,
adieu not said to Me Great Shrewdness forthwith from the Idleness Of Playing Fallout 4 the gasting wald of time in its total space of School Spring Break. The right plus
but heinous ail foot myne with swelling I suppose from strain or bad posture for Abuela's Uncomfortable Chair, double bad already, thrice rise bad, again: did not Run
and My Abdominal Detest Is Worse; HOPE THE BETTER FOR BENING TIME.

3/4/2024
The Memorial Network usurps What Was from the Novelist Overwatch withon a Unitary Attention more attained to mildew if more time offrom, the deeper the time atons the
forgetful cyst of the heeded culling more the key alockation for it, such the alcove coverted deeper for the Searching Caravan that, at once, wouldst get outmaneauvered
in innovation of distant reminiscence as the mind in its subtent reconaissance jolts jove afterupon the resurfacing of the curiously clever idea, from the Subconscious.
Dejavu and Reincarnation shall be not Adulterated With Inabsolution hence that ONE AT MOMENT FORE REMEMBRANCE KNOWS NOT AND HINDSIGHT NOW KNOWS VOID, by a sunconscious
flounder from the adtent Link to the behid memory; REESTATION OF THOUGHT PACTS UPON THE SUBCONSCIOUS WATERS WHICEVER RESOUND THE WAVES DO OR FOLLOW, EVERELD BOTH EKE
EACH OTHER: IGNORANT IGNORANCE.

eke<iker casillas,ache,v>
 get hardly possibly with out,increase smally,
conjunction<mediatic link otherwise logical or temporal, diffs one from another medium

eke<iker casillas,get hardly possibly with out, increase smally, 

vesper<ghost munequito,night,evening,noir,noucht,basslight,hesperus

Wes Interjection to deice meet nokt Rational Incense, the turmoilous Absentee That Is Sunconscious Ber Conscious sooths that withwhich time is accustomed of Mediatic Externation, for
the same Idea, is shortbade for that same, hence't (hence it) a greater convenience, VOILA.

Veg: 1 cup baby carrots, 2 cup spinach, 3/4 cup plantain, lettuce 1 cup
Fr: 1 small or half large apple, blueberries 1 cup

4/4/2024
Shun it be my adoption of that which decidiously ayed for the commotion of my, nitre overlaid, Vesper Automaton, intent sold off doubt at its normal unletting to the
doing, heremorrow beset the Unmeanderous Rote of the Seventh A Half's Supper, in the same way as mine deep hauled turd, retart uptill the perfect dot the occiput,
though the latter willst not find but merely a prolongued voyance from the guest's uhl (ass hole) until adaptive custom, the perspicacious aspect of looter (greater)
fast wast apprehent.

5/4/2024
The deedwork done today otherwise for naught the individual's bell would throe of the compuntuous from my discourtesy of Bodily Constitution stipulated of not very
vital hegemony, tis wast done from the incursion of woman; woman such so such complexively versed, subjoining man to their erotic hail, that it upset the base of my
thought for an undesirable seance of headthrob. At last done with it. Felt the commencement of a head, fore hissing now at thud, and potentially connected cause of
rended sleep for tarry punctuality.

7/4/2024
To make resolve for my abruptly sepulted Cowl of Greater Peace as I had underpast aposteriorily set part, despite, unyielding gauntlet of pornographic temptation
furnished of a greater nature than the yielding austerity, of course, tismorrow and weekend's extension altogether have not devolved to it, ho! the less ornt
(decorated) asto Encite the My Rational Will Unto Detention (deattention) and thence mine fabulous mental battery upturnt in its perennial and, eke of the cauterizing
doth casting attetion elseyonder, tis Ecclesiastical Abstention, Allah.

8/4/2024
Afloat the bow upon all and anyness of the sea rippling about the intensities, generally, matematikal, that obeys all such intensity if the little more as the greatent
more uptained, in equity between them one the less but less not, for greatent other, of the same extensional kernel then: SUCH IS THE EQUAL TRADEOFF PRINCIPLE THEN,
THAT, IMPONED IN THE ABSTRACT IDEOLOGY WOULD SCANTIFY ANY INFIRMITY OF FINITY THEREUPON ALLOWING FOR, INFINITE, SUCH VARIATIONS.

The 60th degree of bidirectional agate goes without complete propitiousness aye: branched  not to transcend but to its declension, the little tree  hathed no the enough
fortiety through which it would have been through and through, cause be gift that grant tat tis goes not in serpenting solace it to other famous angular persuasions
such as behefting fore the 30th or: 90th, 270th; which the radial preemptor preempts the degree, equally seert: 1/6pi radians.

The fortunistic opportunism of Object Taxonmy, The Naming Of Ideas With Which The Arty Writer Arranges To Bidlight (express idea), is stunningly enticing to the Creator even if and more
the business is a cornicopious ordeal: the Provisioner Of Name for a Cohesive Object System would devise names by an obtained Interlational Structure fromon a certain fundamentality, and
the other objects named accordingly to said more general access. This is what the accounted denominations of Geometrical Lines Within Circle and nowupon Angles have effectualed upon me:
ANGLES PATENTED OVER A CARTESIAN PLANE WITH ITS VERTEX IN ORIGIN ARE IN STANDARD FORM; ITS LEG UPON XAXIS IS INITIAL SIDE, COUNTERCLOCKWISE, TO TERMINAL SIDE. A CLOCKWISE ADVERSED ANGLE
IS NEGATIVE VERSUS POSITIVE. A COTERMINAL ANGLE IS A NEGATIVE WITH COINCIDING TERMINAL LEG, OR BY LOYAL INTONATION (samely), THE ANGLE'S ANGLE AYOND (a = up/on, beyond yond=yonder)
VERTEX. A REFERENCE ANGLE IS THE ACUTE ANGLE UNDER A NECESSARILY OBLIQUE STANDARD FORM ANGLE, AND IN DULY DUELY REFERENCE OF THE NEXT RECT ANGULAR SPREAD UPON THE XAXIS.

I wonder that if the recordt efforts of humanity wasn't the present's effervescence of words within the dictionary, it would be harmfully exasperating to reactuate retention of all words
with their meanings again: THANKS FOR SOCIETY :) And I from my present hardoings as dutiful as Ideal Redacter, the act of creating a personally occurt incubator ad hoc beffects the
intention of preused such expressors and them, partking the adept slogweep, conconted with onether (each other, one other).

acrimonious<
 acri>acrid<badly intense<aj
 monious<
  mony<noun forming sx
  ous<full of<sx
 badly angry<aj

asperse<
 v>
  besprinkle<bespatter<spat<gaiter but only instep and ankle<
   gaiter<cloth of ankle and lower leg
   instep<curved upper part of foot between toe and heel
  attack

Today was productive in relation to Ideal Exposition, got the ultrasound detection over my kidneys to my reputable belief. But suffered upon that Woman's Caress quite
literally from sher (her) upascending aspersion of tis tactillic impression, love, that I am denned at this ponderation within the pungent cage of fantastical
trepidation, to my imagination; from her normally job if not the Adonistic Man... Also I'm becoming more aware of my Writing Power being better than before, and 
Before's Fore, which serves onely to paint the omegaic amount of my free moments, to my Satisfaction and Peace, the harbort neath Deep Thought Then Writing.

9/4/2024
Of the ominous exertion proves the Thought That Leads To Understanding And Generality operates wherefore the disoscured calcuation of a Perpendicular Slope as Negative
Reciprocal; obscenely resultant to end's of increasing one slope would make the negative one less abduced downard and more forward to readjust for the preputed, a Black
Box's Interaction Is Blissful, Forput 90 Degree Divisions; TWO SLOPES MAKE ANGLE, ANGLE IS GAPE BY THIS BIDRECTIONAL CHANGE.

A Physique has everhad the primeval obliquity to epistle its Energy In Soever Way It is, Through Motion Express The Force, forthstated off the Momentous Work it would
impart the Motive Work it'd apply forethrough the human's event, the consequential force imparted to it would compute atop, atall, the distance for which such Physical
Inscript would be therefore movt (moved); Newton Meter scented too and pronount Joule about which the steady supply of Newtonage, Newtonic Energy, Per Distance Unit
would accumulate each such for each furth. Debit not the validity the Momentous Pair mv to engender the likely indistinct bed from onether though strikingly elastic
towards twin, but that it vows in itself from exself a Work Dispense On It Versus The Energetical Combination Of Mass And Velocity, Or The Force With The Time ft Newton
Tempnit (temporal unit) very closely alinkt but that does not concentrate on acute movement or its flat out absence, as peert Work, that Force Times Time would vary
at and icorrespond.

set<consort<cohort

army<
 legion<fallout nv,
 century,
 brigade,
 battallion<battlement,
 troop,
 platoon<movie william dafoe

equal>egalitarian

The magohany tree warrants to the deep sacker the fructiferous organelle (fruit), Phial Of Principium (principium = knowledge), when in if his grit to prod and prove for Generalization's
Induce, the mind will from that foraging fuss set loose... and Peace Great Jove abduced to whose but one's: of which I remarkt the Numerological Unit As Happening Of Both Collection And
Inner Substance debt to (like) the Romane Archymony: Legions 4 place unth (1000) - 4 place fifth with triadhendred (5000+300): comprist 10 Cohorts over then hundred (100) - 3 place fifth
with triadtence (3*10=30): Centuria of 80-100 agents in six the Cohort: last of rope finally, Contubernium to octane the Century (8 men) times 10.

Agrant indeed is the 10th Divisor of no parvum or ungainly insolution (grant, bestow, gift, feed, provision) whereby Military Armies are socketed (connected and divided) off the hiking
upgbrought (upbgring) of a Legion, for, indeed, it by the may (possibly) be proclived (inclined) aloud by the Pythagoraic Tetrakty's Value 10, upon the heath of his Greek Influence addit
(additionally, it add = addit). Admittance too the Link Recourses To Only Bellow at me present tenure of too the two, marshalst, Fallout New Vegas Legate Lanius.

Each Century was manipulated by a Centurion, first cohort first century is Primus Pilus, other 5 Primi Ordines, and 2 to 10th cohorts are Pilus Prior; the feet cardinally escorted
by Paladin's Harmsteel (shield) furrows on latter later after's for the First Better Structure: STURDIER AND DURESSER UNITS ENVOY FIRST.

hoplite terraria?

The American Military Hierarchy blends not the Formally Uneducated With The Knowledgeable By Oath and gives entitlement to latter of comission over its former for the effort is had more
the seconds cracking with the mind at learning and understanding through a Baccalaureate: latter; as where the physical requirement yet still without Personal Study is thus deemt enabled
less to the common beficacy (benefit + efficacy) of the other and all as whole, MORE OF THE LAITY LORDED BY EPICURAL FEUDILITY.

Another day of surbrought (sur+bring = overbring) production of Symbolic Models and in part dehearted (deheart = express, take out from heart which is soul) of new semantic wonders, and
made the Deep Thought Tracer a greater deal warding of sleep by exhorting out ma laif Breakfast Fasting 17 Hours, I pretend to belief so without coupling the possibly blemish of Place,
and subsequently the finger was made iridin in the reused (intensely used) motive of tippi typing.

10/4/2024
horseback<>aj
 equestrian<
  eques<horse<n
  trian<travel<sx
  pedestrian<normal
  terrarian
 saddleback<game ark survival evolved
 horseshoe<game terraria item plus pc
 cavalry<cavalier,knight,formal

corsair<pirate<robber

The Cohort is interlockt unexceptionally upon the thrice constitution of Manipuli or Maniples impending to the extent of two Centuriae in turn too. Therein of a
numerically subverst the Logisitcal Graph Eques Legionis or Equites as within the English Symbol Map: of sound and more verst social status in the monetary prepondrance
more vested as they had to procure the equestrian animate et all naturalities of war (tools of war).

Of that which is Comissioned Officer the Centurion dentail from least to most imprecedent (unimportant), Principales: Aquilifer ostends the Legion's Standard in
preponderant feat about which was engraced the MOST, but at me it is a blunderous projection but, again, Gains The Soldier Morale; the Signifer localed per Centuria a
flag: Centurial Signum, and would be entrenched within the involvement of Soldier's money; Deputies have under oath first of Centurion: Optio and Tesserarius; the
Cornicen would vouch the Officer's Dictations through the the imputation of labial asignance upon his long conduced fife (trumpet); Imaginifer hangs up the
rectanglement (image,picture,painting) of an Emperor be it by followed question or confounding Defilement Of The Mental Retainment, from a prospect suspection of hence
cavalier.

The more extentt (extended) is the needle persuading me to My Ugliness it betwackt notice upon me that the more taken I am to Writing, or to less scintillating takings. But the
tavernkeep keeps still to soften sensation pitching it the plenish (abundant) cheek a sided nuzzle of the Protuberant Juice Of Woman; that the mind scours with alacrity at incumbency.
And it keeps me certain when the Ethical Revelation Of Beauty is pasted but then in alternation, at once, I Expect Ab Stoicismus to be lauded again, and again and again and again AND
AGAIN, which only Leads To Hellbrew; this selffoldage (infinite loop) success immaculate of enthralling my mind because I WANT WOMAN SO SUBCONSCIOUSLY.

A Skirmisher is a Light Infantry Soldier that but jeers the Enemy with their normally attributed Crossbows for their Besetment Of Soul; lightlihood of Armor and Warutil (utility of war)
condescends the apprehended snail motility wherethrough the possible posit be too Reconnaissance. Natural percolated with Javelins, persuasiont (persuasion = like) with Velites, or
Rangial Arm.

Hoplites are greek Rangial Javelin Soldiers where the Terrarian Metareality in mirror beholds this of itself's, wherein they process from Marble Biome.

Brigadier Of Battalion, Of Company; the battelement's parapet incubates protesting protection thereafter provision of harm.

lofty<
 aj>
  good,tall

structure>architecture

parapet<short wall possibly for cover

machicolation<
 n
 hole between battelement corbels<corbel<parallel wall support<base

moat<n,trench around Fortress Rampart<wide hole

rug<n,thick cloth

scion<child node/object<linked object
linked>
 child<binary tree node
 scion<possibly of tree,child node/object<linked object
 bough<borough<governmental unit,possibly of tree

epiwall>wainscot 

vibrate>
 topple<tuple<structured set
 swerve<dsaa
 swerve<car lanes ds
meander,wander,wonder, 

correspondent>incumbent

11/4/2024
Whenz (when) Mind recurs Sequentially divides to, so, adiff (a different) idillity of themselves relating or by an Extrinsic Divisor for which the former is the
stronger in whose to whom (individually intrinsic is stronger), but unparalleled especialty in their concoding (combination); therefore, Any Posterior Remembrance
Sequential or any and all Thought by Time, Space, or Intricism Interlated. And of an Inestructurt Set, a General Notion Of Collection Or Plurality, the mental
consideration is inherently sequential for the thought that nervetheless Intrinsically or Extrinsically impresses the head with superposition (image). Thus of an
Ordinality not giving the Relation By Intrinsicality but the Sequential Link: latter later after, Posteriority, which is a Tuple but Set, Inestructured, of Any Such
Posbilistic Orderings cannot have the duplicate for one off the other would be not intelligible: in Iterative Distinction the Discretionary Property is only Intrinsic
Link; Tuples only emulate Extralational Posteriorty. THE MIND IS SUCH THAT THE MORE LINK THE MORE MEMORABLE, HENCE THE COMPEL TO INTERCONNECT IDEA.

sprawl<extend limbs unvirtuously/awkwardly while lying down<v

spin<>circularly move,twirl

secretive<>hiding truth,furtive

Understanding and/or generating ideas Inductively vs Deductively.

Achieving greatness or knowledge by having quick mind: like Anthony, or being Creative (lateral thought): like Me.

Shorts Periods of inactivty, or inattention?, when one is sleep deprived or tired, makes me scared! like temporal faints of mind, veritably

Shallow Understanding is Black Box, Deep Understanding is Peeking Within Black Box.

All things that not promote peace are Evil, all things that promote Vicious Seekment are evil; all things that promote peace are Good.

From my understanding, what makes a face attractive depends on a sort of abundance of either Depth, Width, or Height? And too related, it seems that a lot of virtuous things are
retroactive, meaning related to older ages, olderism? xd; including facial longevity that is such in relation to previous map tween age and faces, and that they are also held attractive.

205 is vocally 25 HA

feedback loop, or normal loop, of physical struggle is attack and retreat.

craft a personalized prayer for god HA?

13/4/2024
BP 6:29 no breakfast 121/74

29/4/2024
The tempest that driveled Pleasure Calculating (that intends to get something) Effort wrangled with the invaluably imponderant, adjudicated the Mind of a Haggard Bear
selfsame me by it to me temporal operator of current greater struggle, less efficiency but astounder Guilt that bespatters heat on Mind presently; but at least the 
moat wast not overdonet much of in the like of internity's (internal part) dissuasion, about the Guilt, by not obscenifying the Soul and Body with Overt/Visible Woman:
embrightening to Man, his Dark Desire, Love foretolt dismally once and over the moment that Relays The Present Past Indulgence, of the normally sightcoveted Sexual
Amulets (worn cloth). The fingergear has been set in motion then to the Writtal Endeavour.

Foot of being, of which both talons walks the same path imparted from the Vectorial Expression of Numbers: the Circle's Negative Angle Is Negative Displacement that is
subtracted from 360 degrees, and the Positive Angulation, unappallingly, devotes from 0 Sustraend Subtraction then.

Potential Energy without Understanding Occludement when the found, if same Joules of Work, then there would lie must the same Mathematikal Expression inwith, now the
Work by ma = F and height displacing From A Floor To The Displacement's Terminal.  And plurally more, adventure bled onto: Better Mass To Better Force. 

An asperous weakness has conflagrated My Peaceful Choir, the Body's Squire was Not Mature But Greener against the Ailling Agent, since almost a forthnight's one, yet,
worse or perhaps I'm too stricken by my own behalf perduring much storming indeed: them many physics I'm being forced to imbibe are not the natural way a body heals,
which anyone of the shape or adjunction with nature soever virile, is bane and vain for the Natural Process Of The Body.

30/4/2024
The hellous (hell + ous = full of hell) commotion of Me Body, Illing Fiend begone bethornt (thorn + tear) upon Hellbound. Seething am I, the Body's spite but too Kore's
sliced to in Profusion Of Hardent Thought: a new actor intermittently pounces the heart onward whereby after such column (time = x?) imagination anoints truly so that
it'd stop and keep pointing forward as to implode, thus, the Mind Is Too Affected In Its Fear And Anxiety.

7/5/2024
Sinuate Wave transducted in the Subtractive Negation the Minimum Cusp is made to the Maximum, and both masts swapped from any start as reckoned so if declesiont (descended) now upheavt.
The reutilization of the ratio but Negated from these Landmark Angles From The Unit Circle that happenstance their limbs are straight across the Unitarial Radius; henceon any Maximum
and Minimum would be held at the same distance from the Axial Midline, constantly equidistant neathwards and surwards. Whether the measured is increasing and encrevicing a parabola or
decreasing and depressioning it, the Sinuate Midline models an Xaxis up off the same Amplitude as insameas down off.
and Minimum would be held at the same distance from the Axial Midline, constantly equidistant neathwards and surwards. Then the Period, of Woman's Flake as if deemed
forfeit upon perforation, to be in phlebotomous affusion for a one a prolongation: such is it until the first point recycling pattern, the length, and each fulfilled
Period is a Cycle; Frequency is then Cycles Per Unit In Hertz.

Terrestrial cobbles obfuscate against but recoil both as long backward the meter and, upon soever else object it subtends the motive's substrate transpasses to image
itself about the other object and any of its course, for him too, in Energetical Transferences which sign the positive immortality, of it, within this Universal Frame
Of Reference. ENERGY ONLY POSES WITH DIFFERENT GUISES, BY WHICH IT EXPRESSES ITSELF FOREFORTH HUMAN LIKEHOOD (likehood is just human consideration).

Barf of the demon has the much succulent description of my body, demeant to abhor me with this weakness and instillation from my Bodily Aquiferous Reservoir to a
Natural (green) Bile that hooks, evergoing, my nutritious submission upon its antipersonal want to soak in the respiration chamber devoid estation.

Examination is tomorrow unto the depths, as executioners to our, mental shaft agudized by dutiful interaction with its subject, and the practitioner's ability then
to hound for the correction and express it so in the medium. Blood better not curse the vessels to greater braze, that it course so in the body in animosity for this
#ifndef hola
important session to be had. Rumination that twarts the body's pending, and mind, ablazed be naught but despurred with God's pugilistic blue, its sanctimonous release upon my
estruenduous apparatus of head.
#else /* hola */
important session to be had.
#endif /* hola */

Writing has been my perusal since the Fingers are uncomissioned by the unlofty head, and unlucky, emancipated towards a dome of peaceful sleep whenever not instantenously rapped to the
opposite Waking Dome, gullible the tumbling character for one to the Rational Emolument Of Conscious Effort, but too dosed to doze onto Peaceful Sleep, the hissing flute such fine sleight
with its lethargic and conscripting talons of gaze's monument for feeding, trepidates the mind to that ever oscilatting state but Peaceful anon for the precedent pugilist.

#ifdef hola
7/5/2024
Sinuate Wave Functions, their anticlockwise superposition up's down and down's up is transverst in the Circle: sin; Quadrant 1 until pi/2 increasing, Quadrant 2 until
pi decreasing, Quadrant 3 until 3/2pi decreasing, Quadrant 4 until 2pi increasing relatively. cos; unmodulated until pi/2 onto 0, Quadrant 2 pi/2 decreasing, Quadrant 3
increasing until 3/2pi, Quadrant 4 increasing until 2pi.

#endif /* hola */
9/5/2024
Yet in the adjournment of unsubtractingly state of heatlh that is preciate, a continual lodge within My Strong Scale has prorogued if gauntly now shade by shade being
repulsed without, which is lovable but loathable in this prorogue. My reputable occulation of deluxe fire imaging from the goodcoming heaven, denotes the soothsayer's
oracle royally whereby Mine Soul is imponed high in the Pole Of Hope.

sky<
 heaven<god
 firmament<basis,filament<fiber
 pole<
  spatial unit 16.5 feet<n
  antipodal<opposite possibly axially
 orbit<astronomy,astral body circular movement

heath<
 n>
  low shrub
  place full of heath
  wasteland<fallout<bad effect,slow object
 hearth>fireplace's floor,house

Might the may wavering fore the precept of Rational Taxonomy be a useless conception attaching Potential Energy to a physique but, bartered truthfully now upon the
firmament that Any Displacement Is Attained By Work whereby a physique is ascertained Energy within; whichafter, demoting such height will result in the Motive Span
Rate's endearing, Work devolutioned by self same agency forth the opposite directional.

battlement<n>parapet

evince<v>eviscerate,control/conquer,express

gait<
 n>
  stride
  walk
  gaiter
  agate<game>diablo 2

turpentine<
 game>fallout4
 resin

thicket<brush,n

scrawny<scrubby,scanty

stately<aj>extremely good/virtuous

A Graph is the singular shoot from the Matematikal Stalk from its parental producement of Structurt Sets whereon Linkage is evinct Spatially. Trees compend a kind of Graph that save
and exempt the Recurrence From A Node Whither Itself By An Unsimple Path, resoluted onto by a Triangulative Pragmatism, whether related from once or twice: Singular Tip bores into a
Duality's Once which that latter encausates it to the other, which poles onto the former fin; or Duality's Each connexions to the Singular Tip. This unhingedly revises Circular Loop
To Self.

Whence disappearance of Nodial Recurrence, the Tree Structure would have with n nodes n-1 Edges or Linked Pairs, if it eke be Node is Vertex.

Graphical Paths are Adjacent Pairs Of Nodes porting a Sequence From Anteriority To Posteriority; of which Simple persuasion are unique in each node. Now a Cycle is Path whichs end
accompanies the start node, thus, a Tree lacks Cycle.

Undirection Of Linkage enthralls Bidirectional Connexions and Paths that are commutatively illustrated by an Any Ordered Pair, this is the Undirected Graph; Directed Graph procures
Linkage that is directionally incited, Not Necessarily Node a Goes To B And B To A Though Can.

These are Function Classes clearly.

A Connected Graph has Every Node Lead To Every Node By Anylen Paths; if not, then it has Connected Components.

Mind nostalgically that the magician's hat within is an impossible diversity of abnormal awry and flurry before the untested customer, tis as I reckon now of the Matrix Multiplication
For Possible Paths ensare, how transfixed me heed with Matematikal Magic yet fancily desconnect from my understandment, insomnially esoteric. Well but that from a sinuate audition flank
I do understand that this Matrix denominates the Linkage by the Rowingly From And Columnially To, per node, and secondthly: thrice naught extremely unyielding from an unacquaintance
the Matrix Multiplication is encompassed for each row times each column for each new element in row major ordenance, therefrom this application for certain lenghted paths gives forth
the correspondenct quantity per each to each; if tween connexioned be them, a once is used otherwise zero. This product is then called Adjacency Matrix.

Following this simple dichotomous idea at the definitive Artifice Of Writing these discrete sorts of formalities, for the bifurcated aspiration of understandment and self appellation:
the Exclusionary principium of Consecutivity that would not flinch the deepest firmature (fiber) of one's machinative lattice, rotates rotely around the End Diseparated From Start;
where except Inclusion vanquishes this disparty by End Is Start And Start Is End, both bide wherewith other.

Peaceful rectitudes of time acquit the mind in their prolongation of its Normal Pernicious Attentions, when One's Historical Agendum from or if not possible to quit the Encaustic 
Stimulation tis powerless self to experiment but will to one morrow sever Negativity And Anxiety, so that one is affused its vastful relevation. This protuberance of the mind, of
idlehood, rendered stance fore while I was through the instrumentation of both apparata Nourishing Appetite: goddamnt fabulous Peace, wrench my being withinto thy stately dimension for
at least Sexagesimal's Half for day, ho, alright already be your purpose about me that Sleep does deny nix her saint spell upon me.

Paste of nut, chestnut, hazelnut, anynut, laced onto the Tasteful Limb mine amongst altogether the annexation of such dines predates them about all speculation of Surface And Substance;
but tis as the ascendantly dented estate of society with its indulgences beckons the palling vertex, whichafter the soul resolves to the grater grooves and a stadium more asinine, the
Seeker Must Be To Temperance Not Rumination In Greater Pleasures, which suffer grand posthumous anhelations.

decantation<
 n
 division<n
 immiscible<inseparable<aj
 wine,witch,decanter<decantation holder

dabble<
 babble<
  speak quickly or confusingly
  minecraft<game
  aj
 rabble<
  rant<speak emotionally<v
  mob>unstructurt set<collection<n
  low social estate<plebeian,n
 attend with low effort<v
 move liquid lowly<v

putter<
 n
 minecraft<game,
 dabble,desultory<random

stump<
 n
 lower tree stem
 surprise<v

confidant<trustee<one who is trusted<n

10/5/2024
My disobfuscative execution fore today's contemplative radminence (radiance + luminance) disdain of the sword's parcht antipodal decanted a Motivational Efficacy, from
mine the low corsair tis with anywho that propitiates Thermic Morrow it wreaked such remission; soever when and now the Motivational Capacitors retain a scrubby
munition is what distills from excommunion on the task the sheer automaticity and a tamed undoing of haggard compunctions that Vice belongs... add with a perspicacious
liking to the Writing Office: evidence evinced through this particularly construed session kingfully.

The persuasive degree by which it cohibits the permissive compellance to a based desire upon the selfsame impugnt impiety, when the Agent is innately apportiont to it
expounds a tenser opposition to choice which would most likely result in the human's declension, untraint Temptive Makina, at such inception of Sinning then; or if the
Agent reads the heresy's pleasure from an External Reward that may conjure upon him. Therefore, to transfuse more epithet of asperous reliance: the Interal Desire must
be overriden or the punitive remainder arduous to the calcination; otherwise, the complexity of worldy circumstance would have to be reigned by registration of all
liabilities. Frail Moral Box only belays time of the Agent's Temptive Resistance, if even be, onto an inevitable slip onto the Heathen's Hearth.

The inhumane opposition which with the modular system contouring after the body and justifies unto the Somatic Interface, Pain I'm floating upon: compromise for exasperation by your
deceased courage, perennially unmanned, and the Back Pain will emit nully to self being; Pain For Peace, Not Pleasure For Pain. This also clamps the denominative finger to pain and
effectuals hindering malices upon mind that will disassure and dice Deep Thought, and Peace... Peace.

11/5/2024
I have been proselyte of Hungry Protraction since pleased Dominican Imperium (time period), for it is Social Ideal the calamity deducting subroutines edicted upon the Body to excreta,
by it energetic lumps filtert thereto, thereafter the Body succumbs to depurating degradationing players that nix other would have spoke the effect to mound and consequently maim health,
or tis that at this capital ceremony the Body would debase of healthy cumulations. This pontification has held Truth in myne cyclical empiricism against duvious proclaims by hereticals
then about the latter headlong penance.

#ifndef hola
I disaccord with computing albeit Statistics links to an organization of numerical data and concrete phenomena, name 'stead, Character Intensities or Attributes as it absolves or eases
the comprehensive pace upon it, and mineself brothers this ordinal framework better then. Poised will it as subject: tome4, oneth Size, hindmost six from one, tiny, small, medium, big,
huge, gargantuan, correspondingly;

 Encumbrance or Item Load Intensity which stead motional stasis is upon surdone;

 Speed:
  Global Speed: Speed from this Turn Halting nominance is tracted per turn. This speed oval rotounds Actions Per Turn by a Multiplier Coefficient.
  Movement Speed: Per Actum traversal.
  Attack Speed: Per Action Melee Attack, additive.
  Spell Speed: Per Action Magical Offense, additive.
  Mental Speed: Per Action Magical Mental Offense, additive.

 Accuracy Ab Defense: Or Offensive And Defenzive Probabilities, astride the mind impelled commonly throughout Games, both are within the Damage Probable Formula instituded wardforth
 a probability cape whichder number overted through the RNG is compared against a vulnerability; 2.5%(attack-defence)+50%. Since the mental enumeration can induce proprietary cohorts:
 Equal Offense And Defence will Roll with a 50% chance, At least a twentieth punctual difference will hollowly truncate the Negational Probability and imply the other invariantly
 veridic; 0% and 100% bound thise devoid commensurabilities.

 Ailing Effects whether Status, Proc, former's and latter's tenure better cause be Status is intook as general notion about the listed Character State and naught does onto the transient
 longhood secure pertinence. Apart for this, most Ailments portray a ninety fifth percent chance to Save Against and then fifth% to undergo the Power.

 All this remained on Rescaled Intensities.
 
 Rescaling is through twentieth exacerbations paraded as from tiers, divisiont by incremental multiples of twentieth contrived with an Geometric Arithmetic Sequence, per each and
 adjuncted and last a division inter a 20 negligible remainder and attested tier. Diminishing Returns will insidiously shriek motation impart the number's incumbence is affixed through
 consecutive tier sustraends, naught's had a constant esciation (cut/decrease). Offender Sustraend Scaling is resorted too east a 0.667+0.333x step in consumption per 45 ordinals.

 Vision: Withfore (before with) a conscription from Light Radius this overlays eye's oblivious ultimatum. Naught this berate whenz inquiry upon a Neutering Geld would be then coveted
 enemy be withold its one a menace that seizes tending, hencefrom a guile of indirection towards him or other actible room could not have been deliberated whereto.

A Boost or referenct more generally accord the Societal Generalization, Buff, is, against too the naming conundrum, a Constance/y or Effect inventioned for the Numbert Utility toward
supraquantification or anywho, anyhow Excretioner Of Gratification.

Character Intensities that Change Their Reality By Actum, or Reality's State, are emblemized Skills Or Utilizable Intensities whichof Utility bide thereupon; otherwise, Inactible or
Pasive Intensities.

tome4 Offense Calculation:

 oneth THE code name totsat is applied the Offender Object Scaling Factor upon the Intensitiy itself, then Scaled.

 SECONDTH the code named power factor is assigned to Base Damage, low of Offender Damage Range, operated: power = (sqrt(baseDamage)/10+1)/2.
 
 THREETH the code name talent_mod, Mastery Talent Modifier, = sqrt(effectiveTalentLevel/5)/1.5+1.

 QUADROTH the code name dam embodies the Unscalt Final Damage, and with the addition of both Passive Intensities: dam = 0.3*(physicalPower+totstat)*power*talent_mod.

 PENTAGONTH damage is executed scalement by arousal to the oneth 'der hundreth fourth power, 1.04.

tome4 Offense Cast:
 
 Damage is Randomly Computed between Final Damage and product of it with High Over Low factor.

 Armour and Armour Hardiness are the Defencial Utilities. The Adversed Damage cannot be subtracted more than the Hardiness' percentange of Power, Damage, otherwise the Armor Penetration
 sustraend desecrates Armour; min(armour-apr, armourHardiness*power). Tis then subtracted off Damage.

 Talent modifications are commenced.

 Critical Chance is rolled for and if successful, Damage modded by Critical Multiplier. Normal videogame procedure.

 Weapon Offhand is halved Damage; 'beit Offhand Mindstars are tranquil from this.
 
 The secondth volume of phasic initiations whichfore ceasement of this longation, Resistance reception to the subseted Damage Type and detense it as sustraend from 1, such tat greater
 is to self jocular but to Enemical Animosity unfavorous. If the Resistance is omniscient then abated upon multiplication with the abstract un, then vernacularly subtracted from 1;
 dam*((1-a)*(1-b)). Withforely, further deduction doesn't desist, Demotioning Resistance, of which one can be Penetration: res*(1-penetration), moddingly/multiplicatively, and Reduction
 which is the better communication cuz is just Arithmetical Oppositude a-b.

 Decidious is this henceforth made upon the Bow's Bound Bloom, for the routinous march in liue hailt more to the extremity of undefineness, Damage is Additively Reduced by some
 Intensitiy.

Sciency is affixed to the Exclusionary Decision, basking upon economy's vessels as expressors of excellent inferences, tome4's either more Resist All Or Monolithical as: Alpha, if
Resist All is greater than each other Resistance then diss them others; Beta, unless one an enemy is predominant about the zone and has a negative affinity towards one's a Resistance,
then Greater Individuality will superintend over Resist All; Gamma, rahter to orate it tersely, if Resist All is greatest then it receives instep's zealotry, otherly, Monolithical
Resistance should be solely encluded to the Predominant Enemy. Resistance is capped at 70%.
#else /* hola */
12/5/2024
hollow<>n,
 n>
  bore<weary,fun
 hoare<
  grey possibly from age<aj
  hoarefrost<ice possibly upon physique<n
#endif /* hola */

#ifndef hola
Physical Power is an Intensity that invades the woes within better for more torrid Damage for on factor against another is cumulated, to confer the Final Unsubtracted Damage; thereby it
is Strategically Opulent to entone on it.
#else /* hola */
wholesale<intense
#endif /* hola */

#ifndef hola
95% is the Debuff Actum Chance Cap. Per punct (point) agreatened to self Accuracy with Enemy Save, Constance is denointed 5%; Per punct agreatent to Enemy Save one ingets a Weapon Bonus,
capped the hundreth.
#else /* hola */
tackle<
 n>
  tool<functor<interactive object possibly for lifting><
   derrick
#endif /* hola */

#ifndef hola
Armour Hardiness is lacerated by the incompetent saif, cleavering upon the zenith's condition of High Damage Or High Hardiness ontostead Armour Penetration Resistance Against the
natural Armour, of course; an elaboration apportioning more and more Hardiness falters the strategic dominus at a certain point which said difference is shadowed thenafter.
 
Numbert Utility offers what in economy would be august much greater against Enemy but much less economical One's Adversary; that is Offense and Defence. For any trace or impression of
dying triggers a certain disgust about the condescended Progression but satisfaction at the intrepid advancement: one unshutters Punishment and the other decors accomplishment.
#else /* hola */
   lift<yaxially move physique
 hoist<heist
 rig<
  v>
   give,change,make
  n>physical support,functor,tackle
 derrick
#endif /* hola */

#ifndef hola
Ailments and altogether Offense Types graze the Opposing Number upon the hearth of, oneth, Magic dejectedly grapple the other body through unself esoteric substances; like Mental from
the telepath's mind arousing such numerical negativity; eke the least amounting to unknowance, Melee or Physical Damage retorts by a direct coincidence of a physique's tractability
upon enemy. This is the Offensive Triped of tome4 that bleeds from Normality the objectation of Mental Power, and the emerging amount of Ailments canning to concoct themon.

Tome4 is an Input Dependent game wherewithin the External Reality is only changed as posteriority to Player Input, alike Single Threaded Execution; an Input Independent game does not
perdure an inquisitive halt but Multi Threadingly processes the Game World.

I, am, methodicaal, but I am not prodigal within myne carnous squire the control center, soul, is hoaxed with Gall Of Temptation, eponymous, that is specially from the copious blight,
unattainable weeds the nigh, of Caressing Woman I am dunnest foult within, whither should I think or pall self 'der one rumination or descalation to extenuate My Cultivated Vice; why
God, it is yet to be at all extracted therefrom upon the Sin mere Impalpable Willpower to subvert the pleasantry ber (but) veins ain't esteemed upon such but gaunt in that major dare.

Mine Temple appears to self befit revulsions upon My Gorging Organelle whenz and fell upon subsequent pity I eat unknowingly of the devilish pain entanglers, consummating with the Eggful
entity today and timing such expresented action to the Painful Provation, thusly, booted mnemonic handiwork to overlook the idea.

Latin's structure Subject Predicate for which functional proportionality still held but verb is ascribt after adjective, for exemplum, Latinum inverst et Spanish minded est. Imperium Romanum
magnum est until his step's cortailt by some hench discontract from prudence or desultory nag. Oppida in provincia sunt, tornt is my auto didactive interaction with Lingua Latina and honed
I will amend it to through man's imponence.
#else /* hola */
paraphernalia<equinstantial objects<n 
#endif /* hola */

12/5/2024
From the kraven's unweary rigment that suppositiont was to engulf such, the monocular Pineapple heeded otherly a friction upon My Deverted Digestor was none instead a sweet phial,
amassing goodlyness.

13/5/2024
Fractal is a renovation of Self Interpreting (Self Defining) architectures that respect thereon from Recursive Schedules Of Ordinals by an adifferential matematikal operation suceeded
detractingly or impetuously, and wherefrom hoisted abstractly into replicating Geometrical Structures as suceedingly deployed upon themselves. Thenceforth, a consecutivity of decreasing
segments, simplifully cunningnest, is a formal instantiation of Fractal.

helix<
 n>
  spiral<fractal

Logik is an Equivalence System that operates Objective Structures onto a mapping fount between themselves and an Operative Constant; all Logik can be fundamentally emulated by sequencing
Poly Orderered Identities. Thise operations are inskribed the abstract and thereby assorted for Wordly Expression; they are invoked as Logik Gates, Gate wherein such makination procreates
the logikal conclusion, Input, Gate, To Output:
 AND Gate bygone fantasy to dome, observatorium shaped, sexagesimal sixth rotationed; NAND bead bade uptopish and secreting furtiveness when both truthed;

 OR is a multitudinal utilizer, rectfully punctucious beak exempting double waryness whenz one is true; NOR, OR with recycling bead; XOR, OR affixed to a hindful
 segment and nigh NAND barr zeroeth and zeroeth argumentation; XNOR a picturesque malgamation of XOR's alimbical and NOR's bead, but oneth and oneth programed veridic
 instead.
 
 NOT is the nightly downsetter, the overtaking tip dictates ambulation between two onely truthful comments insoever the Unary Argumentation is; the Triangle Tip has the
 coveting bead.

Heed thus, all logikal inskriptures are manipulated by these strata of Logikal Functions, whichfro any discrete state that disipates so absently across the volatile
legion of this collective nature, Chaos through the compatible expression and operator can be generalized and manned henceon for whenz it was not, then it becomes;
State does not usher in an undivide perpetuity, before it eversolong there was another and Changed to the compatibility, by a determined Ruling.

Truth adduced imitatively be embedded upfront the bed of an Aritmetikal Mapping System, also: once AND from the Oneth Multiplicative Invariance and to itself, and
#ifndef hola
Zeroeth Multiplicative Invariance Forever Itself, tis an immiscible adjustment for AND; OR deports the Numerical Truth by the Additive Carry; XOR setting the subtraction from 1 to x
for NOT subalternately. Tis the Logical Aritmetikal Systemacy.

Assembly Language is the digital makina that is abstractly conveyanced to Binary Tongue but the general backbone whereto Homolingual Programming Languages compile: Fitter abstraction
then Makinal Language but more spectacular generality to the homoids of programming lexicons, both between functionality poles and transcriptive nexus. Assembly Language is structured
and forspoken seamed less quotidian betwixt Human Language.

~Digestive Notation
13/5/2024, poop abuoyancy not eat apple and egg
6:45 14/5/2024, poop abuoyancy quartered
#else /* hola */
Zeroeth Multiplicative Invariance ForEver Itself, tis an immiscible adjustment for AND.
#endif /* hola */

14/5/2024
Craned Heart and hopes for the Woman's cordiform emanence of undeprecating contents, whenz her face is forthwith the quickened contract sown into the Man's Field, he that is a Repeater
of Lust ventures the Dreamage and Fantasy with her with an intensity in utmost wellset than the Real Expenditure. The Caressing Woman, Gianna myne Adulteration And Inadulteration,
reinstates being with a Soft Prism: the buoyant touch retroceding to heartfelt convexity, and mekanizing the Risen Blood, of Beloved Tinkers, onto thither and it converts a sunrisen
hue of Lion's pelt and rouge melted white.

mortar<
 clash royale,war weapon
 n>
  positively parabollic physique for wrecking with pestle<pestle<tool with rounded end used in mortar
  adjoining paste

NAND Functor ketches per each compartment equivalence with all ideals of Boolean Functions, et NOR, and intermediary simplifications announce the administrated identity; NAND generates
NOT'z by duplicated argumentation, wherefrom Reflexive Identity assigns Equal Or that simplifies to the argument itself, tis negated; OR is ostended by the upon naught's had with
oppositiont arguments, then is Opp Of Nor which beds Or itself; NOR not growling any uneasiness to an obvious confederation of Nand Or and Nand Not for the freedom a negation;
#ifdef hola
XOR is Nand of Nand And NandOr encoiled by opposition; 
#endif /* hola */

#ifndef hola
Intween it adjures to bedeemst Reasoning's Halvings, it suctions the Subtended Orchard Of Logicism off the prototypical redeemings hectically induced, again, distorting the ennial
weedbane therefrom, oneth Self CONJUNCT Self Negated is patternt 0; Self Disjunct Self Negated is everso 1; Self CONJUNCT Self CONJUNCT Other is Self; Self CONJUNCT Self is self;
Self Disjunct Self is Self; Self whenz earnest informed under the Disjunctive Rune's conjurement of At Least 1 To 1, is 1 wherefore duelist inclusion, OR Other AND Otherself is 1,
why then remarket, next if Self then both True, OR both therefore, OR Self 0 then both need the Truity: A+BC=A+B(A+C); affluent De Morgan's Principia, august: Naught Of Conjunction Is
Disjunction 'Twixt Negated Self With Negated Other, Naught Of Disjunction is Conjunction 'Twixt Negated Self With Negated Other, eke backendforth.
#else /* hola */
~nand(nand(a,b), nand(nand(a, a), nand(b, b))).
#endif /* hola */

15/5/2024
An Electrik Circuit is a generational path, of Elekton, inflectioned the erection by whim that of physical Electrik Functions anxially, or upon any procedural hearth.
Tis the ethereal recreation of Chip, that encumbers to its output a greater complexity by miniature such State Signers; to a Computer self therce Physical
Implementations Of Logik Gates, the Computer whenz then can Compute all possibly possible operatives in amalgam.

Expired day the yester, The Dad colisted from what the Fructition Abound Naught To Despection, enumerated the farthering's denumerated in Ripened and Green, iridine
sense vetter, seldom, my every between is lurching the Encaustic Elation: tis much clouts Wonted Tending. Excellent voyance within phenomenal pretension stipended
hast been such under careful proposition, forthto Dominican Republic, My Homeland wherefrom all exiles of Tongue or Trending Comportment any but encroach, despite a
Rational Debit to shun surpaced ravings insomuch the Stoic Principium wilt not such and then wield the consequential penance: the Writing Of Art the be should gatekept
upon the Morrow's Morrow continued. Deluge Of Indulge the perception attuned wilt of course, through all Spectral Expectances that Chaos could borrow null. BEWARE
SELF OF YOUR IMMACULATE PRACTICES BE DISMANTLED WITH POTENT POSSIBILITY NAUGHT, FOOT THE MAN.

auger<
 n>
  tool for hollowing used with both hands
  gimlet<
   gimmick<thing
   small auger
  wimble<wiggle

#ifndef hola
Capitalist reiterated Actors are lone affirmed upon, reclined by such system, a Mutual Permission Of Egoism taht is overviwt from such Preciative Trade.
#else /* hola */
484 347-3874
#endif /* hola */

#ifndef hola
16/5/2024
Whilst Foremorrow's hoarlit convention of indomitable, strange Actuating Eaters it upon the excruciation of Lemon or Pepper accessed the Digestive Notion for the frenzied depression and
apprehension; whereforth, Lemon AND Pepper should be vilefully meant and proclived to fear until Isolated Experiment.

The one meditioned Remediation Of Uncharted Dreamage, at minimum a recollected frame apar context of Muzzled Subconsciousnss about a Logic And Inductive Overtance, such context linked
there; tis reproduces marvels of why aye Dream Is Not Hiss and, in its commonsensed repetition, of such Dream's Nature perself.

17/5/2024
Revoltive present's principiated offset, adoths incursion of head empowert off sundae, for this: day hither spars against the Unsostended Expectation Of Praise, abnormally, aloft's lofty
nation Occiput Dreadreads Sympathetic Iniguality hind the Impaled Sex; tath myne Imaginative Bolt wherewith Sensible Transactors bepossess haptic dance onto the Gentlewoman is
aconditioned upon criteria: Constitutional Praise And Then Uploaded Vicinity matched forth the Facetic Fairness, between self uncontrariness Attraction And Incumbential Probabilities
bent upside the Female Fairness; tis wholly mess where either one dissents does not challenge and rather bespakes for my Statistic Damnation... or why is it like bass of loch becoming
where possessive inquisition is merely active on one agency, why?

18/5/2024
Accurst course levied the Letted Expectation of any Tactile Reaction, with Women blatant Adultery beknownst albeit, ber Sin reels Prudency without Corrective Deceptance, retrospective
Senior Prom yet amene ingots linger, for wherethrough the epochial derrelict of foulwell instants: furtively harking for the Meritory Princess, myne Soul reflected acridly from hindsight,
yet the yet did interplay with a Competent Woman, Janiel and Cody, aperhaps from the Subjective Praise Ceded Upon My Abnormal Beauty That Day, aha...
#else /* hola */
20/5/2024
Third The Thrice, Three, aon resolved mediary engates intween the interweave of bit graphs, such one the rotulated sapiency for its observatory conclave, bellows
and wallows the upper abolded of Two Exnoted that relapse, tend heave, and stream all within equimony of inference ber Pereach Is Naught Other's Naught. Dual Toeth if
Winfixed Once reveres then being's such the Ordinal Conssociate, Neiteher it is and the Piction Of Piction, vernacularly venerated veritability, wherelines Logical
intertwining. Three is Peace And Stability.

Seventh Septimus ingets savant of Peace After Strival: GOD'S terminate position was Seventh Days for that respite, 7 favors the favorite Holiness And Retrospective
Peace.

Mysticism hereafter of Quagmire Fraught Truth shall be as piquing conception proning the mind to semi fantastical bearings posted upon the fair hand: that it is a card
an abnormal mind plays upon the Truth, oscurely afront the Unacquainted Mind, and such is the Subjective Truth percepted; an creative superposition of images, one
abnormal over another that is evertrue between their likehood. General Ascension or by Abstract Descension hastens pereach, their semantic distance, the Oscurenes
and Creative upon comparative analysis for the befuddling forenix. Numbers profounded to reinvent meaning in an Abstract Physicality, Numerological procedure.
#endif /* hola */

#ifndef hola
Fifth renditions a Cardinal Ostension of Human Sensation: Tact, Taste, Smell, Vision and Audition. 5 Is Sense.
#else /* hola */
Forenow the past day was surfeit of temperate, once half, stimuli the facetical semblance put at the screen and accord the hands' commision for utility, secondth
dilated emotion amore dual glutes and head submitted the fabling of videocord, Kingdom Of The Planet Of Apes. Cooperated with Good Food of course, from Abuela Carmen.
#endif /* hola */

21/5/2024
Dreamage with its of volition of Subsconscious revealed superb Woman, Zoila, the Tender Slumber then redefined upon Sexual Determination but not altogether autonomous in its arraigned
creed, a polished extraction of Kenia's Food unto her, distraught with revolutive waterfalls, betaken by me wast; such torrid plays repress the Living Thought to the unattainable
beguile.

#ifndef hola
~Pythagoeran Numerology
1: Once retains all Unity wherewith Union of all Plural Numerals is entacled, as per unsurprising ado for conceiving.
#else /* hola */
~Pythagoeran Numerology, unveiled associations.
1: Once retains all Unity wherewith Union of all Plural Numerals is entacled, as per unsurprising ado for conceiving. Given its requirement for Deplexing Abstraction,
it implies a Principate Wisdom about the General Patterns of Our Collective Consciousness upon; theretwining, it exbajulates our puissant limitations of Chronodivertive
Concentration, as Temporally Bound Agents.

1 Is Abstraction, Limit, Simplicity, Unity, Universality, Consciousness.
#endif /* hola */

2: Of the sequential purview counted One Lesser Than Man, 3, wherefrom installment upon addition imbues man again: Even And Odd identities. The Biject Set professes the Simplest
Complexity Of Existence which from one's mental shrewdness pattern is retrieved about Other If Not Self Else Self, Being And Not Being, and the behold practices much upon it ever so much
intending to Human Behavior Is Satisfactory and deduction generates that Virtuous Opinion Is Per Se Dualistic, upon which it founded is then. This Bipedal Annexion gets more the
irresistible in betwixt inciding Equixistence Or Similarity, and Self Is The Other And Other Is Self betterly, by mere sequence. Overlayings of complication when manipulating opposites
are Intensities wherewith Duality is compared to itself upon further an Abstraction for more intel. Otherself of Dual Orbs appointed is to it by other and other appropiates duplication
tis to Recursion And Cirularity.

Twoeth Tooth Is Duality, Recursion And Female.

3: Thenfrom tis Man as Numerical Superconstruct Of Femina. Triadic wes (and) is the Extraphysical Superpondenrance Of God: Father, Son, Holy Spirit. It Three Tree coterminates with the
First Cardinality Of Mediary with reflexive property of Limbo intween Physical Disseverance To Godly Fort, wes half of Pleasure And Sadness for a Proportionate Broth Of Peace.

3 Is Holy, Spiritual, Limbo and Peace.

4: The Justice whicof all connoted Good And Bad is the product of derived perfection from the Tetraktys: cardinal quadruple intructs abide Geometrical Interpretation 1 a Point, 2 Points
Is Line, 3 Points Triangle, 4 moves about any Further Abstraction or more space that is clear evidenced in the repetition of the digits themselves through more and more place value.
Quadro is Complexity And Plurality.

Once thru the Fourth the elementary council of Wordly Compositions About Matter similate: Earth of which Solid Stated subclassians emanence, Air Of Detracted Combabulation About Gas,
Fire Of Ghastly Motor About Heat, Water Of Fluxing Rowings; more truth than naughth from combabulative to discombabulative the dimension.

Humours Of The Body, that Hippocrates theorized within it be such intractabilities and expelled by Organistic Habit, of Sanguine Blood, Phlegmatic Phlegm, Choleric Yellow Bile,
Melancholic Black Bile. With Humouristic Balance applied whereto Blood selfbathing wilted Incesantness And Enthusiasm, Sanguine, et commented the quantites of others; Phlegm is the
viciously pale anointed intractable upon the Inorganized Proportion, Phlegmatic, insiding Cold Dyscrasias and divisiont cross moribund and waygiving; Yellow Bile, Choler And Choleric,
sorts the Stressful Accumulator of more the Heat too, emerging outunto as Irrascibility And Violent Scorn, instituted by such an rash battalion of Urine hence, its Hot, Head Made Hot
then and Galled More Anxiety; Black Bile, Corrupt Excretum, cast the symbiote attuned lowlier wherewith Melancholic And Phlegmatic be mirrors of othereach, the antithesis to High Spirit
and Performant Bodily Usage these cause, where former pervades with Sorrow, from The Blasphemic And Debasing Amount Of Corruption Apouched Within The Fair Organ.

Sensically mapped between physical repititions thise Humours: Blood Is Warm And Wet, Spring for the inceptive procurer that becomes the person with Staunch Conscious Realization, thus
Living Neophyte Or Infancy, Air that beyond Promoting Livelihood is only associated by the other humours' attribution leaving desmultiplicity to this; Phlegm Is Cold And Wet, Winter
perusing the Desistive Frost Of Livelihood and Locomotive Stasis therewith, Elderly And Water; Choler Hot And Dry though know naught wherefore former's insertion why phalic
intractability ber Solidly Stated if not upon Instation By Demultiplex And Then Singleton, Summer is Heatful Emotion with the Physical Transliteration and be enduring body irks and
angsts of Derthed Temper whereby poled to Sanguine Blood then, Adolescence And Fiery then; Black Bile is Cold And Dry, Excreta, pronounced as Autumn cause be Repel of Spring And
Hyperactive Sanguinity wherein Leafall leans, Majorness Or Adulthood implied by the Bodily Wear And Dysfunction of the Organ Mekanics nigh Elderly And Phlegm, then Earth.

These are The Four Bodily Humours.

Fourth Emotive Substrata of the consciousness dictating a Physical Manifestation to issue, paired whence the plainly surveyed equixistence with Bodily Humours,
wherefro then Brainiac Links Accord One stimulus To A Behavioral Bias, substantially, through its prepotence wilting anysuch state as a Conscious Nebula; Emotional
Links ancestrially perpetuaded by THE ONE: Pleasure is Sanguine and enacts over the preternatural ability in Imaginative Expectation its object, thus presiding over
any Saturated Behavior therewith and all other emotions king; Despondentness is a severed abys oneself is transfigured to that Looms Abold Conscious Incension off its
able moment naught ber Idle Subconsciousness, tis pinnacle will be imputed with the subtratum of Melancholic Black Bile and Sleepful Surmountance as causatum; Hunger In
Its Craven Stench is an Anxiety insulting the Digestive System whence Seekment Is Started and with unexpedient pressures, then Choler junct (and) Phlegm; Fourth hexxed
to the Diabolical Objective evenmore naught Mental Sorrow ber Physical Pain whereabout the mind is extremely much receptive, Choler junct Black Bile, Hellish Pain.

An iridine shrewdness in time the consequence of almost probability from least belated to most, Bodiliy Humours: Yellow Bile the Motherly Breasts smothers subjoint the baby elationally
until his due excretion; Black Bile from the scanty gape due to deposit the Corruptive Desecration without; Phlegm upon the Cold Dyscrasia happenstancing for the Anacorrespondence To
Livelihood; Blood tunneled down the slayful bading to Bodily Tissue and Fourth Fort.

4 Is Justice, Sixth Perfection and Health.

5: The equixistince of Unitive Stationing forone the Quintessential Figures Of Physical Space generalized, in logos of Aritmetikal Unity, Tetrahedron is add Fire for
Plato's assent fore a vague attribute of perforation, and respectively: Cube is Earth or Solid State Matter in the first order of fair handling without synthetical
discombabulation, Octahedron is Air and Dodecahedron Water; submissive orders of wieldy. Icosahedron is upon the hearth of Plato's 12 Heavens. Quintet is Pentagon.

#ifdef hola
Our Intusensory Perspectives, also, are cinquedially arranged, furnished: Drearily Watchful, Oedonic Eyes complex denominators of Physical Space; Caressed Tact and
avowed within tis preclusion in codeterminance with the precorded Mutuality Between Our space; Audition serves participation into the popurri of Extraphysical Notions,
Eerie and Mysterious but Aloft; the Rhinppendix, Familiar Cavalier, for the Pleasure and uponly sequenced from descriptor Discreteness it devolves and mingles through
shorter navigations than Audition; Inadverted of the Complexity And Survivability, Dainty Taste, prepares the Nose and maws at its object of gratification.

Fifth Cinq is Sense, GOD's culminative Potence of Dampened Life and thus all Auturgy predating Human; Selfcardinality (freedom) and Manipulation over the Physical
World.

#endif /* hola */
6: In perfect walks is of tis, Sixth Day God Created Reality, and upon a sum that is of divisors a matematikal evaluator upon the such number emanated true perfection,
and evenmore the Multiplication Of Divisors; thise bidually saving from the number from membership.

What Pythagoras permuted upon a prudent algorithm denoting a sequential way by which numbers can be geometrically indicated: seminal development treats the bigger shape by addition of
one more per required side sakefor structure, tat is a recursive function incrementing the addend for each indexed dimension, for the same shape in effect and equimetric perimeter;
incepted upon the Unity Thenceforth All Collection Is Encompassed:
 
 Triangular Prudence: f(x) = {1 x = 1
                             {f(x-1)+x
 Quadratic Prudence: f(x) = {1 x == 1       The simplicity dazes me so in the geometrical organization that fabricates each subsequent Square Power, upscaling each side to recreate the
                            {f(x-1)+x+(x-1) =  similiarity of square, such that that the Aritmetikal Expressor seen through equally: per level the Secondth Power is converted to a
                             f(x-1)+2x-1       Unidifferential Product when isolated to another punctual Row, then x(x+1), and grasping from the Commutative Law one flank a Column is added
                                            of length plus 1, which then bestows (x+1)(x+1) = (x+1)^2 to the Perfect Square.
 Pentagonal Prudence: f(x) = {1 x = 1
                             {f(x-1)+2x+(x-2) or simpler f(x-1)+3x-2
 Hexagonal Prudence: f(x) = {1 x = 1
                            {f(x-1)+h+(h+h-3)+h or simpler f(x-1)+4h-3

Provided perceptions of each agreater coefficient and sustraend, from the Fundamental Triangle, are descriptors of Deeper Abstractions per each over of it. Beautiful Procession of
Simplicity To Complexity.

7: The Tree introspects Fort wes the Due And Ever Attended Love prospects Fort until more's had not, Even Tree to then end of whenever's naught expansing the love
ladden hearths with the decadence within Fort. Three Tree, Appeased Character, and wherefore (before which) lurks Fourth Fort Of Drudgery: 4 + 3 = Perfection + Peace.

Then odd 7 is iften it a closure of Even Mimicry Is And All Other Divisors, wes Prime too wherethrough specialty modeled upon. 7th Day GOD Retired and 7 Mortiferous
Sins. 4 deepenings the Body extends for Expulsion and 3 intends for Insertion, and not exclusively; the revolutive procedure condemns Expulsive Substrata, of
Superfluity And Corruption, ber celebrations proper Insertion, tis altogether of Health alike the Fourth. Afteryond the Enbearing of its posterior unity, perfective,
Harminous Peace depletes Soul of Pretentious Seekment.

7 is Peace, Health and Holy.
#ifndef hola
 
 General Irrelativity: Seven Deadly Sins, Seven Days Of Divine Creation, dsa
#else /* hola */

8: Octavius Eight pretends the Indefinite Feedback Loop Of Universe whereon Being Is Once But Then Not, Dual Two Of Opposition; Random Uncertainty enscribed in any
Infinite Multistation, of the Incomprehensible GOD, because Us are Tempophysically Bound Beings that impossibly reach HIS Unitary Perfection: All states of conciousness
in their Tempomaterial Deprivation would be unionized upon all possible Knowledges and Identites: One would gain Everything And of that Being. 

8 is GOD, Infinity, Change, Randomness.

10 is Commandment.
~
#endif /* hola */

Oportune heuristics the Bit Computer reunites that procures me laudable pattern at immaculate rate, for I then thus induce that The Maximum, And Even Because Frocoming 11, Difference
Between Consecutive Primes is Tenth, and Minimum Secondth. Tis from the settled image and twice compelled, 10 divines about the Tetraktys to insert the Perfect Notion as Quadro.

Nowunto's prosperous leg rating begone the imminently less staunched from botheither, of consolidation and none gelded unwavering the Columnial Continuum, with stomach uner heft onto
the sixth hour naught fifth had oneself waited on than yesterunto at the unit (start).

Abuela Carmen and Me were untidily revitalized ambulators over a divertive Advent Of Wholesale: I bathed the Insinuations Of Tongue as the Real forecoming wilt the Taste with Guineo
Manzanita, laureate presidence hitheron. Within around her's fainted occurence as per Unpejorative Pleasure, Expectancy and General Adapter to her, is the estate of Dominican Republic.

Quantity is a Generalization over the Aritmetikal Expression Set astride which each Operation intermaps thitheron, and thus latter is Abstraktion. Operations are bare found to be longer
structures that ever inculcate a Singular Particle. Henceforth the spectrum of Operations is Abstract Relativity and Quantities are the Discrete Units Of General
Irrelativity.

#ifndef hola
8(1/2+1/2b)+b^2, all odd squares minus 1 are multiples of 8, (2+3)^2, (2+5)^2, (2+7)^2...
#else /* hola */
Health is a Devented State, either, when Mind And Body are insanely subverted fore one or other, or rebounding state in overtance of Mind Body Preciousness none the prosectioned the
other and stabilized. 

chromebook:
	keyboard balance, locus lotus of points, proportionality +2  same addition too, latin magnmin, lonesome, scavenge, freight, un, lark, external vs internal knowledge class strategy of memorizing external knowledge then when time available think about it deeply, delusional base thoughts are useful if they avoid pain or make you happier, dimensions degree of freedom the more dimensions the more complex the more possibilites, god equation at any one time in all places x = num or whatever, scuttle, briefing, trench, scarf, turf, rim, humblebrag, slither, cargo, literals constants initializations, concpet of recursiveness thing upon itself, victor, brace oneself, godforsaken forsake forespoken,
	count one's lucky stars, stone bluff, tracer bullet, zebra streak, array verb organize, sportlight, hulk, klick, hunker down, whine, round, burrow, crawler,

	hide, conceal, harbor, shroud, cover, hunker, shade, seal, enclose, unreveal, veil.

	unconceal, unharbor/disharbor, unshroud/dishroud, uncover, unhunker/dishunker, unshade/dishade, unseal. disclose, reveal, unveil. latin.

	snitch, tattle, out, rat.

	lonesome, lone, alone, solitary, desolate, sole, particular, onely, unitary, singular.

	scavenge, salvage,

	underbelly. outsource.

	disparity difference synonym list.

	function different depending on parameters? java and possibly python? getter method Alias is another reference to the same object Calling function is the same as invoking it Null keyword java Java primitives cannot be aliased, why? Java Scanner/user input weirdness Epithet adjective before noun in spanish?

	The Trigonometric Waves are the maxifully up and low without sight's end, because the Circle creates an infinity beyond which a double pi revolution would...

	This is the revolutional connubiality without the incredulous laity, that one is at end's satisfaction the informational occlusion, upon instead apogee of the Axiomatic Base through which
	substratum of the same walk percolates subsequent Abstractions or Data Expansions; so singly tremelous comes to be the full system at this modulated behold onto its Axiom and thus all sequents.
	The notion is anointed to ideation's causation by the incisive assumptions: oneth, hypothenuse is radius as per within the Unit Circle; twoth, therefore sinx is vertical displacement and cosx horizontally. Concluding, first leg y, second the base x, doles the self all scale perfectly as abstraction within the Pythagorean Theorem: cos^2x+sin^2x=1. A system appointed series of Identities
	sequently progresses: get each Adjacent by subtracting the known from 1; get csc and sec instead
	by dividing accordinly, and suministering proper replacement to trigonometric functions about ratios.
	And of course the will's object to procure the knowledge of it is Simplifying Trigonometric Functions.

	fuss<n>intense attention,problem

	cork<
	 raven<rave<rant,babble,party
	 light brown substratum from tree possibly used for bottle stopper

	A vermin that of human flesh desires its morally immiscible appendages uncorked, the bodily mount of the soul is subjectively graced for hungerquenching, Ghoul, and it states about cementeries its susceptible heath, death mobbed, which will not struggle the body when soul dissevert, so it is moist with bit of rationale, aha.

	gleam<
	 glee<pleasure
	 soft or small light<n

	apron<
	 n>
	  acorn<capped nut from tree
	  prune<
	   dried plum<n
	   v>trim,decrease
	  cloth worn above other to avoid taint<n

	reel<instagram,train,wander<v

	alloy<combination,collection

	bliss<pleasure

	jangle<
	 jangles the moon monkey<fallout 4
	 intense sound<n
	 fight possibly verbally<v

	ajar<man and cup,lowly open<aj

	brim<limit<n

	taboret<n>stool,cabinet<kevin rupert class,metacontainer,

	stark<iron man,intense<n

	limp<
	 wander<v
	 weak<aj

	abject<aj>intensely bad,sad

	The Possessive Daunt encauses its objective upon oneself, amore submission whenz the Possession is about a plethora of encounters lain, and through deeper shaft bores therefrom of Subjective Preciety a Dicommoner Importance will instate the farthered Search. Tis Soul of myne such Disillusion had repeated, as Useless Encimators (encimate = create) lament greater the alternative affair than Foreself Excelsion, from the Unknowance and Fear of My Invetive Notebook, whither stead 'twixt any of yester's did Prideful Inattention devote it to? Albeit least apart, I am of retain My Scriptive Dedation and Inductive Functor to redact this withinfro a sleigh a medium taht duels the more hardiness fore Contra Correspondency.

	At perfecto, a propitious intrance of a Trading System withheld the Economist's Demotive from a Sought Desire, as Innately as its tone wilt, naught Punitive Avoidal, wherethen any Enactic Bulwark would be amortizised by Expleted Currential Devolvement, the Regardt Precious Unit: that of Praise a thing satiated can be by a haphazardly Social Convention, then it is Admired ber   by former in the walks of the latter goodliness. Why then, any such system would be elevated upon careful instation and Inconvenience Avoidals also excented be so, insofaras its appellations.

	Wherefore Intermittent Payment upon equity of Object Or State hither and thiter by Possession is without Gain a devent methodology, naught it ber a Recompensation should be provisioned to the User, inasmuchas the Losing Margin is Less than Gain however precepted, protrudingly in the form of Normal Preciety.

	od weird word meaning

	in situ meanning: who organization of health

	excreta = poop: africa world ban data bank

	https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC9338532/
	As shown in Table Table1,1, on average around 70% of households had access to a latrine, 72% of latrine-owning households used them, and 55% of latrines were improved latrines, meaning that they contained at least basic solid slabs assumed to separate excreta from human contact.

	It implies that parameters around the quality of latrines are relatively more consequential for latrine use and sustainability compared to open defecation and latrine availability (which are outcomes at the initial part of the sanitation ladder).

	Another notable finding of this review is the confirmation of health-related expectations as consequential motivation for latrine adoption and use in Ethiopia

	https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC9338532/: processual, typology = classification, subsume = warframe nidus ability,

	carcass korean girl in applied physics class

	purport meaning

	https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC10072458/: premise = building

	blooming = emphasis

	lavish english class albert io, slave, ecstasy

	dispense fecal matter through annus xd, english research paper, excreta

	causatum ankify

	pilfer meaning = rob

	went up 50% = 1.5x, went up 75% = 1.75, and so on, good pattern gotten from gov class number crunch

	phallus meaning, angel duriong precalc debate surprise

	luminance computercat cat beth stoudt ap csa pair project instagram lab

	plessy vs fergusan nigger vs white

	chrysantemums pheea email nthen24@eastpenssd.org school mail

	A General Disagreement with same Abstract References that is thus Implicit and Withers Knowledge for the Bewronged one; SAME WORDS
	DIFFERENT MEANING. Or counting upon a Noted Disagreement from the Righteous, for the latter case injurious if Uneven References but
	Quality in which, thus, at least one has associated the Word with a diffing Meaning; and the Empty Intersection should otherwise
	defy, in the Abstract Symbol and General Meaning, any MetaDisagreement: DIFF WORDS DIFF MEANING, DIFF WORDS BUT MEANING.

	n back: lesser in horizontal position
	anterior:spanish before, anteriority:posteriority, previority, previousness:loch:=loch ness monster,lake=n previata:latin, priority:process tree/hierarchy, hind:warframe weapon,

	behind=be=
	lesser, fore, before, earlity, elderity, backage,
	occiput=back of skull:berserk skull knight, start, tail, cauda, rear=key increase

	n front: greater in horizontal position

	The Madman, rather a pesty nomination for one, as fathomed of out mien, outa Social Convention and its Inductive association for
	What is Common to -> What Is Acceptable or Fashionable, or sane in this domiciled definition, is to Perception of Abnormal frequency within Society's heads; be him Crazy or not, be it Accurate or Not in relation to the External World, we should better be concerned to cease the Madman's Torment rather than, given to our own Aversion or Fear, trow shade upon him. MEASURING TRUTH BY MUTUALITY OF PERCEPTION, when undue one another, Recognized Ignorance.

	The effective work of applying Generalizations, once Induced, is along the veins of Perceptive Pattern Matching athwart the Ideal or Physical Search Space.

	The Influencer that's capable of a subjected Virtue, upon the Fanatic Wanting such Virtue Intrinsically and/or, in part, due to perceived Social Praise, he has the Power to Manifest States and Behaviors upon Society, HE PLAYS MASSESS UNDER HIS STRING. And apart from the Individuals that Admire an Entity sheerly from an Intrinsic Pleasure, and they might handshake on that with others,
	but to an equal Power of Influencer nevertheless, there's ones that Admire the Influencer's Virtue because of their own Lack, their Dream, to be like that; henceby, Desire can be deduced from Admiration, rather more not infrequently, and Personality by a bound.

	Personal Lack is a sheerly comparative notion, in which, though rarely, a One will never be uncaged off of because of the Principle of Indefinite Greatness: there will always be a One, or Oneself, which has More Virtue than Oneself, or Oneself from the Past; given that begin Greater than Oneself implies that at Present and Apast lie at odds with the former Greater, Personal Improvement, or, inmellowly, One Is Lesser in Virtue.

	The The Word opens more, uniquely and singularly, to the Platonic Idea itself, from which Imperfect Reflections promptly emanate, subject to the rather multiplicative and Unessential A Word: SHADOWS ONTO THIS NATURE, FROM THE REALITY OF PERFECT SHAPES TO THE YONDER, ENGENDER; THE FOR GENERALITY AND UNIFICATION, A FOR ABSTRACTNESS, INESSENTIALNESS, AND PARTICULARITY; CLASS VERSUS INSTANCE.

	Circle shell graph as two multiples come close xd

	also the gorgeous beauty of tradeoff that i forgot to save and have to write again xd


	all numeri are middles, in relation to one another

fallout 4 caps meta:
 nuka town market maddox 10 bloodworm meat (5 each) gives calmex silkworm return 250, 3.8x.

Poolsupplies#1
#endif /* hola */

#ifndef hola
Greetings,
#else /* hola */
terrrors are lost memories, the fear of losing consciousness is related to that
#endif /* hola */

#ifndef hola
We and, particularly, Our Household as a unit of This Neighborhood, hereby shall through Rationality provision the terms that lie Unjustified for the cost uptrend that its actual Owner
has exerted and fear we do of it as further as in the future:
#else /* hola */
games
 d2: pd2, pod
 toy story 3
 sonic generations
 new super mario bros
 disney infinity 3.0
#endif /* hola */

#ifndef hola
 Primarily, the basic premise of Raising Price should be based on the Customer's Benefit too, such that if the Productor gains at his loss be it Justified Through The Product's Or
 Service's Upgrade, which we do not see whatsoever despite subsequent increments; our Quotidian Experience has not been improved, neither Physically Or Servicially, to Justify anysuch
 proceeding. This would perform good upon Our Will if at the Cost Came Benefit Too, therefore, of either Product (urbanization) or Service. Otherwise, the Owner should provide for our
 empathic correspondence any other reasons that impute on his a greater cost that must be recompensated by this Price Uprising.
#endif /* ! hola */

#ifndef hola
 Secondly, overt it is that most people make their livelihood system within a certain budget, such that if the Lease is incremented it'd constrict those, postsecondarily, Human Needs
 for the deeper impoverished and, primordially, the Expectative Normalcy Of Living for the denizens hereunto by the simple absence of the Monetary Displacement for one purpose the better
 to instead Abide By Contract Of Tenancy, simply and unseparated from any duvious perception of whether had or not for any Human Experience; basic and imperially expected to be
 fulfilled at sunk cost should be.
#else /* hola */
another is beautiful Because of a feeling of Superiority And Insecurity.
#endif /* hola */

#ifndef hola
Farewell, and may your behold find this reasoning of protest righteously moral and sound. Carmen
~
